ly now that she's extra sticky!"

	"Dammit, Propsicle, who is this?  I can't put my hoof on his voice!  Is he the blind one?"

	"Uhhhh... duaaaaaaah..."  Props batted the microphone back and forth between her hooves.  "Oh noes!  You're breaking up, Unky Prowsy!  It must be a lightning storm!"

	"A lightning what-now?"

	"Give Xona a shot!  We'll catch you on the flipside!  Okie dokie!  Bye bye!"  Props flicked the communications array off and exhaled heavily.

	Zaid glanced at Props.  "You think the Tarkington could even catch up with us at this point?"

	"If anypony can make an engine purr like a kitten, it's my uncle."  Props looked up at him with a thin smile.  "I'm sure he'll join us beside Rainbow in no time."

	Zaid gulped.  "That's what I was afraid of."

	"Buh?"

	"I don't look forward to being on the receiving end of a boomstick."

	"Awwwwwwwww..."  Props stood up.  "Ya silly bean!"  She hugged Zaid, nuzzling his neck with her blonde mane.  "It won't be like that!"

	Zaid sighed through a smile.  "Ah... well... if you say so, then I feel better."

	"Yeah..."  Props closed her eyes, grinning.  "Besides, my Uncle likes to beat ponies up with a wrench before shooting them."

	Zaid's pupils shrank.

	"Hey!  I know!  Heehee!  You wanna have some more cheese?"

	Zaid whimpered, "For as long as I have left to live..."






	Clouds sped past the porthole windows of the mess hall as Roarke trotted through the chamber.  She passed by a bowl of salad lying at the end of the table.  Suddenly, the metal mare stopped.  She pivoted her neck and stared with rotating lenses at the meal.  After a few seconds, she trotted towards the kitchen.

	"Ebon," she spoke quietly.  "I see that Rainbow Dash's place in the table has an uneaten meal."

	The stallion stepped out of the kitchen.  He gazed blankly at the mare.

	"Is she not hungry?" Roarke asked.  "It seems odd for her to give up such good greenery."

	Ebon kept staring.

	Roarke's brow furrowed.  "Ebon?  Is there something wrong with your ears?"

	The stallion twitched.  "S-sorry.  Heheh..."  He rubbed his neck nervously.  "I'm just not used to you calling me anything but 'breeder.'"

	Roarke exhaled heavily through her nostrils.

	Ebon gulped.  "Right."  He pointed at the table.  "I made that for Rainbow ten minutes ago.  She was about to eat, but said she forgot something she left in her room.  I... g-guess she hasn't been back since."

	Roarke turned towards the table.  "Mmmmmm..."

	"Hey!  Would you like to remind her that her lunch is served?  I'm sure she'd hate for it to go to waste."

	"I think I will do one better," Roarke said.  She turned and glanced at him one last time.  "Thank you, Ebon."

	Ebon blinked, then smiled sweetly.  "It's my pleasure, Roarke."



	Roarke expertly climbed down the vertical crawlspace while balancing the bowl with a prehensile metal tail.  At last, she reached the bottom, pivoted about, and shuffled into the observation room.  Daylight shimmered through breaking clouds, glinting off her metal parts as she entered.

	"Rainbow Dash, I did the favor of bringing Ebon's meal to you.  Perhaps you would be more comfortable eating he—"  Roarke froze in her tracks.

	Rainbow Dash was lying limp on the floor.

	Roarke's lenses rattled.  "Rainbow...?"  She dove forward.  "Rainbow!"

	Clack!  The bowl fell to the floor behind her, spilling lettuce and other vegetables across the floor.

	Roarke squatted at the pegasus' side and lifted her in her forelimbs.  "Rainbow?!  Speak!  Say something—"

	"I hear you.  I hear you," Rainbow hissed, stirring numbly in Roarke's grip, but completely awake.  "I... unghh... heard you the first time."  She gulped.  "Just calm down..."

	"You are... fine, then?"

	"I'm okay," Rainbow wheezed, nevertheless draping off of Roarke's hooves.  "Really..."

	Roarke sneered.  "You are not fine!  Is it another dizzy spell?"

	"No..."

	"Rainbow..."

	"Okay, yes, it was," Rainbow muttered.  "But it's over now.  Still... damn things take their toll on me.  I was just catching my breath."

	"For ten minutes?"  Roarke frowned.  "It's doing more than that, Rainbow.  It's paralyzing you."

	"Well, look at it this way..."  Rainbow smiled dazedly at her.  "At least it cures my insomnia!"

	Roarke said nothing.

	"... yeesh, I wish you could take your metal eyes off more often." Rainbow gulped.  "It's getting hard to tell when you're glaring or not."

	"You are right to suspect my ire," Roarke said.  "It is not right to play off your condition."

	"Hey... who's playing it off?" Rainbow remarked with a weak shrug.  "It totally sucks.  I know this too well, girl."  She sighed, leaning into Roarke's embrace.  "Timing couldn't be worse."

	"How do you mean?"

	"Mrmmff..."  Rainbow closed her eyes.  "Do I really need to explain it?"

	Roarke bit her lip.  She glanced back at the fallen bowl of food, then up at the hammocks.  Holding her breath, she lifted Rainbow and placed her into the lower net, laying her body out so that she could rest comfortably.

	"Ah jeez..."  Rainbow grimaced slightly.  "Next, you'll be singing me lullabyes or something."

	"You are still too weak to move?"

	"I... uh..."  Rainbow stirred and stirred.  She gulped.  "I could use a few more minutes before I get my fuel back, I guess."

	"This is not a good thing, Rainbow," Roarke said.  "Your spells are getting worse."

	"Mmmm... don't I know it?"  Rainbow sighed, staring towards the bulkheads.  "Thanks for being so swell to me, Roarke.  Really.  I just..."  She paused to yawn.  "...n-need a little more time, and then I'll be back in action.  You'll see."

	"And when your next attack comes," Roarke said.  "How long will it take you to get 'back in action' then?"

	"Hrmmmff... I dunno..."  Rainbow curled up, her eyes shutting.  "I think I'll sleep on it."

	Roarke sighed and hung her head.

	"Roarke...?"

	The mare looked up.

	Rainbow murmured, "If things weren't this crazy bad, I want you to know that nothing would have changed between us."  She gulped.  "Don't you ever think that you're... th-that you're just some sort of last resort."

	Roarke's lips pursed.  Her ears folded back as she trotted forward and rested a hoof on Rainbow's shoulder.  "I believe you completely..."

	"Good," Rainbow said.  A smile crossed her muzzle as she drifted off to sleep.  "So... don't be so stiff.  Relax a little.  Let your hair out..."  Another yawn.  "Mmmm... b-beautiful scarlet hair..."  And she was slumbering.

	Roarke stood their, her hoof lingering on Rainbow's shoulder.  She stared silently into the metal bulkheads.



	"And if color wheel boomer succumbs to the glimmer shimmer, what then?" Floydien asked, glancing towards the rear of the cockpit as the day beyond the windshield came to a dull end.  "Nancy Jane and fellow boomers have much to work work."

	"There's no telling when or where it will happen, but we have to come to grips with the reality of the situation." Roarke swiveled about, staring across the cockpit at the other three.  "Rainbow Dash's end is coming soon.  We must do something about it."

	"Roarke..."  Bellesmith fidgeted, clearing her throat.  There was no hiding the wavering tone in her voice, much less the tears welling up in her eyes.  "Roarke, Pilate and I have carried the weight of this fact for a long, long time.  And as much as we wish for the better, we both know that—in the end—there is nothing we can do."

	"So, as her best friends, you are willing to abandon her to her fate?" Roarke said.

	"We are not abandoning her to anything," Pilate said with a frown.  "Maybe there's more flame out there in the machine world that will give Rainbow Dash her strength back.  Maybe the fate of the Austraeoh means for her to be 'reborn' again.  There's simply no way for anypony to tell.  Not us and certainly not her."

	"We have to accept the fact that..."  Belle choked back a sob.  "Th-that one of these days, our options will run out.  And then... th-then..." She held a hoof over her muzzle as she shivered.

	Pilate leaned in to nuzzle her.  After a breath he spoke to Roarke.  "There has to be a reason for this vision... this new symbol that Rainbow Dash is seeing."

	"Could it be another flame?" Roarke asked.  "She's seen those before."

	"Yes, but this isn't anything like it," Pilate said.  "At least, not the way Rainbow describes it.  There's no mention of the color lavender.  What's more, this vision has a definite shape, instead of just being a vague light source that only she can sense."

	Floydien shrugged.  "Once a glimmer, always a glimmer."

	"No, Mr. Floydien, this is definitely different," Pilate said firmly.  "And it angers me that I can't come up with a solid explanation for it!"

	"But you are familiar with the symbol...?" Roarke said.

	"I've seen it—yes—but I have no way of deciphering it."  The zebra sighed.  "And, apparently, neither does Kera."

	"I wish we had some sequencing equipment," Belle said, sniffling.  "Maybe there's something new inside Rainbow Dash, now.  A new spark to the Austraeoh that I could somehow examine for a solution..."

	"And where would such shimmer metal be found?"  Floydien tightened his jaw.  "The boomers out here prefer wood and flame to clank and embers!  Yes yes!"

	"I do not believe that there is any point in us trying to ascertain the situation any more than we already have," Roarke said.  "If you ask me, I believe the answer has already been given to us."

	Pilate tilted his head aside.  "How do you mean?"

	"Yaerfaerda," Roarke uttered.  "It can't be any coincidence that it has appeared to Rainbow Dash during the most intense throes of her chaotic condition.  I believe the symbol is as much a beacon as the flames have been.  Perhaps more so."

	"You think we can help Rainbow Dash by following it?" Belle remarked.

	"We owe it to her to try," Roarke said.  After a deep breath, she turned towards Floydien.  "Change our course.  We are no longer headed to Val Roa."  She glanced down the vertical crawlspace.  "Not without Rainbow Dash in good health..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Getting the Hang of It		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash lay on her side, stirring ever so slightly in her sleep.  The mare's muzzle tensed while her ears flicked one after the other.

	As soon as a brown hoof reached up from beneath the hammock and gently stroked the pony's chin, Rainbow Dash murmured an unintelligible noise.

	"Rainbow Dash..."  Roarke's voice spoke.  "Rainbow...?"

	"Mmmrmmf... hrmmmm..."

	"You must get up," Roarke continued.  "Please.  I insist.  This will only take a moment."

	"Grff... so m-many moments..."

	"I know.  I know."  Roarke's forelimb pushed Rainbow Dash straight up in a sitting position.  "Now, open your eyes."

	"Mrnngnhhhh... f-fiiiiine..."  Rainbow's eyelids parted ways.  A pair of jaded ruby pupils squinted at the starry night beyond the observation room's windows.  "What am I looking for?"

	"Do you see the Yaerfaerda simble?"

	"Guhhh... yes..."  Rainbow yawned.  "Of course..."

	"Is it straight ahead of us?"

	"Gzz-zzzzz..."

	"...Rainbow."

	"Snkkkt-zrkk-huh?  What?"

	"The symbol..."

	"Oh.  It's... it's..."  Rainbow lazily rolled a hoof through the air.  "A bit to the right..."

	"How much?"

	"Huh?"

	"How far to the right?"

	"Eugh... I dunno.  Just—like—to the edge of the windows.  Starboard side."  Rainbow's head teetered.  "Not sure what it matters anyway."

	Roarke was busy craning her head towards the vertical crawlspace behind her.  "Forty-five degrees towards starboard!  Bend south!"

	"Yes yes yes!" Floydien's voice echoed back down.  "Adjusting to your metal muzzle mutter!"

	Rainbow blinked.  "Uhhhhh... Roarke?"  She glanced aside.  "What are you doing—?"

	"Look now, Rainbow," Roarke said as the Noble Jury stopped pivoting.  "Are we facing it now?"

	"Huh?"

	"The symbol.  Is it dead-center with the windows, now?"

	"Uh... n-no?"

	"Where is it, then?"

	"Like—just a sneeze to the left.  Why—?"

	Roarke tilted her head towards the cockpit again.  "Fifteen degrees to the north!  Port side!"

	"That is one elusive glimmer shimmer!"

	"Since when did you chart the stars with a space elk?" Rainbow droned.

	"How about now, Rainbow?" Roarke asked.

	"Roarke!  For pete's sake!"  Rainbow sat up, fidgeting.  "Just what is going—"

	Thwump!  Roarke shoved Rainbow back down into the hammock.  She leaned in, her metal lenses pistoning outward coldly.  "You will tell me when it is centered.  Do you understand?"

	Rainbow gawked at her.  She gulped and said with a cracking voice, "Just a tinnnnnny hair to the right."

	"Floydien!  Five degrees to the south once more!"

	The Noble Jury pivoted slightly.

	"There... uh..."  Rainbow pointed a weak forelimb straight forward.  "We're lined up, now."

	"Are you sure?"

	"I... I-I guess so..."

	"Hrmmm..."  Roarke took a deep breath.  At last, she trotted over to the crawlspace and shouted up, "Stay on course!  Do not meander north or south from this direction unless I tell you to!"

	"Whatever the megaphone boomer says!

	"But Roarke..."  Rainbow winced from where she lay in the hammock.  "Val Roa is—"

	"Not our priority right now.  You are."  Roarke trotted up to the hammock and stared at the pegasus.  "Don't mistake my actions for single-hearted heroism.  I have the will of the entire crew backing me up."

	Rainbow shrugged.  "I wasn't assuming anything."

	Roarke's pistons retracted.  "...oh."  She tilted her head down.

	Rainbow gulped and produced a nervous smile.  "But... uhhhh... that's really swell of you, Roarke, to be thinking of me."

	"Indeed..."

	"But... for Celestia's sake!"  Rainbow's brow furrowed.  "What is this going to accomplish?"

	Roarke pointed out the window.  "Something out there has a connection with you.  If, perhaps, you are indeed destined to be Austraeoh, then helping you attain it might assist in your well-being."

	"Roarke, I dunno if anypony's told you, but I'm infected with a bunch of chaos crap."  Rainbow clenched her jaw.  "I was dying long before I figured out any of this Austraeoh stuff and I'll be dead long after."

	"Then you have given up?"

	"No!"  Rainbow sighed.  "I didn't say that.  It's just that Val Roa is insanely important and I've put it off for too long!  Now's not the best time to be flying after a wild goose chase.  I wanna know that I died doing something that mattered—"

	"Even if that meant denying your own purpose?"

	Rainbow blinked.  "Huh?"

	"Do you believe it's a complete coincidence that you stumbled upon Stratopolis, the remains of Commander Hurricane, and Sword of Solstice all within a short frame of time?"

	Rainbow simply gawked at Roarke.  "Uhhh... uhhmm..."

	Roarke leaned forward.  "And do you think the harmonic end to the Ledomaritan conflict could have been accomplished without you?  Or the illumination of the Durandanans?  Or the—"

	"Roarke..." Rainbow gulped.  "What do you believe in?"

	Roarke stopped dead in mid-speech.

	Rainbow raised an eyebrow, staring at her.

	Roarke leaned back on her haunches.  After a long breath, she said, "I believe that going to Val Roa will be pointless without you."

	"Heh..."  Rainbow slumped back in her hammock.  "I see..."

	Roarke hung her head.  "And the same can be said of many... other th-things..."

	Rainbow turned her head towards her.

	Roarke sat in melancholic silence.

	Rainbow smiled weakly.  "I thought I'd be dead before I ever heard you buying into all this 'Austraeoh' stuff."

	Roarke took a dee breath, nodding.  "It c-certainly is close enough..."

	Rainbow bit her lip.  She closed her eyes with a sigh.  "Roarke..."

	"You should get some more rest."  Roarke turned around to leave the observation room.  "Thank you for your assistance in plotting a new—"

	"We picked a lousy time to kiss each other, didn't we?"

	Roarke's body froze.  Her ears folded back.  Slowly, she pivoted about, shuffled back towards the hammock, and nuzzled her cheek up against Rainbow's.

	Rainbow's face flushed as she reveled in the soft, fuzzy gesture.

	Roarke finished by running a hoof through Rainbow's mane and gazing straight way at her.  "...does that answer your question?"

	Rainbow gulped.  "In sp-spades," she sputtered.

	"My faith in you is not a trivial thing," Roarke said in a firm tone.  "You have transformed my life from a metal-cased corpse into something that lives and breathes.  If miracles can happen once, then surely they can happen again."

	"Heh..."  Rainbow smirked.  "And I like the way you squeak when I featherstroke your hooves."

	Roarke opened her mouth, lingered, then muttered with rosyc heeks, "I concede to your superior statement of affection."

	"Heeheehee!"  Rainbow clutched her blue tummy as she smiled.  "Dang straight, you do."

	Roarke's lips almost curved, but a sudden paleness overwhelmed her.  She stared shudderingly towards the side.

	"Hey..."

	Roarke looked up.

	Rainbow gave her a thin-eyed grin.  "You're pretty cool, y'know... shoutin' orders like that.  Getting the Noble Jury to follow you."

	"As I said, this is a coordinated effort, Rainbow—"

	"Horseapples!  You know how long it took Floydien to take a direct command from me?  Face it, you're a natural-born leader."

	"Rainbow—"

	"You're the Jury's natural born leader, and if I should—"

	Roarke braced Rainbow's shoulders with both hooves.  "You should concentrate on feeling better."  Her lenses rotated.  "Relax now and save your strength for whatever it is we might find when we reach the symbol you see."

	"Roarke, we don't even know how far away the dang thing is."

	"Which is why I've ordered Floydien to be as swift as he can."

	"Heh... ya see?"  Rainbow smirked.  "You're totally on top of the game."

	Roarke gulped and nodded.  "I've had divine inspiration."

	"You know what?  I believe you."

	Silence.

	"I... am sorry for having to wake you," Roarke muttered.  She shuffled backwards on her hooves.  "I had better check on the rest of the ship."

	"Really?"

	"I... I believe..."

	"They can handle themselves for a while, Roarke..."  Rainbow fought a wave of dizziness and stammered, "Don't ya think?"

	Roarke bit her lip.  "Then... then what am I to do...?"

	Rainbow blinked, her eyes lighting up.  "Stay here with me?"

	Roarke stared back at her.  She glanced at the hammock, then back at Rainbow.  At last, she stood up on her hind quarters and slid her forelimbs under Rainbow.

	The pegasus rocked awkwardly in the hammock.  "Uhhhh... uhhhhh—Roarke—?"

	With sudden grace, Roarke slid herself into the hammock beside Rainbow.  She shimmed and squirmed until she was lying against the net with Rainbow's back reclining against her.

	"Whoah..." Rainbow wheezed.

	"There..."  Roarke spoke as the hammock slowly rocked to a stop.  "Is that not more agreeable?"

	"Oh..."  Rainbow gulped.  "I agree.  Heh... I agree whole-heartedly."  Rainbow glanced at the net with a slight giggle.  "I-I'm just killing myself on the inside, trying to figure out how you did it."

	"Mmmmmm..."  Roarke's forelimbs wrapped around Rainbow from behind.  "...pegasi are not the only equines with poise and grace."

	"Me?  Poise?  Grace?"  Rainbow chuckled and leaned her head back against Roarke's chin.  "If you say so, girl..."

	"I will stay here as long as you wish me to," Roarke said.  She leaned down to nuzzle Rainbow's ear.  "Be it a long flight or not."

	Rainbow gulped.  "Yeah... that's..."  She exhaled with a squeaky voice, "That's cool..."

	Roarke's brow furrowed.  "Uhm... Rainbow?  Is there something wrong with your—?"

	"Just don't mention 'em!" Rainbow blurted, her cheeks blood red.  "They'll... uh... th-they'll relax soon.  I promise."

	Roarke cocked her head to the side.  "Ah... I see..."  Her lips curved slightly as she stroked Rainbow's mane.  "I understand now why you were never on your back the other night."

	Rainbow wheezed and murmured, "Th-they're not as fragile as you think."

	"Is that an invitation?"

	"Uhhhhh... uhhhh..."  Rainbow gulped.  "I... th-thought the whole point of this was for me to relax."

	"But of course..."  Roarke kissed the top of Rainbow's head and held her closely.  "I promise you, one way or another, you will get to your destination safely."

	Rainbow sighed with a bittersweet breath.

	"Do you not believe me?" Roarke murmured.

	"It's not that," Rainbow said.  "Just... being here... like this?"  She closed her eyes and nuzzled Roarke's chest from behind.  "...I almost don't care what happens to us."

	Snap!

	The hammock broke from the weight of the two.

	Fwump!

	The two landed on the floor in the exact position as they had dangled, with Roarke clutching Rainbow from behind.

	As the metal mare's lenses rattled to a stop, Rainbow blinked dumbly towards the ceiling.

	"... ... ...then again... ow."

	Roarke bit her lip.

	"...snkkkt—heeheehee!" Rainbow curled up in Roarke's embrace.

	Roarke exhaled.  Her lips closed as she held Rainbow close.  Soon, a dry chuckling sound escaped her mouth, joining Rainbow's squeaky chorus.
		//------------------------------//
		// There Be a White Nancy		//------------------------------//

	Days later, Ebon Mane woke up early.  He trotted across the mess hall of the Noble Jury—yawning to himself—and made his way into the kitchen.  Once inside, he started cracking eggs and preparing an omelette.  Thinking of Josho, he decided to make some pancackes on the side for good measure.  It was an altogether pleasant morning, and he hummed a tune to himself as he went through the regular motions.

	Things changed when he reached for a bottle of syrup from storage.  His body jolted suddenly.  He wheezed, feeling breathless, and teetered hard to his side.  Pots and pans fell to the floor, and the stallion soon followed them.

	"Ooof!"  Ebon winced, hugging himself as he felt a burning sensation surge through his figure.  His eyes clenched shut, tearing, and he felt as if thunder was roaring against the walls of his skull.  As the agonizing seconds rolled by, the thunder took on a form, almost resembling a voice.  Before he could hear what was being said, he sensed a pulse of light from beyond his lids.

	Ebon opened his eyes.  He sensed a faint green glow around him, glinting off the kitchen equipment.  He realized that a reflective metal pan was to his right.  He pivoted his head, looking.  A pair of green orbs levitated just in front of his face.  When he blinked, the orbs dimmed and turned bright again.  Then, slowly, the green light faded, and Ebon was gazing at the reflection of a frightened, sweating stallion.

	Slowly, he stood up, clutching himself as he shivered.  "M... m-mother..."  He blinked at himself, surprised at the suddeny utterance.  Sniffling, he remained huddled there in the kitchen, leaning a cabinet as his lungs hyperventilated.



	"How long did it last?" Eagle asked.

	Ebon bit his lip, curled up atop the cot in the cabin across from him.  "Not... not long.  Seconds, maybe."  He gulped.  "But it felt like forever."

	"You felt like you were burning on the inside?"

	"Yeah..."  Ebon nodded, his eyes quivering and frightened.  "At f-first, I thought I was having maybe a heart attack... or a stroke.  But it's not like any sort of sensation I've ever known about before.  Something really scary took over me.  And, what's more, I swear I saw a light..."

	Eagle Eye cocked his head to the side.  "A light?"

	Ebon nodded.

	Eagle shuffled over to the cot.  "What kind of light?"

	"Bright.  Green.  All around me."

	"Green?"

	"Or..."  Ebon's eyes narrowed.  "Or perhaps it was inside of me."  He tilted his head up and stared at Eagle with a quivering lip.  "And the only reason I sensed it everywhere was that it was all I could see!"

	"That's..."  Eagle fidgeted where he stood.  "That's rather odd..."

	"That isn't the end of it," Ebon said.  "I... I had this loud rumbling in my ear.  Only, it wasn't just noise... it was a voice."

	"A voice?"

	Ebon nodded and nodded.  "I'm sure of it.  It was speaking to me.  Commanding me."

	"Commanding you?"  Eagle ran a hoof through his mane and fought to keep from shivering.  "Commanding you to do what?"

	"I... I don't know..."  Ebon whimpered slightly.  "But... b-but as soon as the worst of it was over, I... felt her..."

	"Huh?"

	"I sensed her.  I smelled her.  It's like I could crawl into her arms and be safe... and yet I was so scared, Eagle.  It shocked me to my core..."

	"Who are you talking about?"

	Ebon exhaled.  "My mother..."  He clenched his teeth.  "I swear, it feels like—for the first time in forever—she's actually trying to find me.  And... and I-I've never experienced that before!  And yet I have!  And... and it's so confusing..."

	Eagle said nothing.

	"Eagle...?"  Ebon sniffled, his eyes wattering up.  "EE, I'm frightened..."

	"Oh, Ebon..."

	The stallion covered his eyes.  "What's happening to me n-now?!  What more do I h-have to deal with?!  I can't stand it!"

	Eagle slid up on the cot and held Ebon close.  "You're safe.  You're with me.  You've got nothing to worry about."

	"But wh-what's happening, then?!"  Ebon sobbed quietly, burying his muzzle in Eagle's shoulder.  "H-how can I be a reliable cook and Jurist if something like this is to happen again?"

	"Whatever it is, you've fought your way past it!"  Eagle smiled encouragingly.  "If you had to, I'm sure you'd overcome it again!"

	Ebon hiccuped and raised his puffy eyes to look into Eagle's.  "But... wh-what makes you so certain it will happen again?"

	Eagle instantly paled.  His ears folded back.

	Ebon saw it.  He looked frightened.  "EE...?"

	Eagle took a deep breath.  "Ebon, I..."

	Ebon stared, his eyes moist and glistening.

	Eagle swallowed a lump down his throat.  His voice wavered as he said, "There's something I-I've been meaning to tell you.  You must understand, that n-no matter how crazy this sounds, I love you for who you are... no matter what..."

	"Huh...?"  Ebon squirmed, leaning forward.  "What is it?"

	"You see, Ebon..."  Eagle winced.  "You... uh... uhm... you're a—"

	CRACKKK!  Out of nowhere, a gigantic three-pronged barb about the size of a pony smashed its way through the outer hull of the Jury, embedding into the stallions' chamber and coming to a violent stop just inches from their bodies.

	"Gaaaaaaah!" Ebon threw himself into Eagle's embrace.

	"Whoah!"  Eagle teetered, toppled, and fell out of bed with Ebon.  "Holy s—" THUD!



	The entire ship was still shaking by the time Props regained her balance.  She stood up, shaking the cobwebs out of her head.  When she looked up, her goggles reflected over a dozen leaks in the steam pipes.

	"Fuzzlecrap!"  She swiped a wrench up in her teeth and galloped into action.  The lavender glow of the caged book splattered her body with kaleidoscopic wipes as she tightened one pipe after another.

	As the steam died down, Zaid stumbled into the engine room from next door navigation, coughing and waving the mists out from before his muzzle.  "Whew!  It's like a fish factory down here!  Blondie, you okay?!"

	"Mrmmf—mmfmfrff!"  Props tightened two more pipes and turned her head towards him.  Ptooie!  "I-I dunno what happened, Zaidy Waidy!  Something shook all the pipes loose!"

	"We've been hit!" Zaid spat.

	"We have?!"

	"At least that's what Floydien said!"

	"Yeah!"  Props swung her way to another set of pipes and began banging away.  "But by what?!"



	"Kera!  Darling!"  Bellesmith hissed from across the mess hall.  "Keep your head down!"

	"But I see something out there!"  Kera chirped, standing atop a chair as the ship shook and wobbled.  Through the porthole, she spotted log cabins, wooden walkways, and crude towers.  "It's a village!  Why would a village attack us?!"

	"I don't know!"  Belle wheezed, motioning from where she squatted beside the couches in the lounge.  "Now get over here!"

	Kera scampered over, bright-eyed.  "How could a village attack us?!"



	"She's not falling!" an earth pony in wooden armor shouted from the rooftop of a two-story building.  He lowered his binoculars and shouted across the town.  "Ready cannon two!"

	Across the street, a half-dozen earth ponies were turning and twisting the valves of a complicated, wood-mounted ballista.  The barbs of the weapon's iron tip glistened from the overcast sky.  Slowly, it tilted up from the ponies' collective labors and aimed at the Noble Jury above the treetops.

	"I don't understand!" a young, frightened stallion stammered in the moist, alpine air.  "That's the first time we ever hit her directly!  Wouldn't it have killed her?!"

	"She's obviously made of stronger stuff than we imagined, Keebroo," a grizzled old stallion said as he pulled at a coarse rope and tightened the ballista in place.  "Grnnngh... but if you were there at the campsite like I was when it got torn off the face of the friggin' earth, then you wouldn't be any least bit surprised."

	"But Drakshaa, seriously!"  Keebroo shivered in his armor.  "How can she take a javelin to the ribs and still live?!"

	"Enough dayum chatter!"  Drakshaa tilted his head and shouted over the other grunting ponies.  "Hey Booster!  Is the angle right?!"

	Situated atop a wooden tower in the corner of the village, a golden-blonde stallion stared through a pair of face-mounted spyglasses.  He licked his lips, leaning precariously forward on the edge of the lofty platform.  "Almost there... coming around... like sky butter, yesssss..."

	"Dammit, Booster!" Drakshaa shouted louder.  "Snap out of it!"

	Booster jerked nervously and raised his goggles.  "Huh?!"  His hazel eyes blinked.

	"Can we friggin' hit her again or not?!"

	"Raise it a little!" Booster shouted.  "When she comes swooping, she'll have to raise her head up to blow fire!  We can skewer her snout!"

	"And that'll kill her for good, right?!"

	"Well... technically, with its superior immune system being resilient to volatile infections—"

	"Will it kill her or not?!"

	"There's only one way to find out!"

	"You heard the geek!"  Drakshaa spat at the others.  "Raise her up!  We're gonna skin her alive by nightfall or else I'm a donkey's uncle!"

	The ponies heaved and labored to tilted the ballista higher.



	Eagle Eye stumbled up the stairwell, panting for breath.  He came out onto the top deck—sliding towards the port side with a gasp.  He hadn't anticipated the ship to lean so precariously.  Just before the petite unicorn could plummet over the railing—

	"Hey now!"  Josho caught him with his telekinetic field and hoisted the stallion to his side.  "I'd never figured you to suck at ballet."

	"What in the h-hay is going on around here?!" Eagle stammered, clutching his shield.

	"Some spit-sucking boomer shot a dagger through Floydien's beloved Nancy Jane!" shouted the elk from the cockpit.

	"Yes, dammit, we know!  Stick your antlers back up your butt" Josho hollered back.  As the ship teetered on its circular course, he pointed over the side.  "The javelin was fired from somewhere down there in Squalortown.  We must have been passing over the village when some smartass decided to play target practice."

	"But... wh-why hit us?!" Eagle stammered.

	"I don't know..."  Josho pumped his shotgun.  "But I know a fat bastard who can hit back."

	Rainbow and Roarke stumbled out of the cockpit.

	"How bad is it?" Josho asked.

	"The weight of the javelin is worse than the rupture it's caused," Roarke said.  "It's weighing us towards the port and making it hard to fly straight."

	"Otherwise, it seems like we're all okay," Rainbow said.

	"'Okay?!'"  Eagle Eye barked.  "That dang thing nearly impaled Ebon!"

	Josho smirked.  "It's about dayum time something did, huh?"

	"Tchh... old stallion..."

	"The question is, will they fire again?" Rainbow said, squinting at the village.

	"You would even ask that?"  Roarke jerked her neck.  A spark ran down her body, causing dark plates to extend from every length of metal reinforcement.  "If ponies can construct one killer instrument, then nothing will stop them from making one hundred."

	"Nancy Jane can't fly fast enough at this rate to avoid more rust glimmer!" Floydien shouted once more.

	"Right..."  Josho trotted towards the ship's edge and aimed his rifle.  "So, let's let them rust first."

	"Josho, wait!"  Rainbow hissed, wings outstretched.  "I didn't come out all this way to draw blood from complete strangers!"

	"Pfft!"  Josho smirked while squinting.  "What do I look like, a nurse?"



	"Why isn't she diving towards us, yet?" Keebroo asked.

	"The hell should we care?!" Drakshaa slapped a valve in place and yelled across the town.  "Booster!  We're good to go!  You give the signal—"

	KAPOW!  A single blast sent metal bits soaring through the front wooden support of the ballista.  With a loud groaning sound, the barb slumped forward on its own weight and crashed through several feet of lumber.

	Villagers dove off the roof—screaming in fright—and fell into the thick muddy streets below.

	Keebroo shrieked as he and Drakshaa tumbled onto an awning, tore through, and fell to the ground below.

	Atop his tower, Booster winced.  He clung to the railing as the structure wobbled from the vibrations of the javelin impacting the earth two buildings down.  He looked up at the Noble Jury, his goggles slick from a fresh drizzle of rain.

	Suddenly, the stallion gasped.  "It's... it's not her..."

	Meanwhile, Drakshaa was disentangling himself from Keebroo's shivering body.  "Rrrrgh!  That tears it!"  He stomped through the mud and hollered to every doorfront.  "To arms!  It's now or never!  Grab every crossbow and torch you have!"

	With a collective roar, dozens of ponies charged out of the town hall, drug store, and nearby apartments.  Worried mares and foals watched from inside as their husbands, fathers, and brothers charged into the street and formed a courageous phalanx as the Noble Jury came around.

	"Get her in your sights, boys!" Drakshaa spat as Keebroo stumbled to join the ranks.  "Let's let her pay for all the silver we've lost!  It's her blood or ours!"

	Several ponies shouted in fury, filling the air with thunder.

	Booster nervously tried yelping over the volume of their voices.  "Guys!  It's not her!  It's an airship!  There are ponies inside!"  He gritted his teeth.  "Darn it!"  Hoisting a wrench in two hooves, he hoisted it over a metal cable and zip-lined down into the middle of the village.

	As he did so, four bodies descended from the Noble Jury.  Rainbow Dash carried Roarke while Eagle Eye and Josho drifted the height of three stories with their telekinesis. As soon as all four landed, they charged directly into the village.

	The villagers followed Drakshaa's lead, charging straight at them.

	"Whoah!"  Eagle Eye's voice cracked, his eyes reflecting a wall of angry muzzles.  "I don't think they're happy to see us?!"

	"We've handled worse!" Rainbow barked.  "Remember—knock them out!  Neutralize!  I don't want anypony getting killed!"

	"Tell that to them," Roarke grunted.

	"Roarke..."

	"Here they come!"  Josho cracked the joints in his neck and aimed his rifle.

	Before the two parties could slam into one another, Booster leapt in the center, slid in the mud, and raised his forelimbs.  "STOPPPPPP!"

	Both groups skidded to a stop, breathless.

	Booster panted and panted.  At last, he turned and barked at Drakshaa.  "It's an airship!"

	Drakshaa tossed his raven black locks and squinted.  "Excuse me?"

	"It's an airship!  I saw it with my goggles!"  Booster tilted the article in question up to his brow and blinked.  "We hit an airship!  It's not her!"

	"Uh oh..."  Keebroo gulped.

	"Excuse me..."  Josho trotted forward, frowning.  "But what the hell, huh?!  What did we ever friggin' do to you guys?!"

	"We were just passing through!" Rainbow Dash added, gritting her teeth.  "If you didn't want us over your rooftops, you could have at least warned us!"

	"Please... forgive us..."  Booster spun and faced them.  "You have to understand!  We've never had an airship fly around these parts!  The only thing that's been flying around these parts is her!  We mistook you for her!"

	Roarke's lenses retracted.  She glanced quietly aside at Rainbow.

	"Her?"  Rainbow leaned her head to the side.  "Her, who?"

	Booster gawked at them.  "The... the dragon, of course."

	Josho scratched his head, then glanced at Rainbow Dash.

	Rainbow stared with thin eyes.  "A... dragon?"  She gulped.  "What dragon?"

	"Eewwwwwwwwwwwwww..."  Eagle winced, looking at his hooves with teary eyes.  "There's mud all over me..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Whelp, Better Late Than Never		//------------------------------//

	An old mare finished sipping from a smoking broth and lowered the wooden mug from her wrinkled muzzle.  She stared calmly across the torch-lit interior of the town's main hall.  "I, Merigold, have governed the ponies of Amulek for over four decades.  Not once did I ever dream that I'd be alive to see the twilight of our community.  But, alas, with each passing day, this place collapses harder and harder.  We've been refused access to our silver mines.  Our trade routes are constantly attacked and set on fire.  So many of our brothers and sisters have left, taking their families with them as they desperately seek new places to live.  Soon, the town of Amulek will be a ghost of the glory it once was, scarred by this... heartless invader from the mountains."

	Merigold stood up on aching limbs.  Drakshaa and Keebroo leaned in to help her, but she gently patted their hooves and trotted across the wooden floor on her own.  She passed dozens of families huddled all across the interior with their belongings, having taken shelter there for an untold number of days.

	"We used to be the leading provider of silver ore in this part of the valley.  For generations, the deposits found in our mines have supplied every community on this continent, ranging from the Alafreons in the west to the Val Roans in the east.  Even the Lounge have made peace with us, trading innumerable goods for a taste of our earthen supplies.  Over the years, we've developed an infallible reputation for ourselves and our work ethic.  I must admit, this has shaped the ego we maintain today.  It is a very sincere pride—but a stubborn one, and it has blinded us as of late."

	At last, Merigold came to a stop before the guests squatting at the end of the hall.

	"I wish I could properly convey my deepest regret over what we did to your ship... and almost to your crew as well."  She gulped.  "Each and every citizen in Amulek is a master craftspony.  I assure you, with my word as this town's governer, we will have your vessel back in immaculate shape without forcing you to adhere to any price.  Then, once you have everything patched up, we will send you on your way."

	Rainbow Dash, Bellesmith, Pilate, and Roarke looked on from where they sat.

	"That's... wonderfully nice of you to do," Belle said.

	"But—if I may..."  Rainbow Dash stood up.  "About this dragon..."

	"It's my fault," Booster spoke up, fidgeting.  "I was too busy trying to calculate the trajectory of the javelins!  I didn't even bother to think that we were dealing with something other than the dragon!  I—"

	"How could you?!"  Drakshaa snarled.  "Nopony's been dumb enough to fly through our skies since she began her rampage of destruction!"

	Keebroo spoke up.  "Drakshaa, they're clearly outsiders!  How could they have known?"

	"Who doesn't see the smoke rising from the mines every hour of every day?!"

	"To be perfectly fair, this place is kind of wet and foggy," Rainbow Dash said.

	"Huh?!"  Darkshaa frowned her way.  "What do you mean by that, winged freak?!"

	"She means this town is a filthy mudhole," Roarke spat.  Her lenses pistoned outward.  "And I'll make you wipe your flank with that tongue right after I rip it out, you trotting pile of defecation—"

	"Okaaaaaaaaaaaaay..."  Rainbow pressed a hoof to Roarke's shoulder, silencing her.  "Thanks for backing me up on the 'winged freak' thing, but rein it in some, girl."

	Roarke exhaled through her nostrils.  "I apologize."  She gulped.  "She and I are bonded now, you see—"

	Rainbow's eyes bulged.  "No need to announce it to the whole friggin' world," she hissed out the side of her muzzle.

	Roarke tilted her head up.  "Why not?"

	Rainbow face-hoofed.

	Belle grimaced awkwardly.

	Pilate cleared his throat and smiled calmly towards the crowd.  "We are... v-very much pleased that you have agreed to fix the damage caused to our ship, Ms. Merigold.  However, we can't help but notice that you seem intent on getting us on our way... and swiftly."  His metal brow furrowed.  "Tell me, have things become that dire?"

	"And I don't see how it's any of your business, striped one!" Drakshaa snarled.

	"Drakshaa, child..."  Merigold turned towards him with an aged glare.  "You will be polite to our guests.  They have suffered enough due to our negligence."

	"I still say they had no business flying here!"  Drakshaa folded his forelimbs as he sat on his haunches.  "Harumph!  Before all of this dragon business even started, we had total control of our airspace!"

	"Things have evidently changed, Drakshaa," Booster said.

	"I can't be the only pony ashamed of it!" He growled.  "Look how far we've fallen!  Now we're patching up foreign ships without seeing a single strip of payment out of it!  I'm telling you, at this point, the Green Bandits will roll in and claim this place as our own!  They'll turn it into a junkyard!"

	"Not with a dragon flying around, they won't," Keebroo said.  "Those goblins are too cowardly."

	"And I don't see you rushing out to fight that creature on any of Booster's expeditions!"

	Keebroo hung his head.  "I... k-kinda sorta like living."

	"And I like being proud of myself at the end of each day!"  Drakshaa punched his hooves together.  "Dammit, we need to call in support from the Val Roans!  Let's ice this dragon once and for all!"

	"That's proven to be rather difficult, Drakshaa," Booster said.  "We can never seem to catch the thing."

	"Yeah!  All that your stupid gizmos are good for is snagging down friendly airships!"

	"Stupid gizmos?!"

	"Silence!"  Merigold frowned.  "All of you!  This is not how ponies of Amulek should act!"

	The stallions hung their heads, looking towards the floor.  The nearby families shuddered and sat in silence.

	With a sigh, Merigold turned towards Rainbow Dash.  "Please forgive my citizens.  We have all been driven to our wit's end."  She gulped.  "Drakshaa, most of all, though he has his reasons..."

	"Hrmmmfff!"  The stallion angerly stomped out into the wet, gray drizzle of the town outside.

	"Yeah..."  Rainbow nodded, then turned back towards the village's governer.  "Just what slithered up his plot and died?"

	"He was the overseer of our mining operation," Merigold explained.  "Not a single pony died on his watch.  Then, suddenly, there was a leak in the mineshaft."

	Belle raised an eyebrow.  "A leak?"

	"To this day, we still don't know what happened," Booster explained.  "But one of our stallions must have pierced his way into a pocket of natural gas or steam or something.  Suddenly, the mineshaft started filling up with this dense, dense mist.  Drakshaa, being the responsible—albeit meatheaded—pony that he is, evacuated the mines immediately.  I was sent a week later to take samples of the steam and figure out what had contaminated the mines.  But..."  The blonde stallion gulped.  "...that's when she attacked us."

	"She came from the northern mountains," Keebroo nervously said.  "It's almost as if she was attracted to the mists coming out of the mines.  She attacked our expedition, destroyed our mining equipment, and completely wrecked the camps that we had put so much time and effort into setting up east of here."

	"Our entire mining operation has been grinded to a hault," Merigold said.  "At this point, it would take us months to get back on schedule.  We've been so desperate to reclaim our mines, that we've built dozens if not hundreds of weapons to combat this creature."

	"And yet, despite all of my technical know-how..."  Booster sighed.  "...nothing I build can take this creature down.  She keeps eluding us, taunting us, making regular attacks and driving us stir crazy."

	"By the Spark..."  Pilate leaned forward.  "Dare I ask... has there been any casualties?"

	"Uhhhhhm..."  Keebroo fidgeted.

	Rainbow blinked.  "'Uhhhhhm' what?"

	"By a sheer miracle, all of us are still alive," Merigold said.  She smiled slightly.  "It would seem as though luck smiles upon us in some fashion after all."

	"I've come really close to the dragon more than once," Keebroo said, shivering.  "I've nearly been roasted alive, and yet I'm still here today."

	"All things considered, I don't think the creature wants to devour any of us," Booster said.  "However, that doesn't change the fact that it's laid claim to our mines and it won't let go.  As long as it haunts those sites that once belonged to us, it continues to choke Amulek of what made us so prosperous over the last century!"

	"But, it's really not something you should be so freaked out about," Keebroo said with a nervous smile.  "Really, it's our bad for hitting your ship like you did.  Once we get you patched up, it's best that you high-tail it out of here and don't look back."

	"You can't be serious," Rainbow murmured.

	"I'm afraid that we are, child," Merigold said.  "Just look at us."  She gestured towards the melancholic families gathered around.  "We are without hope here.  We are without a future.  Until we finally slay that dragon—at who knows what cost—then we are helpless to salvage Amulek, and we are hardly appropriate hosts for innocent souls such as yourselvs."  She swallowed a lump down her throat.  "We're sorry that you ever got involved in the first place.  I promise you that we will send you off on your way shortly."

	"But... th-this is totally a big deal!" Rainbow's voice cracked.  "If you don't get rid of this dragon somehow, you might lose the town and your way of life!"

	"It's a fate we've all come to expect," Merigold remarked.  "We still hold faith that the next expedition or two that Booster leads might bring an end to the creature."

	"I've gotten so close to predicting its movements!" Booster passionately said.  "If I can only give it another shot, I just know that Drakshaa and I can take the thing down!"

	"Maybe what you need is some help in the right places!" Rainbow said.

	Roarke bit her lip.

	"Rainbow..."  Belle murmured.

	"That sounds most courageous, child," Amulek said.  "But unless you inexplicably had some experience in slaying dragons—"

	"As a matter of fact, I have!" Rainbow said.

	Keebroo did a double-take.  "You have?!"

	Merigold's eyes narrowed.  "How is such a thing possible?"

	Rainbow opened her mouth to explain—

	"Rainbow..."  Belle tugged on her tail.

	Rainbow sighed, raised her hooves to signal "time out," and turned towards her friends.  "Belle, you know what this means, right?"

	Belle whispered, "Rainbow, aren't you jumping the gun here, darling?"

	"In what way?"

	Pilate whispered, "This isn't Silvadel.  Neither is this Xona.  Your past aside, we're dealing with something that's completely out of my league."

	"And what if it isn't out of my league?" Rainbow exclaimed in a hoarse voice.  "What if this is the real deal?!"

	"Rainbow..."

	"What if this is Axan?!"

	Belle grimaced.  She glanced at Pilate.

	In a quiet but firm voice, Pilate said, "It does not make any sense.  Why would Axan fly ahead of us and plague an innocent group of ponies?"

	"She's never expressed any need for silver before, has she?" Belle remarked.

	"I don't understand it any more than you guys do!" Rainbow squeaked.

	"Then why are you making rash conclusions about it?"

	"Who's being rash?!  Pilate, Belle, these guys are in a crazy situation, and if there's even the remote possibility that Axan is connected, then I owe it to them to—"

	"You don't owe these ponies anything, Rainbow," Roarke said loudly, not bothering to whisper.

	"Turn it down a notch, Roarke," Rainbow said, frowning.  "You've already shoved your hoof in your mouth—"

	"Rainbow, you cannot afford to throw yourself into something like this now!" Roarke snarled.  "Neither can we afford to let you!"

	Rainbow gawked at Roarke.

	Eventually, Roarke caved, bowing her head as she shuddered.  "I... I-I mean..."  She sighed.  "Your condition, Rainbow.  It... it just isn't the right time, and—"

	"I know where you're coming from, Roarke."  Rainbow gulped.  "But there's something I haven't told you guys... something I just figured out."

	"And what's that, Rainbow?" Pilate asked.

	"These ponies say that their mines are north of here," Rainbow said.  "And that's where the dragon came from."  She stared firmly at her friends.  "Guess where I'm sensing this weird glowing symbol as we speak?"

	Roarke looked up, her lenses retracting.

	Belle's muzzle hung open.  "Blessed Spark... do you mean—?"

	Rainbow slowly nodded.

	"But... but..."  Belle grimaced.  "I don't understand!  Why is the symbol resonating from here?"

	"I don't know," Rainbow said.  "But maybe Axan does."  She gulped.  "Maybe this was her way of drawing me here..."

	"And to what, Rainbow?" Pilate asked.

	"...the fate of Austraeoh."

	A cold hush fell through the group.

	"Look, I may not have a lot of juice left in me," Rainbow said.  "But this is totally a situation worth squeezing.  If I fly past here, I fly past whatever's making me tick, and I'll never figure out this darn 'Yaerfaerda' thing."

	"Maybe you're not supposed to, Rainbow," Roarke droned.

	"Do you seriously believe that?"

	Roarke grimaced.  "I... I-I do not know what to believe."

	"That makes the two of us, sister," Rainbow said.  "But I'm not so cowardly that I won't bother trying."

	"I never said you were."

	"Then I'm glad to have you on my side."  Rainbow Dash stood up boldly and stared at the villagers.  "When's the next expedition heading out to the mines?"

	Merigold turned towards Booster.  "Mr. Spice...?"

	"Erm..."  Booster adjusted his goggles and said, "Tomorrow morning.  Bright an early."

	Rainbow nodded with a devilish smirk.  "You've got yourself a new dragon hunter."
		//------------------------------//
		// How To Dash Your Dragon		//------------------------------//

	"Well, I'm coming with you," Josho said, cleaning his shotgun from where he sat on the opposite end of the mess hall's lounge.  "I'm not particularly fond of these silver-sucking hickjobs.  I dunno about you all, but having actual ponies east of Alafreo shoot iron death at us was a pretty nifty wake-up call.  I'm proud to lend a hoof."

	"Not sure there's much to lend in this situation, Josho," Rainbow Dash said, hovering in a tight little circle.  Starlight twinkled outside the portholes.  "Somehow, I feel as though what's freaking out these ponies is mostly just inside their heads."

	"Just like I said!  Hickjobs to the core!"

	"Rainbow, what do you mean by that?" Belle asked.  "Clearly everypony here in Amulek has seen something... something that they fear greatly."

	"It just doesn't make any sense!" Rainbow's voice cracked.  "Why would Axan hold up here of all places and do this to a bunch of strangers?!"

	"You're certain it's not like her?" Pilate asked.  "I mean, she has a rather nasty history of taking up roost right under ponies' noses and terrorizing them for generations."

	"Yeah, but she's past that now... ya think?"  Rainbow folded her arms in mid-hover.  "Ever since Silvadel, she's had this... this dragon boner for 'following Austraeoh around.'  Seems counter-intuitive for her to turn heel once more."

	"More like double-heel, the way I see it," Josho said.

	"Am I tired?" Eagle Eye muttered, rubbing his head.  "Or did Rainbow just say 'dragon boner?'"

	"She's in the twilight of her years, Rainbow," Belle said.  "A dying Divine."

	"So?"

	"So... what if she's losing her mind?"  Belle gestured.  "It's happened to her siblings before.  Maybe Axan's reverted to her past self without knowing it?"

	"In that case..."  Josho pumped his shotgun.  "The dayum fire lizard probably needs to be put down."

	"Oh, great..."  Rainbow rolled her eyes.  "A dying east horse and a dying death dragon, drawn together by fate."

	Eagle squirmed.  "Well, when you put it that way..."

	"Well, what the hell else are you going on the expedition to the mines for?!" Josho cackled.  "You don't plan to shake the dragon's hand, do you?"

	Rainbow Dash bit her lip.

	"The symbol is out there, right?"

	Everypony turned to look at Roarke.

	"The symbol," she calmly repeated.  "If you can't find the dragon, at least you can find out the source of what's broadcasting 'Yaerfaerda' to your eyes..."  Her lenses pistoned outward.  "Right, Rainbow Dash?"

	The pegasus sighed.  "It's too much of a wet sopping coincidence for both the symbol and a friggin' dragon to be here in the same place... waiting for me."

	"If we never had altered course from Val Roa, we never would have discovered this," Pilate said.  "If you ask me, Rainbow, pursuing this is the best possible thing you could be doing right now."

	"And does it have a best possible outcome?  Huh?"

	Pilate bit his lip.

	"Rainbow, are you getting any better?" Bellesmith quietly asked.  "I mean, in regards to the dizzy spells and—?"

	Rainbow shook her head.

	Belle's gaze fell slowly to the floor.  She fought a lump in her throat.

	"Well, I'm coming with you," Josho uttered.

	"You've said that three times already..."

	"I'm going too!"  Eagle Eye stood up.  "I mean... this is a job for me as much as for the old stallion.  There's no telling what horribad stuff we'll run into.  You'll need a good shield alongside the journey!"

	"Thanks, EE.  I appreciate it," Rainbow said.

	"It's best that I come as well," Roarke said.  She turned towards Rainbow Dash, meeting her gaze.  "My tools of the trade could be very useful."

	"That..."  Rainbow sighed and smiled gently.  "...would be really nice."

	"Then I think a good night's sleep is in order," Belle said.  "If nothing else..."  She rubbed a hoof along her brow.  "Nnnngh... we don't have to sit up all night, dwelling on this."

	"Don't worry, Ding-Dong," Rainbow said.  She touched down beside the mare and rested a forelimb on her shoulder.  "If Axan is behind all this, then she sure has some explaining to do."

	"Right..."  Belle squinted at her best friend.  "And if she refuses to?"

	Rainbow Dash clenched her teeth.  "I-I've put down a dragon before.  I... uh... I wouldn't hesitate to do it again."

	Silence.

	Josho grumbled, "Well, I'm coming with you—"

	"WE KNOW THAT ALREADY!"



	The next morning inside his cabin, Eagle Eye finished fitting on a leather sling.  He attached his shield to the back of it, adjusting it telekinetically and balancing the weight on his flank.  He took a deep breath, then turned and looked at the cot.

	Ebon sat on the bed's edge, clutching his skull and wincing.

	Worriedly, Eagle Eye squatted down and tilted the stallion's chin up.  "Hey... how are you doing...?"

	Ebon gritted his teeth.  "I... I-I can't explain it," he wheezed, eyes misty.  "It's like a ton of bricks keeps hitting my head.  Over and over and over again..."  He shuddered.  "If it weren't for you lying by my side, I'd never have gotten any rest last night."

	"I'm sure it'll pass," Eagle said with a weak smile.  "You've been through worse before.  Together, we'll get you through this."

	"I know... it's just..."  Ebon hugged himself, sniffling.  "It's a scary ride..."

	"I bet..."  Eagle clenched his jaw.  "Ebon... I-I wish that I could stay here with you all day.  But..."  He squeaked, "Rainbow, she... sh-she's brave and all, but I'm starting to feel with each morning that she hasn't much time with us left, and... and..."

	"Shhhh..."  Ebon reached out and patted Eagle's forelimb.  "I know, EE.  I know."  A bittersweet smile.  "She needs you more than ever right now.  I'm proud of this step you're taking."

	"I promise, no matter what..."  Eagle leaned in to nuzzle the other stallion.  "Whatever happens, I won't become an immortal dragon's barbeque."

	Ebon giggled breathily.  "You'd better not!  That'd make a really lame epitaph."

	"If I die, cremate me and mix my ashes into a bath shampoo."

	"Ewwww..."

	"Tell me about it."  Eagle touched noses with him.  "All the reason for me to come back alive."

	Ebon stared up at him proudly.  After a deep breath, his ears folded.  "I love you."

	Eagle's lips curved.  "I love you too."

	Silence.

	Slowly, Eagle turned, twisted the cabin door open, and trotted out into the main corridor of Noble Jury.

	As soon as he stood alone outside, his body slumped.  A grimacing expression crossed his features.  With glossy eyes, he nevertheless cleared his throat, pivoted towards the bow, and marched off to make an exit.  His shield clattered with each brave hoofstep he made.



	Roarke's hoof splashed into a deep puddle of mud.  She paused in her march and raised her forelimb, watching as the fresh rainwater dribbled off her metal braces.  She tilted her head back and stared at the misty treetops above the procession of ponies through the forest.

	"... ... ...I detest this place."

	"You know, for the first time..."  Eagle Eye trotted past the mare with a smile.  "...I think we're on the same page."

	"That is one severely soiled book," Roarke droned.

	"Awwwwww..."  Rainbow fluttered overhead, smirking.  "Would it make things easier if I carried you?"

	"No.  It wouldn't."

	"Please, stop grumbling."  Josho trotted by, trailing Eagle Eye.  Two dozen stallions marched loosely around them as they all trekked uphill.  "As if you've ever had a problem with Rainbow Dash on top."  Eagle giggled.

	"Hrmmmm..."  Roarke's ears folded back as she trudged on after the group.  "I'm murdering you two," she grumbled.  "Right after we murder this dragon."

	"Hey!"  Booster Spice smiled from what he overheard.  "Now that's the spirit!"

	"Can it, Booster," Drakshaa spat, using his thick muscles to pull a javelin launcher uphill through the forest.  "Rnnnnghh..."  He sweated and grunted.  "Every expedition before has failed.  I don't see how this one will end up any better."

	"That's because you've never had sheer awesomeness along for the ride!" Rainbow said.  "My buddies and I?  We've survived zeppelin battles, artillery bombardment, zombie hoardes—"

	"Foxes," Eagle added.

	"Foxes—wait... what?"  Rainbow did a double-take their way.

	"Didn't we tell you about the foxes?" Eagle Eye remarked.

	"Ohhhhhhhhh damn those foxes," Josho hissed.

	"Brrrrbrbrrr... right on, old stallion."  Eagle gulped.  "Scarred for life."

	"If you ask me, you ponies are full of it," Drakshaa sputtered.  "You were better off flying away in that crazy contraption of yours.  So if you all turn into smoldering embers, it ain't our fault."

	"But, according to your governess, Merigold, the dragon's not killed anypony yet!" Eagle Eye remarked.

	"Yeah.  It just likes to taunt us that way."  Drakshaa's sweaty face frowned.  "Scaley bastard."

	"You ever think that maybe the thing just wants to scare you off?" Eagle said.  "I mean, what's happened to your silver mines is terrible, but maybe it doesn't want to feast on pony flesh at all!  I mean, maybe it just—"

	"Hey!" Drakshaa shouted across the way to Josho.  "Fat unicorn!  Does your daughter here ever shut up?!"

	Eagle Eye did a double-take.  "Daughter?!"

	"Haah haah haah!"  Josho grinned wide.  "I'm starting to love this guy!"

	Rainbow giggled.

	"... ... ...she does have a nice mane," Roarke added in a dull tone.  "For a breeder."

	"Hmmmph!"  Eagle marched at a faster pace, upturning his nose.  "Well, at least some of us are trying to be serious!"

	"Awwwwwww... come on, princess!"  Josho marched quickly after him.  "Don't be like that!  Here, want a ride on P-Papa's sh-shoulders?  Snkkkkt-haahaahaa!"

	"Old stallion!  Quit it!"

	Rainbow rolled her eyes.

	"So... uhhh..."

	Rainbow glanced down.

	Keebroo glanced up at her while marching up hill.  "You're not from around here, huh?"

	"I kinda sorta figured that was already established, bro."

	"It's 'Keebroo', actually."

	Rainbow smirked.  "I know.  That was the joke."

	"It was?"

	"Ungh... Keebroo," Drakshaa groaned.  "Did you really need to bring your dumbass along just to disprove me?"

	"Hey!"  Keebroo frowned aside at him.  "A pony can be brave without having to be a total flankhole!"

	"That's news to me."

	"Don't mind him," Keebroo muttered, trotting ahead of Rainbow.  "He's just sour from having lost the mines.  He took his job super seriously."

	"Jee.  I had no idea."

	"I mean, isn't it obvious from the way he—"

	"I was being sarcastic, kiddo."  Rainbow giggled.  "You really need to chillax.  All this dragon stuff has gotten your nerves frazzled."

	"Yeah... I guess so..."  Keebroo gulped.  "I mean, a lot of my family have left Amulek.  It's not easy living here without them."

	"Why'd you stay if you miss them so much?"

	"Why wouldn't I?"  Keebroo lifted his head, smiling at the thick tree trunks stretching through the thin mist around them.  "This place makes me feel alive.  The scent... the taste... the cool hush of the mountain air?  It's home.  Would you leave home even if you had no choice—?"  He winced suddenly.  "Oh, jeez... I'm sorry..."

	"Heh..."  Drakshaa smirked.  "Nice going, idiot."

	"It's alright."  Rainbow glared in Drakshaa's direction.  "Really..."  She turned to look back at Keebroo.  "I've flown so far and for so long that—the way I see it—I'm always at home."

	"You are?"

	"Yeah.  So long as I'm with my friends."  She smirked.  "I bet you have a lot of ponies you'd call family just as much as your own flesh and blood."

	"Oh.  Totally.  And I would die for them too!"

	"Eh heh heh..."  Rainbow hovered low enough to pat the stallion on the shoulder.  "Let's just focus on you living for them, okay?"

	"Oh... yeah!  Sure!"

	"Good kid."

	Keebroo smirked.  "Though, I would have loved to see the place where you came from."

	"Oh?"

	"Sheesh... winged ponies..."  He shook his head with a smile.  "I bet I'd have to travel the whole world to see more of your kind."

	"Eh heh heh heh..."  Rainbow gulped and sweated slightly.  "We're a lot closer than you think..."



	The trek took the better part of four hours.  They stopped twice for a breather, waiting for Booster Spice to whip out his map and confirm the progress that they were making.  The whole time, Rainbow took several opportunities to study the faces of the stallions who made up the expedition.  Several of them looked emaciated, frazzled, and worn to the bone.  It was obvious that weeks of stress had taken their toll on the poor equines of Amulek.  In some haunting fashion, Rainbow was certain she had seen those expressions before.

	This only made Rainbow grow more and more anxious the higher they scaled the mountains' southern faces.  Though it was approaching daytime, the morning haze did not dissipate.  In fact, the fog grew tighter and tighter.  It became apparent that the higher they climbed, the more impenetrable the mists.  A cold chill hung in the air, making everypony shiver—including Roarke.

	Several times, Rainbow Dash flew low enough to keep a constant check on the metal mare.  For the first time in many an adventure, Roarke looked and acted as though she was completely out of her element.  Her energy appeared sapped, and her march was a clumsy and uneven shuffle.  The two spent most of the trek in silence, and it ate away at Rainbow's chest.

	Soon enough, the ground evened out.  The forest grew thinner, and if it weren't for the fog, Rainbow imagined she could look straight up and see an unhindered sky lingering above the continent.  Instead, a cold drizzle blanketed the expedition, not enough to soak them but just the right amount of precipitation to keep them constantly shivering and uncomfortable.  As the plateau stretched further and further, Rainbow Dash began to spot broken wagons and delapidated mining tools—the signs of much equipment abandoned in the heat of miners' panicked evacuation. 



	"Huh..."  Rainbow Dash fidgeted in mid-air.  "I've... n-never thought that hard about it that hard, really..."

	"Oh, but I spent all night calculating it!" Booster exclaimed.  "I mean, assuming you have the same bone density as a common pony, it is simply impossible for wings as small as yours to carry your body weight and proportion through the air!"

	"Huh..."

	"I mean... eheheheh..."  The blonde stallion adjusted his goggles.  "No offense."

	"None taken."  Rainbow smirked and pointed at her flapping wings.  "So, Einstallion, how do you explain this?"

	"I can't, really.  Though I'm willing to make an educated guess."

	"Like...?"

	"Magic!"

	"Unnnnngh..."  Rainbow rolled her eyes.

	"No, truly!"  Booster Spice smiled in mid-trot.  "If unicorns are born with a magical proficiency, then what's to say that other equines can't be?  Perhaps there is a permanent enchantment passed along the bloodline of you pterodactyls—"

	"Pegasi."

	"Excuse me—pegasi.  I speak of a hypothetical enchantment that allows your wings to carry multiple times the weight that they should!"

	"Hmmm..."  Rainbow flexed her forelimbs from where she hovered.  "You know, I've always secretly wondered why it is that we can walk on clouds."  She shrugged.  "Guess that's what I get for having dropped out of flight camp."

	"W-wait...!"  Booster gawked at her.  "You can walk on clouds?"

	"Can it, Nerd Spice," Drakshaa hissed.

	"Please, Drak—we're having a scientific discussion here—"

	"No!  For real!"  Drakshaa raised his hoof.  All of the stallions stopped in their tracks.  "...we're here."

	Josho jerked to a stop.  He levitated his shotgun while glancing left and right.

	Roarke's lenses pistoned outward as she scanned the misty treeline.

	Eagle bit his lip.  He peered ahead, then pointed straight forward.  "There..."

	"Right..." Drakshaa nodded and strolled ahead with a rattle to his cart.  As they stepped forward, they saw the remnants of a camp emerge through the mists.  Crumpled tents, buckled fencelines, and charred gates lingered on either side of them.  The charred remains of wooden shacks lay in blackened piles and embers.  "This is our last encampment.  We've built and rebuilt it four times straight.  The damn dragon always flies by to burn it to the ground once again."

	"If that's the case, then why do you always return here?" Roarked droned.  She turned to glare at the stallion.  "Why even show up today?"

	"Because she thinks we're coming back to build again," Drakshaa spat.  "That ain't the case!  Today..."  He unhitched himself from the cart and patted the pronged head of the javelin.  "...we've come to kill her good."

	"I see," Roarke said in a dull tone.  "Just like you killed our ship good.  Hmm?"

	Drakshaa shook his hoof.  "Now listen here, you toilet-eyed tool—!"

	"Give it a rest, Drakshaa," Booster sighed as he plopped down his backpack full of tools and began preparing a spot to load up the launcher.  "We're here to skewer scales, not each other."

	"Hrmmf..."  Drakshaa angrily went about unloading the cart with the help of other stallions.  "This was a whole hell of a lot easier without having to babysit for foreigners."

	"Now now... if Merigold were here, what would you say?"

	"Bite me."

	"Nnnnngh... Drakshaa, you're like the missing link, y'know that?"

	"Uhhhh..."  Eagle Eye glanced around at the wreckage.  "Just how large is this place?"

	"It was a pretty big encampment," Keebroo said.  "At least... mmm... the first time we built it."

	"Well, better get a lay of the land," Josho muttered.  "Would be a damn good thing to know what is up or down in this place in case we have to bump horns with a dragon anytime soon."  He trotted off into the mists.  "Hop along, princess."

	"Er... s-sure thing!"  Eagle galloped after him.

	"Don't go too far!" Roarke shouted.  "We don't know this place like these breeders do!"  She leaned back, exhaling.  Turning her head—she did a double-take at Rainbow's gaze.  "What?"

	Rainbow slowly smiled.  "It's almost as if you were genuinely concerned about them."

	"I... am genuinely concerned about them," Roarke droned.  She stared down at her hooves, fidgeting.  "Is that truly so hard to believe?"

	"Mmmm... no..."  Rainbow leaned down to nuzzle her.  "But I like it, all the same."

	Keebroo popped up between the two of them.  "Hey!  Want to see the mine shafts?"

	Rainbow winced, rolled her eyes, then put on a sweet smile.  "Sure thing, bud!  Just... uh..."  She glanced at Roarke, then back at him.  "...show the way!"



	Minutes later, Roarke and Rainbow tailed Keebroo to the northern edge of the encampment.  They could hear the stallions barking at one another while they set up the launcher, but they were too far away to be seen in the blinding mists.  While the trek was awkward and treacherous for the two mares, Keebroo obviously knew his way.  The young stallion darted left and right, skirting around abandoned wagons and collapsed structures.

	At last, the grass gave way to gravel and stone.  Mine-cart tracks appeared, leading down a dark, dark hole in the side of the mountain.

	"Aaaaaaaand... voila!"  Keebroo gestured down the shaft.  "There it be!  The best silver deposits in all the land!"

	"I... did not expect us to be able to get this close," Roarke said, her lenses whirring as she looked about fitfully.  "Surely the dragon—"

	"One time, she didn't show up for an entire day," Keebroo said.  "We thought that she was gone for good, but it turns out she was just biding her time.  We... uh..."  He ran a hoof through his mane, sighing.  "We nearly got an equipment hut rebuilt by the time she struck.  We tried running into the shaft for cover, but that's when she started spitting fire.  We were driven back.  For all our efforts, we still haven't been able to fully access the mine for weeks..."

	"I can't help but think that just being here is taunting her," Roarke said.

	"Well... uhm..."  Keebroo gulped.  "That's the whole point... y'know?  We gotta show that we're not afraid of her... th-that we can take her out!"  He blinked at the ponies with wide eyes.  "I mean... that's why you're here too, huh?  To help us?"

	"Hrmmm... more or less."  Roarke clenched her jaw.  "Still, I don't like this.  Everything's too quiet."

	"Like I said, sometime the dragon bides—"

	"It doesn't make sense... not from what I've learned about dragons and how territorial they can be," Roarke said.  "Why hasn't she attacked yet?"

	"I... I-I wish I could tell you."  Keebroo gulped.  "I thought you ponies had experience with dragons or something like that."

	"One of us does."  Roarke pivoted and glanced up.  "How about it, Rainbow?  Does any of this make sense to you?"  Her lenses retracted.  "... ... ... Rainbow?"

	Rainbow Dash hovered in place, shivering.  She stared down the mineshaft in a cold sweat.

	Roarke's lips pursed.  "Rainbow!"  She trotted up and lifted a hoof, giving Rainbow's tail a tug.  "Look at me!"

	At last, Rainbow wrenched her eyes from the shaft.  Sweat was collecting around her brow.

	Roarke asked in a quiet voice, "Is it happening again?  Are you—?"

	"No."  Rainbow shook her head.  "It's not that.  It's... something else..."

	"Like...?"

	Rainbow gritted her teeth as she stared down the shaft.  The symbol was as close as ever now, practically blinding with its light.  The longer she peered into the mine, the more she was certain the lines and circles would burn into her retinae.

	"It's here, Roarke..."

	"What is?  Yaerfaerda?"

	"It's.  Right.  Here."  Rainbow gulped.  "I can practically taste it, I'm so close."

	Roarke glanced down the shaft.  Her lenses pistoned outward to their full length.  "I don't see a thing."

	"Trust me, it's down there."

	"Uhm..."  Keebroo gulped.  "What is?"

	"Silence, breeder."  Roarke trotted closer to Rainbow.  "Rainbow, should... should we go down and investigate?"

	"No!  Not a good idea!" Keebroo stammered.  "If that dragon attacks and you're down there—"

	Roarke growled.  "Did you or did you not hear what I just said?"

	"Roarke..."

	Roarke looked at her.

	"This place..."  Rainbow swallowed a lump down her throat.  "This mist... it's all so dang familiar."

	"You couldn't possibly have been here before."

	"No, but I've still seen this sort of crud before."  Rainbow sighed heavily.  With a shudder, she turned towards Roarke.  "Listen, let's go find Josho and Eagle and then—"

	FWOOMB!  A ball of green flame erupted just above them, sending stone shards falling all around.

	"Gaaaaah!" Keebroo sprawled across the ground.

	"Luna Poop!" Rainbow shouted, eyes wide.  Not a second later, another ball of emerald flame came sailing through the mists, aiming for the mineshaft.

	"Rainbow—!"  Roarke dove high, slammed into Rainbow's side, and shoved the two of them to the ground.

	POW!  The mountainface exploded behind them, erupting in flames.

	"Guhhh..." Rainbow slowly sat up, disentangling herself from Roarke's limbs.  "Look, girl, was that really friggin' necessary?"

	"But..."  Roarke grimaced, standing up.  "...b-but the flame and its trajectory and you were in the way and—"

	"Stop being cute and help me the buck up!"

	"There's more incoming!"  Keebroo hollered.  In a panic, he turned and galloped towards the center of the encampment.  "Hey guys!  Guys!  She's here!  Load the javelin!"

	"No, wait!"  Rainbow's voice cracked as she stretched a hoof after him.  "Don't split up!  Don't—" She winced.  "Dang it!"

	"Breeders," Roarke spat.  She clenched her mouth silently as both mares heard loud shouts and explosions from the other side of the mists.  "Searo's Womb..."

	"It's go-time!"  Rainbow kipped up, flapped her wings, and broke into a swift glide.  "Come on!  I gotta get a visual!"

	"Don't fly so fast!" Roarke sputtered, galloping the long way around plumes of flame.  "I can't keep up!"

	"For the last time, I can carry you—"

	"Look out!"

	Rainbow looked up, gasped, and rolled to the side as another plume of green flame flew down.

	CRASSH!  The remnants of an abandoned shack exploded behind them.  Splinters rained down like wooden hail.

	"Guhhh... mmmf..."  Roarke gritted her teeth.  With a twist of her neck, she expanded the metal plates across her leg braces.  Armored up, she plowed through a debris field and galloped towards the sound of shouting stallions in a straight line.  "It certainly seems as though she wants to kill us!"

	"Let's just make sure that Josho and Eagle Eye are—"

	"Aaaack!"  Eagle Eye flew in from the side, his shield trailing with smoke as he skidded to a stop in the grass.  "Unnngh..."

	"EE!"  Rainbow darted down and stood at his side.  "EE, are you okay?"

	"Green flame..."  Eagle winced, shuddered.  He looked up at Rainbow.  "I thought this 'Axan' monster spat red flame."

	"Green...?"  Rainbow glanced across the mists.  She spotted flickering plumes of emerald heat.  Her ears folded back.  "Oh no..."

	"What?!"  Roarke hissed as Amulek ponies galloped to and fro behind her.  "What is it?!"

	"Josho?!"  Rainbow stood straight up. "Where's Josho?!"

	"Follow the gunshots," Eagle wheezed.

	"Huh?"

	As prophesied, shots rang out, echoing across the mists.

	Rainbow spun.  "I'm checking on him!  Stay here!"

	"Rainbow!" Roarke shouted.

	"Just do it!"

	"Don't go too far on your own!  Rainbow!" Roarke stood beside Eagle Eye, gritting her teeth in frustration.

	In the meantime, Rainbow soared over the heated battle.  Plumes of flame erupted to her left and right while stallions fled in terror.  She skimmed straight past Drakshaa and Booster Spice, who were frantically pivoting the freshly assembled ballista around.

	"Quick!  Raise it by forty-five degrees! She'll come from the northeast!  I know it!"

	"Less words and more muscle, geekstrings!"

	"Drakshaa, this is important!  If we don't get the right trajectory, then we won't have a chance in—"

	"Look, will you shut up and help me pivot the damn thing already!"

	"Make sure you hit a friggin' dragon this time!" Rainbow shouted as she flew past them.  Her ears rang with more gunshots as she threaded through the fog.  "Nrnnghh... Josho?!?"

	"Over here, speedy!"

	Rainbow followed the sound of his voice.  She spotted the obese stallion standing atop a delapidated wooden shack.  She landed nimbly beside him while he was reloading his smoking gun.

	"You really picked a cruddy place to stick your fat neck."

	"That's because it's a shithouse, Sherclop."  Josho pumped his shotgun, eyes high.  "I think I spotted it."

	"You did?!" Rainbow asked, breathless.

	"Yup.  Damn fast.  I can barely keep my eyes on it."

	"That... that's..."

	"How fast was Axan, huh?!"  Josho flung Rainbow a sweaty look.  "Ain't she big and leathery and lumbering?"

	"Pretty much, yeah."

	"Well..."  Josho gulped and glanced skyward again.  "I don't think this is her."

	"Josho, she's spitting green flame," Rainbow said.  "That's not like Axan either."

	"Yeah..."  Josho paled.  "But I do know who it is like."

	There was a dim green flash through the fog, followed by a shrill whistle.

	"Uhhh..."  Josho's pupils shrank.  The whistling grew louder and louder.

	"Darn it, jump!"  Rainbow plowed into Josho's side like a rampaging bull.
	
	"Ooomf!"  Both plunged off the outhouse's roof in the nick of time.  The wooden shack exploded in a green burst of flame.

	"Guh!  Augh!"  Rainbow rolled to the side along with Josho.  She winced, pushing herself up on noodle-weak limbs.  "Nnnngh... can I go for a single month without explosions?"

	"I've got a better question!"  Josho wheezed, sitting up with the help of his rifle's butt.  "Can't you do one of them sonic sky farts and clear up this damn mist?"

	"Sorry, but no-go."

	"Why in Ledo's coinpurse not?!"

	"Considering that the last sonic rainboom I did in Durandana nearly killed me, this isn't exactly a good time," Rainbow wheezed.  "Besides, this isn't exactly normal 'mist.'"

	"Oh yeah?"

	"No.  As a matter of fact, I think it's—"  As Rainbow spoke, something rolled out of the fresh crater that the last dragon breath had made.  The pegasus found herself blinking at a craggy rock still trailing with emerald smoke.  "Uhhhm..."

	"What... in the buck...?"  Josho stammered.

	"Josho, are you seeing what I see?"

	"You mean the oversized charcoal gallstone right in front of us?"

	"Yeah..."  Rainbow glanced at teh smoldering crater.  "That's what was just launched at us, wasn't it?"

	"Pretty dayum sure."  Josho looked aside at Rainbow.  "Since when did dragons spit rock loogeys."

	"They don't," Rainbow said.  "At least none of the ones I've ever seen."

	"Rainbow, what the Hell is going on around here?"

	"I don't know.  But, from the sound of things, the battle isn't going very well—"

	"There!  There she is!" Booster's voice hollered through the mists.  "She's flying in low!  Take her out, Drakshaa!"

	Josho spun.  His breath left him.  "Rainbow—"

	Rainbow turned.  Her blood instantly ran cold.

	The mists parted for a brief moment, granting the ponies a clear view of a dark shape slicing down through the mountain fog.  The first noticeable thing was a series of jagged branches slicing through the air.  But they weren't trees and they weren't brambles.  A loud shriek pierced the air—a hauntingly familiar banshee cry—and the creature thrashed its antlers about before opening twin jaws, glowing with an aquamarine heat from deep within.  A pair of tails raked left and right, adding weight to the draconian menace's heavy dive.

	"Nevlamas..."  Rainbow's ears folded back as her face paled.  A twinge of yellow flickered across her eyes.  "Celestia above, it can't be.  How... h-how..."

	Josho was shouting something.  Rainbow couldn't hear him through the pulse pounding in her ears.

	The dragon's wings brought a howl to the air.  With a ferocious growl, the chaotic monster dove even lower, spitting bright green fireballs.

	Josho telekinetically yanked Rainbow to the ground as the former encampment exploded around them.  Bursts of fire lit the mists up with a necrotic green hue.

	The creature surged overhead.  It passed by far faster than Rainbow could have guessed.

	"Dammit!"  Josho stood back up.  "Can't get a clear shot!"

	"She's too fast..."  Rainbow stood up, panting.  "And small."

	"Huh?!"  Josho flashed her a sweaty look.

	Rainbow was shivering.  "And her breath isn't the same color as her inner shell."  Rainbow nevertheless stared at the mutated dragon as it flew off on a bending course.  "It... it's not her..."

	"What?!"  Josho cackled.  "You... you mean..."  He turned to gawk at the rampaging creature.  "You mean to friggin' tell me that there are two mutated chaos dragons on this goddess-forsaken plane?!"

	"I don't know..."

	"There's another Divine with two mouths and antlers and—?!"

	"I don't know, Josho.  Dang it!  I don't know!"  Rainbow shouted.  "Maybe Nevlamas hatched babies or something!  I just don't friggin' know!"  She began hyperventilating.

	"This is bad... this is very, very bad."  Josho peered over the sight of his shotgun.  "If that monster that Chrysalis and the Xonans used to wreck Seclorum's camp had a dayum brood, then we're all doomed."  He grunted to himself.  "Rainbow, we gotta find the others."  Silence, save for the distant shouts of stallions.  "Rainbow?"  He turned and gasped.

	Rainbow had collapsed to the ground, overcome with shivers.

	"Oh, for Pete's sake... Rainbow!"  Josho ran to her side and shook her.  "Stay with the program, Speedy!  We need you!  Nopony's faced Nevlamas like you have!  Stay with me!"

	"I... I-I can't..."  Rainbow wheezed, her pupils turning blood red.  She whimped and clutched her rattling pendant.  "The chaos... it's... I-I can taste it..."

	"I got a fix!" Booster Spice shouted.  "It's now or never, Drakshaa!"

	"It's... it's not going to work!" Rainbow hissed.  Her eyes flickered again and again.  "Tell them!  She's too strong!  Her brood..."

	Josho spun and hollered.  "Guys!  Save your javelin!  We gotta get out of here!  This is beyond us!"

	"Shut up!" Drakshaa hollered back.  "We're ending this!  Here and now!"

	"Come on, ya idiot silver hicks!" Josho snarled.  "Learn from the experts!  We can't beat this thing!  We gotta—"

	"Fire!" Booster shouted.

	"Josho—!"

	"Rainbow, keep your head down!"

	A black iron barb flew low overhead.  The air howled.  Rainbow tossed her head aside, squinting.

	With her last thread of vision, she caught the javelin slicing through the air.  It met the antler'd dragon head-on.  But then something else happened, something foggier than the mists surrounding them.  Rainbow wasn't certain, but for a brief blink it appeared as though the creature split into two—completely dodging the projectile altogether.  Where the two halves went, she couldn't see, for all was turning into darkness.

	Rainbow wept quietly into the dizzy beyond, and was out like a light.
		//------------------------------//
		// Right Down to the Wire		//------------------------------//

	"Mmmmff... grnnngh..."  Rainbow Dash stirred and stirred, clutching her fuzzy muzzle with a pair of shivering hooves.  "Nnngh... n-no... no... she's gone... I saw her... I-I watched her die..."  She gnashed her teeth and turned over in the grass, wincing.  "Axan, you took her... you took her body away... and her soul..."

	"Rainbow..."

	"Why d-didn't you tell me that there was more to it?" Rainbow hissed.  "I helped slay her.  Do I have to slay her hatchlings as well?"

	"Rainbow, there's nothing left to slay."  A brown hoof caressed Rainbow's cheek.  "The dragon's gone."

	Rainbow's eyes flashed opened.  There was a red-on-yellow flash, and then they glistened normally.  She tried sitting up, only to succumb to a wave of dizziness.  "Unnngh—"

	Roarke steadied the mare, squatting at her side.  Behind her, the ponies of Amulek stumbled through the mists, collecting in a weary pile of bruised bodies beside the smoldering remains of their wrecked ballista.

	"The attack is over," Roarke droned.  "The dragon left as soon as we fled the camp site."

	"We... we..."  Rainbow gulped, her brow awash with perspiration.  "We fled?"

	"Wasn't much else to do, Speedy," Josho said, lumbering into view with his shotgun.  He glanced off at the melancholic stallions standing between the trees.  "That thing moved faster than any battleship or managlider I've ever run into.  Even I couldn't get a good hit on the damn thing.  As for the silver hicks, well..."

	"Their pathetic javelin didn't stand a chance," Roarke said.  "They tried salvaging it, but the dragon pursued us and turned it into embers."

	"Was..."  Rainbow gulped.  "...was anypony hurt?"

	"Only you, Rainbow."  Eagle Eye stepped up, looking frazzled and exhausted.  "And, well, maybe a few of us got banged up, but there were no major casualties."  A weak smile.  "We all got out safe."

	Rainbow winced.  "That... that doesn't make any sense..."

	Eagle Eye blinked.  "What, do you want one of us to die?"

	"No no no... it's just..."  Rainbow grimaced.  "It's not like Nevlamas to—"

	"Nevlamas?" Roarke throated.  Her lenses instantly retracted.  "As in the chaos dragon?"

	"It was totally her," Rainbow said.  She instantly winced.  "I mean... it looked like her.  But... but..."

	Roarke sighed out her nostrils.  "Rainbow, I think your dizzy spell is still playing games with your head."

	"No, I saw her too," Josho droned.  "Damned if it didn't look like Nevlamas, straight down to the twin mouths, mutant tails, and the bright fruity colors burnin' out of her scales."

	"Impossible," Roarke grunted.  "That creature died on the battlefield of Xona."

	"Wait..."  Eagle Eye squeaked, instantly shivering.  "Could it be—like—related to Nevlamas?  Like another Divine?"

	"Highly unlikely," Roarke said.

	Eagle's pupils shrank.  "Or... a brood?"

	"Why is everypony so insistent on suffering from their own imaginations?" Roarke snarled.  "Whatever attacked us was not Nevlamas!"

	"Roarke..."

	"We're dealing with something dastardly and cunning—true—but it is not—"

	"Roarke"  Rainbow stared at her.  "I know what I saw."  She gulped.  "But I just don't understand it.  Even still, I'm pretty sure it's here for a reason... just like I am..."

	Roarke bit her lip.

	"Is the symbol still here?" Eagle Eye asked.  "Yogibeara or whatever?"

	"Yes, EE, I can still see Yaerfaerda," Rainbow said.  "It was down in those mines as we approached the thick of the mist."

	"I... g-guess there's no going back there now," Eagle Eye said.  "Not with that dragon playing sentry."

	"There has to be a connection!" Rainbow wheezed, struggling to get up.  Josho held her in place.  "Guh... Why would something like Nevlamas show up in the exact same place where a glowing symbol is leading me?"

	"What the hell?!"  Drakshaa grumbled as he trotted up.  "Did I hear some bullcrap about you ponies wanting to go back there?!"

	Roarke turned.  "We wish to understand something that's just transpired.  That dragon ironically resembles something that we've all previously—"

	"Look, I don't wanna hear it!"  Drakshaa slammed a hoof down.  "It's over!  Finished!  That was our last chance and we all blew it!  And you blew it too!"

	"Excuse me?!" Eagle Eye squeaked, glaring.

	"You heard me!"  Drakshaa snarled.  "That dayum drake must have smelled its brothers and sisters on you!  How else could it have had the drop on us like it did?!"

	"Drakshaa, Drakshaa, Drakshaa..."  Booster Spice sighed as he trotted up from a distance.  He raised his goggles and stared tiredly at his surly companion.  "She's always had the drop on us.  Having our friends here didn't change anything whatsoever—"

	"Friends?!  More like distractions!"  Drakshaa shoved his hoof into Booster's chest.  "I told you we should have gone up there by ourselves!  I said it to Merigold before we even disembarked!"

	"Drakshaa, please, we all know you're upset about the campsite—"

	"Upset doesn't even begin to friggin' describe it, ya moron!"  Drakshaa hollered.  "Nice job watching over the launcher, Bullshit Spice!  Thanks to you, we're defenseless now to the thing's attacks!  How are we even going to defend Amulek if the thing comes diving down again?!"

	"Drakshaa..."  Keebroo trotted up, wincing.  "You're not making this any easier..."

	"None of you seem to get it!"  Drakshaa yelled.  "It's over!  Everything we've lived for!  Everything we've fought for!  Everything our parents and grand parents, and great-great-great grandparents sweated over is now ruined!"

	"We're all alive, Drakshaa!" Booster gestured at everypony.  "Isn't that enough?!"

	"Amulek's legacy will live on," Keebroo said.  He gulped.  "But... but Amulek itself?"

	Drakshaa stared back at the stallions, his coat paling under a cold sweat.

	"Face it..."  Keebroo sighed out his nostrils.  "We should have done what our families did months ago when this all started."  He took a deep breath.  "We should have left to start a new life elsewhere."

	"We fought a good fight, Drakshaa," Booster said.  "But this is beyond us."  A sad expression.  "It always was."

	Drakshaa blinked at the group.  Slowly, his muscles tensed, and he produced an iron frown.

	"Drakshaa, please, before you blow your stovetop—"

	"Grnngh!"  Drakshaa shoved his way past Booster and stormed downhill through the forest.

	"Drakshaa!  Come onnnn!  Don't return home on your own—"

	"I can and I will!" the stallion hollered up through the mists.  "It's my home, after all!  Even if I'm the only dayum pony in these mountains that still believes it!"

	Keebroo winced while Booster Spice hung his head.  The rest of the stallions around them milled about in mellow silence.

	Eagle Eye bit his lip, glancing nervously at the others.

	Roarke sighed.  "We should return to the Jury.  For better or for worse, our work here is done."

	Rainbow grimaced.  "But... b-but..."

	"For once, I'm with cyborg tits," Josho said.  "Come on, Rainbow..."  He hoisted the mare over his backside.  "You'll wanna save your strength for the return."



	For the next few hours, Rainbow draped weakly over Josho's back.  Her skull still swam with dizziness, and it only got worse whenever she lifted her head.  So, instead, she peered from side to side with weary eyes, glancing at the bodies in the mist.

	The ponies of Amulek trudged home in somber silence.  To Rainbow, they looked like ghosts, ethereal shadows of the equines they once were.  Their slumping figures would have blended with the dark tree trunks if only they weren't continuing their funeral dirge downhill.

	Gulping, Rainbow glanced towards the other side of Josho.

	She spotted Roarke and Eagle Eye.  Eagle's hooves moved quicker than the others, as if he was in a panicked rush to get home.  His head was constantly lifted and he carried an anxious expression on his face.

	Rainbow's eyes fell on Roarke.  Not long after, the metal mare looked back.  Her lenses glistened with a hint of a sunset piercing the fog above.  As their expressions lingered on one another, she eventually bore the barest hint of a smile.

	Rainbow tried grinning back, but she felt a cold shiver run through her body.  Instead, she buried her face in Josho's shoulders, inhaling and exhaling slowly in order to fight off the weightless sensation spiraling through her petite form.



	Merigold took a sad, sad breath.  She lifted her wrinkly muzzle before the fire.  "I know that you tried your best.  And, all things considered, the expedition was doomed from the start, as have been all the ones to transpire before it."

	"Please, Governess," Pilate spoke from across the town hall.  "You mustn't give up hope!  There must be a way to contact ponies from beyond this territory!  Surely they would help you defeat this dragon!"

	"The only ponies capable of helping us are the Val Roans," Merigold said.  "But—for as strong and wealthy as they are—the Val Roans have an impeccable habit for looking after themselves.  If it weren't for the Green Bandits, the kingdom would remain completely isolationist."

	"Besides, we have nothing to offer them now in return," Booster Spice muttered from a few huddled families away.  He slowly twirled his neon green goggles around in a lethargic pair of hooves.  "Our silver deposits are completely unreachable.  Even if the dragon was defeated tomorrow, we'd need months to get back on schedule."

	"Not like we have the workforce to even tackle that with anymore," Keebroo added.

	Bellesmith stood up.  "But, surely if they understood the urgency of the situation, they would intervene!  Don't they care enough about trading for silver?"

	"They have several other townships to do that with," Keebroo said.  "And, odds are, they've already struck new trade agreements with them."  He gulped and said in a shuddering tone, "Drakshaa was right.  It's over.  Everything we've built... everything our ancestors have toiled for..."

	The thick groups of ponies shuddered.  A few of them wept quietly into the torchlight.

	"Uhm..."  Rainbow Dash winced as she sat up against Roarke.  "Did Drakshaa ever make it back?  The last time we saw him—"

	"Fear not," Merigold said.  "The stallion returned.  He's off sulking in what's left of his supply house."  She gazed compassionately at the Jurists gathered before her.  "I know his attitude must sound absolutely caustic, but he's invested a lot more of his life into those mines than the rest of us.  The same can be said of his fathers and his fathers' fathers.  But, give it time.  He will come around to understand the great blessing we all have today."

	"Blessing?" Pilate raised an eyebrow.  "After all that's happened?"

	"What kind of blessing?" Bellesmith asked.

	Merigold bore a bittersweet smile.  "Our lives.  More than anything, I've wanted the ponies of Amulek to prosper.  That may no longer be possible here, but it can be possible elsewhere."

	"But..."  Rainbow grimaced.  "To leave your homes?  To leave all that's special to you...?"

	Merigold tilted her head aside.  "You're a traveler from a great distance."  She glanced at her wings, then directly at Rainbow again.  "Surely you know what it's like to live beyond your own home."

	Rainbow bit her lip.

	With a deep breath, Merigold said.  "My children have a lot to learn.  It will be a difficult future—but a wholesome one.  For that, I must have faith... for surely I will not live to see it."  She swallowed.  "Thank you, my friends, for your compassion and integrity.  We'll be sure to have your vessel completely repaired by tomorrow afternoon."

	"And..."  Bellesmith leaned forward.  "And after that, Governess?"

	"After that... we deliberate on the future of Amulek's children," Merigold solemnly said.  "This 'chaos dragon' of which you speak may have consumed our mountain, but she hasn't consumed our hearts.  There will be a future for us.  It simply won't be here."

	A cold hush fell among the group.

	"This..."  Rainbow hissed.  "This c-can't be happening!" She teetered dizzily.  "There's g-gotta be a way for these guys!  We can't just—"

	"Rainbow, we can," Roarke said.  "And we will."

	Rainbow gave her a nervous glance.  "Huh?"

	Bellesmith and Pilate stood up.  "Let's go, everypony," the mare said in a sad tone.  "There's nothing that can be done here anymore."

	Rainbow gawked at them.  She almost gasped in shock as Roarke lifted her up and helped her towards the town hall's exit.  Worriedly, the pegasus glanced over her shoulder.  The image of a chamber full of sad, weeping families burned into her retinae, making as deep a mark as the glowing symbol along the edge of her vision.



	"I can't friggin' believe you guys!"  Rainbow trotted in a fierce circle, having summoned enough strength to march on her own four hooves.  "We're the Celestia-dang Noble Jury!  We've taken on battleships, zombies, and mother-fluffing foxes!"  She stomped her hooves and glared across the mess hall's lounge.  "And suddenly you're all saying that there's nothing to be done anymore?!"

	"Rainbow, Pilate and I weren't there for what happened on the mountain," Belle calmly said.  "But Josho and EE told us all about it."

	"I was this close to butting heads with whatever was plaguing the miners of Amulek, Ding-Dong!"  Rainbow's voice cracked.  "I can still figure out what's happening here!  There's no reason for us to back out now!"

	"Rainbow, these aren't the Durandanans," Belle said.  "They don't know what we're dealing with.  And even if we did, this... this creature is still somehow faster and more cunning than Nevlamas!"

	"But—"

	"And what if there is a brood here?!" Belle exclaimed.  "What if there were dozens if not hundreds of brothers and sisters just like the thing you saw on the mountainside?!"

	"Then that's bad news friggin' bears for every dayum pony who lives on this stinkin' continent!" Rainbow cackled.  "Belle, we've tackled something like this before!  I have tackled something like this before!  We're the right ponies in the right place to make sure this doesn't blow up into something apocalyptic!"

	"Rainbow—"

	"Don't we owe it to the ponies of Alafreo and Val Roa and beyond to—"

	"To do what, Rainbow?" Pilate's metal brow furrowed.  "What if there is a brood?  What do you intend to do with them?"

	"I... it... well..."  Rainbow grimaced.  "I don't know.  Sick Axan on them or something!"

	"And when has Axan proven to be reliable in any situation whatsoever?"  The zebra's ears twitched.  "No matter how the situation looks, it still falls down to one pony—you versus them.  And what would the plan be?  To destroy the roost and every chaos dragon in it?"

	Rainbow frowned.  "If I have to, I will..."

	"Seriously, Rainbow?"  Pilate gnashed his teeth.  "Do you even hear yourself?  Pests or not, the dragons contain at least an ounce of sentience—"

	"Pilate, maybe you couldn't see Nevlamas and the sort of crap that she did under the reins of Chrysalis, but everything about her was monsterous and horrible—"

	"And so that excuses genocide?!"

	"Pfft!  Who said anything about—?"

	"Even if it means saving the future of a tiny village full of ponies, I don't see how you could possibly pen such a thing on Harmony!"  Pilate frowned.  "Is that the kind of pony the Princesses would be proud of?  That you'd wish Durandanans to emulate?!"

	"Look, I appreciate that you want me to do the right thing!"  Rainbow pointed at herself.  "I want to do the right thing!  But I think we're all forgetting one important factor here!"  She gestured wildly.  "There's that friggin' symbol waiting for me deep in the mines!"

	"Nnnngh..."  Bellesmith hunched over in her seat.  "Rainbow, I don't want to hear it..."

	"There's something going on here, guys!" Rainbow stammered.  "Where there's a symbol, there's a machine world!  And where there's a machine world, there's a goal for Austraeoh and—"

	"I said I don't want to hear it!" Bele suddenly screamed.  She stood up, shivering in anger.  "No more of this Austraeoh and Yaerfaerda business!"

	Rainbow's muzzle fell agape.  "Belle...?"

	"Rainbow, you are dying!" the mare hollered.  "Look at yourself right now!  You're pr-practically—"  Belle's voice shrank into the back of her throat.  She held a hoof over her muzzle and trembled.

	Rainbow stared at her in shock.

	Belle sniffled, her eyes instantly welling up in tears.  She gulped and whimpered, "You're dying, Rainbow Dash.  Nevlamas didn't do this to you.  Ledomare and Xona didn't do this to you.  All of this Austraeoh nonsense did!  For so long, I've done all I could to support you with this in good faith but... but..."  Her face scrunched up in sorrow.  "I'm losing my best friend because of it."  She sniffled and wiped her muzzle.  "The best... most loyal... m-most courageous friend I've ever had, and what am I expected to do?  Just let you waltz right into the jaws of horror and let yourself become even worse off than Commander Hurricane?!"

	"Bellesmith..."  Rainbow gazed at her.  She murmured, "You're Eljunbyro.  You both are."  She gulped.  "Can't you trust me in this?"

	"I c-can do more than that, Rainbow.  I have done more than that."  She stared at Rainbow with tear-stained eyes.  "I love you, Rainbow Dash.  My beloved and I owe you so much... but not as much as you owe yourself."  She gnashed her teeth.  "And I can't stand idly by and watch you unravel from the inside out!"

	"But, everything I've ever learned from my journey has told me I'm destined for—"

	"I know you need to believe in all this 'prophecy' business.  But Rainbow Dash..."  Belle gazed at her intently.  "Being 'Austraeoh' has been a crutch!  Your crutch!  Legitimate or not, it's been a definitive factor in your flight all this time.  And if I were you, I'd cling to it too.  Especially if I lost my home... my way of life... and all m-my friends... but..."  She clutched a hoof over her muzzle and whimpered.

	Pilate stood up and leaned into Belle, nuzzling her gently.

	Belle fought the urge to weep, instead stammering, "You have friends here too, Rainbow Dash.  And we love you.  We love you so much.  Too much to deny the truth any longer... and that truth is that your journey is at its end!"  Belle hyperventilated slightly.  She steeled herself long enough to say, "I hate to say it, Rainbow, but it is.  And you don't deserve to end it all in the jaws of a million chaos dragons.  Please... stay with us..."

	"Belle—"

	"For once in your life, Rainbow Dash, can't you live for yourself?  Can't you be at peace with the ones who love you?  Don't you deserve this?  Don't you deserve a quiet, happy end?"

	Rainbow's gaze fell.  She winced at each punctuation of Belle's sobs.  At last, she opened her mouth to speak—

	"I, for one..." Roarke trotted into view.  "...believe whole heartedly in Belle's kind-hearted words."

	Rainbow did a double-take.  "You do?!"

	"Thank you, Roarke."  Belle sniffled.  "I'm glad that somepony is thinking with her head."

	"I can think with my heart as well."  Roarke turned towards Rainbow.  "I've learned that much as of late."

	Rainbow blinked.  "Roarke...?"

	"I'm sorry..."  Belle shivered.  "Rainbow Dash, forgive me.  I just... I just don't want—"

	"I suggest you retire for the evening," Roarke said.  "I suggest we all do.  Tomorrow afternoon, once repairs are done, we'll set course for calmer winds."  The metal mare solemnly hung her head.  "What's done is done in this town..."

	"Wait..."  Rainbow squeaked, wincing.  "Wait just a Celestia-dang—"

	"Thank you, Roarke," Pilate said, gently guiding Belle down the hall and towards their quarters.  "It's been a long, tiring day.  I think we all deserve to rest for the time being."

	"I couldn't agree more, striped one," Roarke said.

	Slowly, the couple trotted off.  There was the squeaky sound of a door opening and closing, followed by the hatch rotating shut.

	Roarke turned towards Rainbow, gazing at her quietly.

	Rainbow stared back.  She blinked, frowned, then fumed.

	"Rainbow, if you may just let me—"

	"Hrnnngh!"  Rainbow flapped her wings and glided angrily down the hallway.



	Seconds later, Rainbow entered the observation room on the lower deck.  She marched up to the windows, plopped down on her haunches, and folded her forelimbs.  Beyond the translucent sheen of her angry reflection, she gazed out onto the sleepy, rain-soaked rooftops of Amulek.

	Not long after, the reflection of Roarke appeared, trotting through the hanging curtain behind them both.  She cleared her throat and opened her mouth to speak.

	"You happy now?!" Rainbow growled.

	Roarke stood in place, silent.

	"Grnnnngh..."  Rainbow spun and frowned at her.  "Is this how I'm supposed to die?!  Grounded in my room?!  With my two best friends sobbing their eyes out as they turn their backs on me?!"  She pointed.  "After all the obstacles I've overcome to show them I'm better than all that?!"

	Roarke sighed, hanging her head.

	"Oh, don't try begging for pity!"  Rainbow barked.  "I don't care how much you've melted!  You ain't there yet, girl!  Of all the ponies, I'd at least expect you to have my back in this situation!"  Rainbow pointed out the windows and hollered. "There's something out there with my friggin' name on it!  And I'll be damned if I let death take me as a coward—"

	"The Whizzball can sit three ponies," Roarke said.

	Rainbow froze in place, blinking.  "...buh?"

	Roarke sighed again, raising her head.  "I speak, of course, of the Lounge vessel that I inherited back when I was masquerading as 'Vaughan—'"

	"Yeah, I get it."  Rainbow squinted.  "But where exactly are you going with this?"

	"We are going back to the mountain," Roarke said.  "And Whizzball is the best solution.  The spherical vessel is fast enough, manueverable enough, and tenacious enough to keep up with the likes of the dragon we spotted alongside Drakshaa's group."

	Rainbow gawked at her.  "It... that..."  She murmured, "You were on my side all along."

	"Hrmmf..."  Roarke trotted forward quietly.  "Belle and Pilate are no less 'on your side' than I am.  Only one difference."  Her lenses pistoned outward.  "They don't know what it takes to make a dying pony's wingtips curl."

	Rainbow blinked.  A blush fell through her features.

	"There is more than one way to love a pony," Roarke said.  "And more than one way to show one's trust."  Her teeth clenched.  "I do not enjoy the thought of you perishing any more than 'Eljunbyro' does, but I like to think that I'm properly geared to balance inevitability with fear, and I find neither of them intimidating.  What's more, I know that you don't either."

	Rainbow's ears folded back as a dumb smile spread over her muzzle.

	"So, then..."  Roarke cocked her head to the side.  "Whizzball...?"

	Rainbow smirked and nodded.  "...Whizzball."



	The hatch to the hangar bay opened.  Roarke and Rainbow Dash marched hurriedly through.

	"Tell me one thing, though," Rainbow Dash said.

	"Elaborate."  Roarke flicked a forelimb.  A beacon flashed on her metal braces, and the doors to the black sphere opened by remote.

	"Earlier, you made a point to say that 'Whizzball can sit three ponies.'"

	"Indeed I did," Roarke remarked, climbing inside.

	Rainbow stuck her head in through the other side.  "But we're only two."

	"Right." Roarke flipped several controls as the miniature manaship hummed to life.  "And neither of us properly know how to approach the mountain."

	"You kidding?"  Rainbow raised an eyebrow.  "Do you forget who's got a built-in symbol-radar in her bird brain?"

	"It's not that simple and you know it," Roarke droned as he gripped the controls.  She gestured towards a lever on the hangar wall.  "We need somepony to help us."

	"Oh yeah?"  Rainbow trotted over and gripped the lever.  "Like who?"

	"Somepony with an expert, technical lay of the land."

	"You don't say?"  Rainbow smirked.  "Roarke, call me Slowpegasus, I'm starting to believe that you and I think alike."

	"Searo forbid."

	"Pfft.  Why not?  We both squeak alike."  Rainbow jerked the lever and the hangar bay doors opened.



	Booster Spice sat at his lofty post atop a guard tower overlooking the rooftops of Amulek.  Crickets chirped all around as tiny droplets of rain ricocheted off the structure's wooden finish.

	He stifled a yawn and flipped through a book.  He trained a pair of glowing goggles onto the pages as his eyes ran across the numbers and figures.

	"It begs the question," the blonde stallion murmured to himself.  "Can a village build an airship out of recycled lumber and squirrel leather?"

	SMASH!  The whole tower shook as a big black ball rammed into its side.

	"Gaaaaaaiee!"  Booster fell off his stool.  He hopped back up, raising a club over his head.  "Who?!  What?!  When?!  Where?!  Why?!  To what extent?!"

	Hissssssss!  The night sliced open in the shape of a door, opening to a tiny brightly-lit interior where two mares huddled inside a cockpit.

	"Holy algorithms..."  Booster lowered his club and adjusted his goggles.  "Roarkbow?  Doarke?"

	"Hrmmm..."  Roarke's nostrils flared as she gripped the controls.  "Close enough."

	"Yo yo, Stephen Haykings!"  Rainbow peered her colorful head out.  "You doing anything at the moment?"

	"Uhhhh..."  Booster gulped.  "Besides acting as sole guardspony to a dying town in the shadow of a dragon one week or two before everyone's inevitable exodus?"

	"Pfft!  Buck that noise!  Hop on board!"

	"And do what, exactly?"

	Rainbow grinned wide, her teeth glistening in the starlight.  "A midnight science experiment!"

	Booster blinked.  He smiled rosily.  "Fascinating..."

	"Yup!"  Rainbow grabbed his forelimb.  "Bring your brain along with your gerunds, smart guy!"

	"Ackies!" he yelped as he was yanked on board.

	"And hold on!"  Rainbow shouted above the roar of mana engines as Roarke lifted the sphere back into the sky.  "It's gonna be a bumpy ride!"
		//------------------------------//
		// A Trip to Thunder Mountain		//------------------------------//

	"Is something wrong, Belle?" Eagle Eye asked.

	"Mrmmmf... yes..." Belle tiredly trotted past the stallion in the navigation and approached the hanging curtain to the observation room.  "Me."

	"What do you mean?"  He trotted after her, looking concerned.

	"Last night, I..."  She sighed.  "I sort of blew up at Rainbow Dash."

	"Blew up at her?"

	"I've been so upset over her health as of late."  She gulped.  "I-I let it get the better of me."

	"Belle..." Eagle Eye smiled.  "We're all concerned about Rainbow Dash.  She would understand that—"

	"It's still no excuse to take it out on her," Belle said with a shudder.  "Just because I want what's best for her doesn't mean I do."  She clenched her teeth.  "She needs us to support her in whatever she's doing more than we need her to make us feel better.  It's tough to do when you know deep down inside that you'll always be ten times weaker than the likes of her, even when she's at her worst."

	"You gotta admit," Eagle said.  "Rainbow Dash is her own worst enemy.  Whether it's Amulek or Val Roa, Rainbow Dash is the kind of mare to gladly destroy herself over what she considers right."

	"I know, but..."  Belle fought tears.  "Who are we to stop that?"  She gulped.  "Even if that's what we want to do?"

	Eagle Eye fumbled for words.

	Belle sighed.  "I-I don't know what to do anymore, Eagle Eye.  Except for one thing... apologize."  She pivoted towards the observation room.  "Ahem..."  She raised a hoof and knocked against the doorframe.  "Erm... Rainbow?" She gulped.  "Rainbow Dash?  It's me... Bellesmith.  I hope I'm not waking you.  I... I-I just wanted to tell you how terribly sorry I am for last night.  Pilate and I had a long talk about it.  Neither of us may be very fond of the way in which you've been overexerting yourself as of late, but that's no excuse for us to snap at you like the way we did.  You were right, Rainbow.  We're Eljunbyro.  We should have the utmost faith in you at all times.  And we do, Rainbow Dash!  It's just... it's just so hard when we know that you've got so little left to give and... and..."  She fought back the urge to cry.  "We love you so very much, Rainbow.  We wish things could be better for you at this point in your journey, Austraeoh or not.  Would you have it in your heart to forgive me?  To forgive us?"

	Silence.

	Eagle Eye fidgeted awkwardly.

	Belle blinked.  "Erm... Rainbow?"

	More silence.

	Belle glanced back at Eagle Eye.

	Eagle Eye shrugged.

	Pensively, Belle pulled the curtain aside.  "Rainbow Dash—?"

	Her body froze in place.

	In the golden glow of morning, every square inch of the observation room was exposed, and there was not a single hint of blue fuzz to be seen.

	"Uhhhhhhhhh..."  Eagle Eye stammered.

	"She's not here!"  Belle stood with her muzzle agape.  "But where... h-how...?"

	"Whizzball," said Props.

	Both ponies jumped—startled—and gawked at her.

	"Huh?!" Belle blinked.

	Props took another bite of an apple, gulped it down, and said, "Sometime last night.  She and Roarke.  Together."  She smiled.  "Ebony's serving breakfast upstairs!  Wanna chow down?"

	"Props..."  Eagle Eye squinted.  "How do you know this?"

	The mare shrugged.  "Sometimes I sleepwalk."  She leaned in and whispered, "Did you know that Zaid snores like a sawmill?"

	Eagle and Belle simply stared at her.

	"Well, I didn't either!"  Props leaned back.  "The night is a strange and wild place.  Woooooooooooo!"  A beat.  She grinned wide.  "Anyhow, Apples!  Mrmmmmfff... upstairs!"  She trotted off.

	Eagle Eye bit his lip.  He slowly turned and squinted at Belle.

	Belle clenched her teeth.  Her body began shaking furiously as her face turned red.  "Why... th-that... fuzzheaded suicidal motherb—"



	SWOOOOSH!  The Lounge sphere rocketed loudly over the forested mountainscape.  Fir trees hung in the white mists below while the morning sun pierced the upper altitudes with scattered bands of golden glory.

	The vessel dipped low, skimming the forest canopy at a brisk speed.  Every now and then, its amber manalight would flicker, and the sphere would dart off in a completely random trajectory, scanning the local topography as an early morning bloomed over the eerie fog.



	Inside the transport, Booster Spice sat behind the main seat—wide eyed—glancing every which way as the vessel continued its low flight.

	"I just can't get over this feeling of exhilaration!" the blonde stallion exclaimed.  A dumb smile crept across his face.  "I've drawn hundreds of maps of this region over the years, but if I only had the gift of flight before!"

	"We've been over this a dozen times already," Roarke droned, her hooves at the controls.  "You're certain that you do know our way around these mountains?"

	"Hmmm?  Oh, totally!"  Booster nodded, his goggles rattling.  "Those towards the west are the lower foothills.  That peak in the east is Silver Point, the highest spot in this area.  Drakshaa's mine camp is directly to the south—whichhhh we are flying over right now."

	"For the twentieth time," Roarke groaned.

	"Well, no offense, but you've not been entirely clear on just what it is you wish for us to accomplish out here," Booster remarked.

	"We're attempting to bait the dragon."

	"Right.  And I've told you fine ladies..."  Booster chuckled to himself.  "She only attacks when she wishes to.  It's never been something that we could rightly predict."

	"Well, you've never had air support before."

	"I've never suspected that such a thing would matter."  Booster pointed out the cockpit window as they passed over the foggy mountain again.  "The only thing that's ever truly prompted her arrival is when we've set out on hoof to the campsite.  Y'know... like what happened yesterday!"

	"Because the dragon is presumably possessive over the silver mines..."

	"Exactly.  So... uhm..."  He gulped.  "If—perchance—we were to touch down and approach the mine entrance naturally..."

	"We're not here to recreate yesterday's events," Roarke said.  "Nor are we here to repeat any of the incidents that have plagued you and the ponies of Amulek before."

	"Then, if I may be so bold, what are we attempting to do?"

	Roarke turned and glanced over her shoulder.  "Rainbow Dash?"

	"Nnnnnnghhhhh..."  Rainbow yawned long and hard.

	Roarke's lenses pistoned outward.  "Rainbow Dash..."

	"Mrnnffhh... hmm?  What?  Huh?"

	"Please tell me you're not sleeping."

	"It's hard to tell when I'm this insanely bored," Rainbow said, blinking blearily from where she sat behind the cockpit seat.  "Please tell me we're not still flying in stupid circles."

	"Are you kidding?!"  Booster cackled.  "Who in the hay could be bored of this?!"  He gestured wildly at the cockpit.  "This is actual flying!"

	"It's a lot more exciting when I'm the one doing the flying," Rainbow said.

	Roarke muttered, "You're welcome to open the cockpit door and try it yourself, then."

	"Hey!"  Rainbow frowned.  "If we're doing this, we're doing this together!"  She leaned over the seat.  "Lemme guess, no sign of the friggin' dragon?"

	"Negative."

	"Doesn't this thing have missiles or lasers or whatcrap?"  Rainbow started flipping instruments at random.  "How about—like—we blow up a part of the mountain and wake the darn thing up?"

	"We will not be blowing anything up."  Roarke slapped Rainbow's hoof away.  Whap!

	"Eeep!"  Rainbow slumped back, rubbing her forelimb with a gawking expression.  "Who are you and what have you done with Roarke Most Radical?!"

	"I'm serious," Roarke grunted.  "I only have a limited supply of weapons on board this craft.  Believe you me, I greatly desire to use them, but only when it will be most fortuitous to us."

	"When you say missiles, do you mean explosive devices propelled by tightly contained liquid fuel?" Booster Spice asked.

	"Indeed," Roarke droned.

	"And..."  He leaned forward.  "By lasers, do you mean—"

	"Celestia-damn lasers," Rainbow said.

	"So fascinating..."  Booster grinned drunkenly.  "To think that such technology exists in the far corners of the world!"

	"Why do you act so surprised?"  Rainbow glanced at him.  "Don't the Val Roans have missiles and flying death machines themselves?"

	"Actually, Val Roa isn't all that fond of explosions."

	"... ... ..."  Rainbow leaned back with a prolonged sigh.  "Whelp, for once I'm glad I won't be living long on this continent."

	"Rainbow..."  Roarke moaned.

	"I don't understand..."  Booster's eyes thinned beneath his green goggles.  "Why so fatalistic—?"

	"Grnnngh!"  Rainbow pulled at her mane.  "There's gotta be a way to pull the creature out!"

	"Or creatures," Roarke corrected.

	"Ungh... don't even go there, Roarke," Rainbow grunted.  "I'm already reeling at the thought of just one Diet Nevlamas, much less a whole friggin' nest of them."

	"Nevlamas...?"  Booster Spice blinked.

	"We can't rule out the possiblity, Rainbow," Roarke said.  "That's precisely why we need to preserve this vessel's weapons.  If we discover a lair or a hoarde, then we can use the incendiary devices to destroy it from the inside out, much like you did in Silvadel."

	"Silvadel...?"  Booster Spice blinked again.

	"Okay, first thing's first, Roarke, we gotta stop treating this as if history's repeating itself!"  Rainbow Dash frowned.  "This isn't Silvadel anymore than it's the Xonan Front."

	"Xonan... Front...?"  Booster was grimacing at this point.

	"Don't mind us, dude," Rainbow muttered.  "Just sit back and keep being our pocket egghead."

	"Nnnngh..."  The stallion rubbed his aching head.  "Why do I get the unsettling sensation I've inadvertently jumped into the penultimate scene of a sprawling epic?"

	"It depends," Rainbow droned.  "What's your experience in fixing railroads?"

	"Uhhhhhhhh—"

	"Let's keep ourselves focused," Roarke insisted.  She pointed out the cockpit window with a metal-laced hoof.  "This fog... this ever pervasive mist..."

	"What about it?" Booster Spice asked.

	Roarke glanced back at him with whirring lenses.  "Have you ever bothered studying it?"

	"Oh, most definitely!"  Booster nodded.  "It's unlike any fog that's appeared around the mountains in years previous!  At first, I figured it was a sign of some sort of prolonged climate change.  It started several months ago—but, oddly enough—stuck to the higher altitudes."

	"Is that odd?"

	"Well, considering the common ebb and flow of condensation and evaporation, one would suspect that the same effects would transpire in the valley where Amulek is located.  After all, the temperature in this part of the world is relatively uniform.  The same can be said of the humidity.  But, for whatever reason, the fog is at its thickest at the higher elevations, and at all times of the day."

	"So, in other words, it's unnatural."

	"Oh.  Very."

	"And this hasn't ever alarmed you before?"

	"Well..."  Booster fidgeted where he sat.  "It's hard to be alarmed by uncanny fog when there's a definitively more uncanny and violent dragon attacking you on a weekly basis."

	"Do I have to say it out loud?" Rainbow Dash muttered.

	"Say what out loud?"

	Rainbow sighed.  "I've seen this sort of crud before..."

	"Really?" Booster glanced at her.  "Where?"

	Rainbow bit her lip.  She leaned in and spoke with her muzzle closer to Roarke.  "In Windthrow.  A village I visited a very... very long time ago."

	"And how exactly is this related to Amulek...?"

	Rainbow said, "It had the same sort of unnatural fog."

	"Truly?"  Booster blinked.  "Do you know what caused it?"

	"Yeah," Rainbow sighed.  "Chaos strips."

	"Chaos... strips...?"

	"There's a type of metal—a very rare kind of metal—that exhibits pure chaos energy," Rainbow explained.  "Chaos, of course, is as old as time.  It's the indomitable... uhm... fart gas that curses the cosmos through which this plane drifts."

	"Okaaaaay..."  Booster slowly nodded.  "Not exactly a very scientific explanation, but somewhat plausible."  He gulped.  "I'm guessing that you refer to some sort of magically malevolent substance that has both a solid and a gaseous form."

	"Erm..."

	"And wherever there is a gas—as made visually evident in the form of a prevailing fog—it constitutes the presence of the solid form in close proximity."

	Rainbow stared at him, blinking.  "Uh... yeah.  Sure."  She scratched her head and smirked at Roarke.  "Sheesh, Roarke.  Where was this dude when I was in Darkstine?"

	"I think I understand where you both are going with this," Roarke said while flying the ship over the mountain again.  "But if you recall, Rainbow Dash, Nevlamas was polluted with these chaos strips."

	"Right..."

	"The Xonans, under Chrysalis' influence, harvested chaotic abominations by infusing the Dark Divine with the strips."

	"Right right."

	"So, could it be possible that—if Nevlamas had a brood—they would be born with this chaotic essence built inside of them?"

	"Brbrbrbrrrr..."  Rainbow Dash shivered.  "I don't wanna think about it."

	"Well, you're going to have to," Roarke said.  "We all have to, especially if this mist could somehow be leading us to them."

	"I know that."  Rainbow turned towards Booster.  "Hey.  Goldilocks."

	"Dark... Stine...?"

	"Yoohoo!  Austraeoh to Booster!"

	"Huh?"  He snapped out of it and glanced at her.  "I-I'm sorry.  You were saying?"

	"Is there—like—a part of the mountain where this steam collects the most."

	"Heh... that's something I've always wondered myself."

	"You mean you don't know?"

	"What I mean, Miss Dash, is that none of us have been able to scale completely around the mountain to find out for sure.  Especially in these last few months when the dragon has plagued us senseless."  He suddenly blinked, then tilted his head up while scratching his chin.  "However..."

	"Hmmm?  Is that a good 'however' or a bad 'however?'"

	"There was one expedition... a group of Val Roans who traveled to Amulek from the north."  Booster gulped.  "This was right when the situation first turned sour and Drakshaa's workers were driven out of the mines."

	"Yeah... and...?"

	"Well, needless to say, these poor merchants were frightened out of their wits.  However, they did claim to have seen a great deal of smoke rolling out of the mountain peak from its north end."

	"Smoke?"

	"Well, we now realize that it's this fog.  But, at the time—when it was all starting—they swore that Silver Point looked like a veritable volcano!  I've always wondered what it looks like there today."

	"There?  Booster, where is there?"

	"Uhm... the northwest end, about two hundred and fifty feet down from the actual summit.  My great-great grandfather was the first to survey it.  Much of the mountainface there is pure stone at that point, and the earth is too hard to bother drilling for silver pockets."

	"Hmmm..."  Rainbow Dash turned towards Roarke.  "What do you think, Roarkey?"

	"Please don't call me that."

	"C'monnnnn..."  Rainbow Dash grinned.  "We gotta come up with a nick-name for you at some point."

	"Just because we've bonded doesn't make me your pet."

	"Coulda fooled me with the way your prosthetic tail was wagging the other night."

	"Hrmmmph..."  Roarke suddenly accelerated the ship, coasting over the fog and towards the northern edge of the mountain.  "Let's just go and check out this 'Silver Point' already."

	"Pffft.  Fine."  Rainbow Dash leaned back, forelimbs folded in a pout.  "...Doarke most Dorkly..."

	"So, I'm confused..."  Booster scratched his blonde head and pointed.  "You two are or aren't sisters...?"

	"Euhhghhhh... Roarke, please tell me there's a vomit bag somewhere in here."



	With a loud bass hum, the black sphere soared through the fog, barely parting the mists as it dropped sharply along the mountain's edge.  Finally, it slowed, a quartet of bright floodlamps flickering to life along the unmarked bow.

	The round vessel twirled around, descending like a black bathosphere through the murky air.  In front of it, a layered spotlight illuminated craggy rock as it rolled upwards like a granite curtain.



	Inside the sphere, all three ponies leaned forward.  Roarke's lenses pistoned out while Rainbow squinted and Booster blinked through his green goggles.

	Outside the cockpit, the mountainside loomed incredibly close.  The floodlamps illuminated every feature beyond the trailing mists.  At last, something dark appeared through the perpetual miasma.  It consumed the floodlights in impenetrable darkness.

	"Whoah whoah whoah...!"  Rainbow gripped Roarke's shoulder.  "Hold her steady!"

	Roarke yanked a lever.  The ship jolted, then hovered dead in place.

	The ponies were staring down a deep, round hole in the side of the mountain.

	"That..."  Booster grimaced.  "...was not there before."

	"You're certain of that?" Roarke droned.

	"If a giant pit of grisly death appeared in the side of your home's signature mountain, wouldn't you notice?"

	"Lemme guess..."  Rainbow stared wide-eyed down the cave from where they hovered.  "...you couldn't see it all this time because of the fog."

	"Whenever we lifted our heads to the sky, it was to combat the dragon."

	"It would have taken a lot of might and energy to have made this," Roarke muttered.  "One would imagine the undertaking would be unbelievably loud."

	"I swear, the ponies of Amulek have heard nothing!" Booster exclaimed.  "Even the dragon's attacks are swift and silent!  You know this for yourselves!"

	"You're right," Rainbow nodded with a gulp.  "We do."

	"I don't see any noticeable claw marks," Roarke said.  "If Nevlamas created this hole, it must have been through sheer heat... or perhaps chaos magic."

	"But—think about it!  How would that be possible?"  Rainbow frowned.  "Chrysalis kept Nevlamas cooped up in that floating Sacred Hold for so long!"

	"Meaning...?"

	"When would she have found the time to get out from under all that chaos experimentation and lay her eggs here?!"

	"That depends..."

	"You don't need to tell me twice, girl!"  Rainbow turned towards the stallion.  "Hey, Booster Gold."

	"Booster Spice."

	"Whatever.  Just about how long ago did all this crap start?"

	"You mean the fog?"

	"Yeah.  That crap."

	He gulped and said, "About five months ago.  Maybe six."

	"Well, there you have it."  Roarke said.  "That would give Nevlamas plenty of time."

	"Something just doesn't add up, though..."  Rainbow leaned forward.  "Let's get a little closer..."

	"Uhhh..."  Booster gulped.  "You mean you wish to enter the looming death hole in the side of our mountain?"

	"Don't be stupid.  I just want a clearer look at the tunnel entrance."

	"Don't we all..."  Roarke gently tilted the controls forward.  The ship drifted and drifted.  The mountain now loomed just a few feet away.

	Rainbow squinted hard, holding her breath.

	"What is it that you're looking for?" Booster asked.

	"Look..."  Rainbow pointed at the outer lid of the hole.  "...see how smoothe it all is?  There's no scorch marks.  Not even any claw scrapes or signs of carving."

	"Almost like..."  Roarke's lenses pistoned out.  "...like."

	"Acid burns," Rainbow murmured.  "Since when did Nevlamas ever spit acid on anything?"

	Roarke's jaw tightened.  "Need I remind of you of the horrific deaths I witnessed while sneaking around the Sacred Hold?"

	"Yeah, but it's not like the Divine was leaking chaotic doom juices wherever she went!"

	"She was a corrupted dying chaos dragon, Rainbow.  Who knows what she could have been leaking."

	"Even still, would it have been enough to systematically burn a hole into a mountain this—"

	FWOOOSH!  Two menacing jaws lunged out of the hole, followed by a pair if crystalline antlers.

	"Whoah damn!" Roarke hollered, yanking at the controls.

	"It's over!"  Booster yelped, pouncing on Rainbow Dash as he whimpered in terror.  "We're dragon food!"

	"Augh!  Darn it!  Get off!  I can't see us get raked to death!"

	CLANK!  The scales of the leaping creature collided with the sphere, sending it spiraling off into the mists.

	"Aaaaaugh!" Booster yelped as the three ponies rolled and toppled inside the cockpit.

	Roarke somehow maintained her grip on the controls.  "Everypony!  Hold onto something!"

	A loud beeping sound filled the flickering compartment.  Steam and manalight vented from various consoles as the ship took a massive dive.  Outside, the razor-sharp tips of countless fir trees suddenly flew into view.

	Rainbow untangled from Booster long enough to spot their plummeting doom.  Her pupils shrank.  "Oboy..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Accept That Time is Cyclic		//------------------------------//

	"'Oboy?!'" Booster Spice sputtered.  "Shouldn't that be 'hoboy?'"

	"Quiet, you!" Rainbow wheezed.  She threw a look across the lopsided cockpit.  "Roarke—?!"

	"Gravity-defying as we speak—!"  Gnashing her teeth, the metal mare banged a console and yanked hard at the controls.  "Nrnnnnnghhh!"

	Sw-Sw-Sw-Sw-Sw-Swisssh!  Hundreds of treetops swiped at the curvaceous underbelly of the miniature Lounge sphere.  Despite Roarke's best efforts, the vessel was still plunging one inch at a time into the forest canopy.

	"It's still out there!" Booster Spice shouted, staring through his goggles out the cockpit window.  A distant draconian shriek confirmed his exclamation.  "If we crash here, we're sitting ducks!"

	"Still working on the albatross part!" Roarke snarled.

	"Maybe if I got out and pushed!" Rainbow yelped.

	"Dammit, you!  Don't be you right now!"

	The cockpit echoed from dozens of tree branches ricocheting off the glossy black hull.

	"I c-can't... g-get it to lift up!" Roarke sputtered.

	Booster Spice shouted, "Have you considered checking to see if there's a buildup of redundant manafire in the lateral auxiliary assembly?!"

	Roarke shot him a wild look.  "What?!"

	"If you vent it, it should give us enough thrust to ascend!"

	"Where would I find the lever to do that?!"

	"Presumably on your lower right!"  Booster pointed.  "Over there, by your flank!  Jeepers, lady!  Don't you know your own manaship?!"

	"She hijacked it from a bunch of talking lizards!" Rainbow barked.  "Roarke—?!"

	"Got it!"  The metal mare's hoof hooked around a tight lever.  "Hold on!"  Chtungg!  The entire vehicle shook with a deep bass hum, followed by the explosive release of mana gases.  A half-second later, the sphere jerked violently upwards in a twirling fashion.

	"Aaaack!"  Booster flailed.

	"Not again—OOMF!"  Rainbow caught the brunt of his weight as the ship lifted violently up.



	The Lounge sphere shot up, spitting amber gases everywhere like a spinning firework.  At last, it ascended until it was out of reach of the treeline.  Roarke brought the vessel around—glinting through the fog with reflected sunlight.

	In the distance, the mutant dragon swooped low, lining up with the ship.  Its antlers flickered brightly, and soon it was launching a pair of burning green fireballs their way.



	"Incoming!"  Booster Spice yelped.  "Gaaie!"  He fell over.

	Rainbow sat up with a grunt, having tossed the stallion off her.  "Cram your ins inside your comings, already!"  She leaned over Roarke's seat.  "Think you can dodge them?"

	"I didn't come out here with you to sing ballads."

	"That much is certain."  Rainbow gripped the chair behind her.  "Do your best and worst, Roarke!"

	"Doing..."  Roarke jerked the controls to the side.



	The sphere rolled through the air, dodging the burning projectiles at the last second.

	Behind the vessel, a cluster of trees caved under the weight of the crashing fireballs.  A plume of emerald flame erupted in the middle of the forest, sending branches and frightened birds flying everywhere.

	Just as quickly as it had dodged sideways, the black sphere evened out, sputtering in random places with loose manafire.



	"Good job," Rainbow Dash said, patting Roarke's shoulder.  "You get a cookie."

	Roarke's brow furrowed.  "I don't do cookies."

	"Mmmfnngh..."  Booster fumbled in an attempt to stand upright.  "Are we burnt to a crisp yet?"
	"Postively smoldering."  Rainbow leaned forward and looked straight down through the cockpit window.  She caught an edge of the creeping green flame as it burned to a quiet simmer across the forest floor.  "I swear to Luna, that is the strangest dragon's breath I've ever seen."

	"This isn't an opportune moment to catalogue draconian flame, Rainbow..."

	"I know that, Croarke!"  Rainbow frowned.  "But it just doesn't make sense!  Nevlamas didn't have that!  Why would she pass it on to her brood?"

	"When the thing gets closer," Booster wheezed, "You can ask her yourself!"

	"I don't intend to."  Rainbow turned to the metal mare.  "Roarke, are we good enough to fly right?"

	"Rainbow..."

	"Let's get a head start!  No need to become dragon treats while we're still young—"

	"Rainbow, look!"  Roarke pointed.

	Rainbow did so.  Her ruby eyes twitched.

	The chaos dragon was flying in the opposite direction.  It's body became tinier and tinier across the northern horizon.

	"She's... fl-flying away?!" Booster stammered.

	"It would appear so," Roarke droned.

	"Why isn't she finishing us off?" Rainbow Dash's voice cracked.  "We're like fish in a barrel out here!"

	Roarke fidgeted.  "Would you at least give me some credit?"

	"Roarke!  Quick!"  Rainbow slapped her shoulder.  "Go after it!"

	Roarke's lenses retracted as she looked up at her.  "...go after it."

	"You heard me!  Hurry!  While she's still in our sights!"

	"Hrmmm..."  Roarke began accelerating the ship in a humming glide.  "She's going to end up a lot closer... and uglier."

	"Are you nuts?!" Booster wheezed, his goggles lopsided.  "We've never chased after the dragon before!"

	"You've also never been in an airship over these mountains before!"  Rainbow Dash said, her eyes firmly locked on the fleeing drake.  "Booster, for some miraculously stupid reason, none of the ponies of Amulek have died from this freak.  Now, I've been around enough dragons to know that they usually don't spare pony flesh like that.  I want to find out why, and this is our opportunity!"

	"Yeah, well..."  Booster gulped and produced a feeble smile.  "Could it just be your opportunity?"

	"Shush!"  Rainbow shook Roarke's shoulders.  "Come on, punch it, girl!"

	"Consider it punched.'  Roarke threw a lever forward.

	Rainbow and Booster were flung back to the rear of the ship as it sped forward.



	Schoooooooom!  The world spun dizzily around the Lounge sphere as it bulleted after the aquamarine monster.  The dragon's twin tails thrashed, and it took a sharp left.  The sphere jerked after it, effortlessly manuevering on a mid-air dime.

	With a loud shriek, the dragon jerked right.  When the sphere matched its movements, it dove low and entered a tight ravine lined with craggy rocks and jutting fir trees.  The earthen trench bent towards the east, and the dragon swerved along with the sharp turn, its wing-tips scraping along the edges of the shallow canyon.



	Roarke's lenses pistoned out as she struggled to see past the dirt, dust, and debris pelting the sphere's windshield from the dragon's flight up ahead.  The vessel shook from the sheer friction of threading through the tight ravine.

	"It c-can certainly m-move fast!" Booster sputtered as his body shook.

	Rainbow hovered in the middle of the cockpit to breathe and speak evenly.  "But it's still not trying to crush us like tinfoil!"

	"We're certainly giving it every reason to," Roarke droned.

	"Not yet, we haven't!"  Rainbow pointed.  "Fire a missile!"

	"I... doubt it will kill her, Rainbow."

	"No, not at the dragon!  Just—next to her!  Scare her!"

	"Scare her?!" Booster gasped.

	"Just trust me!"  Rainbow barked.  "Roarke—?"

	"Firing..."  Roarke yanked a lever overhead.



	Ka-POW!  A rocket sailed out from the sphere and exploded into a piece of the canyon wall ahead of the dragon.

	The creature let loose one shriek.  With one heavy wing-flap, it lifted straight up and out of the ravine.

	The air thundered from the Lounge projectile's impact.  Without wasting a second, the black sphere raised up and chased the dragon into the clouds.




	"So, tell me..."  Rainbow clenched her teeth.  "What kind of a dragon—much less one raised by Nevlamas—runs from both a manaship and a rocket?"

	"Perhaps she's just trying to distract us!"  Roarke grunted while desperately jerking the controls to maintain pursuit.  "We did find its layer, after all."

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  Her ears folded back as she spoke in a contemplative tone:  "I think it's trying to distact us, alright.  But it's more than just the layer."

	"Rainbow...?"

	"Here..."  Rainbow turned, grabbed Booster, and forced him down into a seat.  "Stay put."  She strapped a canvas belt around him.  "You're going to need this.  You too, Roarke!"

	"Huh?!"  Booster gasped.  "You mean we had seatbelts this entire time?!"

	"Rainbow, what are you doing?!"

	"What do you expect?!"  Rainbow trotted across the tight compartment and gripped the handle to one of the lateral doors.  "You know me well enough by now!"

	Roarke gasped over her shoulder.  "No!  Don't—"

	FWOOOOSH! The compartment thundered with billowing air as Rainbow opened the door to the cloudy atmosphere outside.  Once the pressure had equalized, she shouted, "Face it!  This is something I have to deal with, face to face!  You've got a nice ship, Roarke!  But it's still not the fastest thing in the universe!"

	"Rainbow, maybe it's afraid of a ship!  But a defenseless pony—?!"

	"Neither you or I can pretend I'm 'defenseless,' Roarke!  Try being cute when things are calm and quiet for once!"

	"But I just can't let you—"

	"Yes you can!  And you will!"  Rainbow slapped the hull as she stepped out.  "What's more, you're going to get me into position to leap on the antler'd jerkenstein!  You can bite my head off about it later!"

	"Rainbow..."  Roarke snarled.  "At this point, there won't be a 'later!'"

	"Your faith is appreciated as always!  Now hoist!"  Rainbow was outside at this point, slamming the door shut as her hooves clamored over the sphere's exterior.

	As the compartment quieted down, Booster panted and panted and ultimately said, "How in the hay do you put up with that mare?!  She's crazy!"

	Roarke sighed so hard the windshield fogged in the middle.  "She also happens to be the only mare I've ever truly loved."

	"Ohhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh..."  Booster nodded.  A gulp.  "So you are sisters, then?"

	"Searo damn it..."  Roarke yanked up hard on the controls.

	"Gaaaaaah!" Booster clung to his seat.

	"Hoisting now, Rainbow!" Roarke hollered into the hull.



	Rainbow Dash carefully, carefully perched atop the miniature Lounge sphere.  Her muzzle's skin rippled and her mane billowed crazily in the heavy winds.  She inched her way up into a full standing position, her tearing eyes locked onto the thrashing pendulums that were the dragon's tails straight ahead.

	Meanwhile, Roarke accelerated the vehicle as gracefully as she could, approaching the dragon five meters per second.

	Rainbow held her breath.  When she felt that she was close enough, she uncoiled her wings, spreading them to either side of her in a snap.  The air instantly whistled, and vaporous trails streaked immediately behind the pegasus' feather tips.

	There was a glint of bright light.  The eastern sunrise momentarily pierced the fog, breaking shadows in the shapes of the mutated dragon's antlers.

	"Rnnnnnghhhh..."  Rainbow Dash tightened and untightened her legs.  "Hrnngh!"  She leapt forward, propelling off the roof of the hurling sphere.

	The dragon's twin tails thrashed together, criss-crossing.

	Rainbow twirled, threaded through them, and came to a tumbling stop across the dragon's back.

	The beast let loose a shriek and instantly dove.

	"Mmrmffnng—Haaugh!"  Rainbow slid across the scales, reached a hoof out, and grabbed an antler.  She held on for dear life, watching as the forested world suddenly twirled overhead.  The dragon was flipping, and she was along for the ride.  Panting, she gripped tighter to the antler and began working her way down to the creature's scalp.

	Then something unexpected happened.  The branch of the antler Rainbow Dash was holding onto... disappeared.  It didn't break or snap off or shatter into crystalline bits.  It simply vanished.  The sensation was so startling that Rainbow Dash didn't realize she was being flung into empty skies until she saw the leathery wingspokes of the beast sailing past her.  With one deep breath, she flapped her feathers and propelled herself forward.

	"Httt!"  She grabbed the wingtip of the dragon with two forelimbs, clinging tightly.  One forelimb at a time, Rainbow climbed her way back onto the dragon's backside.  By now, the creature was spinning, twirling, doing everything it could to toss Rainbow off—just short of actually attacking her.  "What's the matter?!" Rainbow hissed, sticking to the dragon's spine in a full-on body hug.  "Lost your teeth?!  Huh?!  Strange... being killed by Axan only made me tougher!  So what's your excuse?!"  With a gnashing teeth, she raised two hooves and brought them violently down.  "Maybe if I beat you hard enough, I'll find it!  Hrrnnngh!"

	WHACK!  Rainbow's blow struck pure scales.  She knew it.  This is why she was shocked when it didn't feel or sound like slapping dragon scales.  The body beneath her rattled like a giant jar full of pebbles.  What's more, there was a flash of light—green like the flames coming out of the beast's maw.

	"Huh?!"  Caught off guard, she wasn't ready for when the dragon's body undulated, its spine bending at an impossible angle to throw her off.  "Yaaaaugh!"

	Rainbow went sailing upward.  She smashed through three clouds and landed against the foggy belly of a fourth one high in the air.  Hovering there, she glanced down through flickering eyes.  Once the yellow and red had returned to white and ruby, her vision came into focus.  She saw the dragon flying low to the ground.  Its wing-flaps were labored and its momentum had been severely slowed.  If Rainbow Dash didn't know better, she'd say that the monster was getting tired.

	At last, Rainbow gritted her teeth.  A slow snarl built up in the center of her chest, eventually rolling out her throat like a panther's growl.  "You are not Nevlamas..."  She dove violently down, spitting into the wind.  "Do you hear me?!"

	There was nowhere for the dragon to go, only it didn't know it.  But Rainbow did.  The pegasus hurled down towards the weakly fluttering beast like a bright blue meteorite.

	"You are not Nevlamas!"  At the last second, Rainbow Dash spun her body around until it was plummeting with a murderous dive-kick.  "Hraaaaaaaaugh!"

	Milliseconds later, Rainbow Dash slammed into the dragon's spine... and tore straight through.  In a brilliant flash of emerald light, the chaos creature exploded into three dozen pieces.



	A wave of manaflame erupted in every direction, singeing the tree tops of the alpine forest.

	Inside the Lounge's sphere, Booster Spice gasped, covering his goggles with a pair of forelimbs.

	Roarke gnashed her teeth as she decelerated the vessel and spun it towards its side.

	The wave of flame hit, shaking the entire ship towards its core.

	Both ponies jolted and grunted, weathering the thunderous turbulence.



	At that precise moment, inside the Noble Jury's mess hall...

	Eagle Eye was dipping his spoon into a bowl of fruit salad.  He was inches away from scarfing down a cluster of apple slices when he heard a loud shriek from the kitchen, followed by clattering dishes.  His eyes widened.

	Across the table, Josho looked up, his chins wobbling.

	Both stallions kicked out of their chairs and galloped into the kitchen.

	"Ebon...?!"  Eagle Eye panted.  "Ebony?!"

	As he and Josho entered, they found the stallion collapsed on the floor, surrounded by rattling pots and pans.  He held his skull with both hooves, his clenched eyes tearing.

	"Rnnnnghhh!  Mother!"  Ebon Mane whimpered.  "Mother... it hurts!  Mmmmgnngh!  Make it stop!"

	"What in Ledo's blood-stained saddle is going on?!" Josho barked.

	"I..."  Eagle hyperventilated, sweating.  "I-I..."

	"Come on, sunshine!"  Josho levitated the convulsing cook and hoisted him over his backside.  "Help me get him to the infirmary!"

	Eagle fought back a sob, nodded, and lent a hoof.



	Swoooosh!  The Lounge's sphere flew crookedly towards the earth.  After a weak serpentine descent, it found its way towards a clearing in the middle of the forest.  Thump-Scraaaaape!  It crashed lightly and slid to an awkward stop.  Manaflame hissed out of the once-glossy surface, now covered in scrapes and smeared tree sap.

	At last, the doors opened.  Roarke jumped out.  Booster fell out.  The mare helped the stallion up to his hooves, and both gawked at the center of the clearing ahead of them.

	The grass was burning in random places, forming a perfect circle of smoldering emerald embers.  In the center of the soft crater sat Rainbow Dash, shivering and covered all over in green smoke.  She struggled to get up, wheezing and sputtering for breath.

	"Rainbow...?!"  Roarke gulped.  "What happened?  Are you alright?"

	Rainbow said nothing.  She looked up, blinking wearily.  A ruby light pulsed from her pendant, and she steadied it with a shaking hoof.  At last, her vision returned to normal, and she became aware of several dark bodies lying limply in the grass all around her.  A sharp gasp escaped her lips.

	Frantically, she crawled across the charred grass and lifted one of the limp bodies, cradling it in her hooves.  Her eyes narrowed, studying every square inch of the changeling's onyx carapace.  The creature was breathing—albeit lightly.  Its gossamer wingtips twitched as its eyelids fluttered above its fanged muzzle.

	"What in heaven's name...?"  Booster Spice stammered, gawking at the bruised and stirring bodies around him.  "How fascinating... are they insects or are they ponies?"

	"They'll be you if you give them long enough," Roarke sneered.  She trotted briskly forward.  "Rainbow Dash!  We have to—"

	"Roarke, stay back!"  Rainbow hissed behind her shoulder.  "There's easily over thirty of 'em here!  They could overtake us in a heartbeat!"

	"Then why in Searo's name are you cradling one of them?!"

	Rainbow bit her lip.  "I-I need answers, Roarke!  And something tells me that I'm the only one who can—"

	"Mmmmfnnghhh..." The changeling in Rainbow's grip stirred.

	Rainbow gasped, looking down at the metamorph.  "Hey... Hey!"  She shook the creature lightly.  "Come on!  Smell the salts!  Talk to me!"  She narrowed her eyes.  "Where do you get off, impersonating Nevlamas, huh?!"

	"Nnnngh... the b-beast... we've lost cohesion..."  The changeling curled its forelimbs before its chest.  "Gghhh... mother, n-no..." it squeaked.

	Rainbow gritted her teeth.  "Your mother isn't here.  Chrysalis isn't here!"  She blinked.  "...is she?"

	"Hrmmgnnnh..."  At last, the changeling's eyes fluttered open.  Upon seeing Rainbow, a flicker of bright green emanated from beneath the thing's carapace.  It gasped like a startled foal, its fanged maw hanging agape.  "It's you..."  The green in its eyes shrank to glossy pupils as freckles briefly adorned a fuzzy orange face.  "It's really you!"

	Rainbow grimaced.  She glanced over her shoulder.  Every changeling flickered orange for a second, then turned back to their glossy blackness.  Somehow, it was enough to stir them from unconsciousness.  One by one, they stood up on aching limbs.

	Booster stood close to Roarke, shivering as the bodies rose around them.  Roarke clenched her teeth while the metal braces around her legs whirred defensively.

	"How... h-how did you find us...?" the changeling wheezed.

	"I... uh..."  Rainbow glanced towards the tallest mountain.  Deep in its belly, the same symbol flickered as always.  "...let's just say I followed my nose."

	"You... sh-shouldn't be here..." the changeling sputtered and coughed.  Its body grew limper and weaker in Rainbow's grip.  "Nopony... sh-should be here..."

	"Hey... hey!" Rainbow barked, shaking the pony.  "Stay with me!  I need to know what's going on!  Why are you changelings here?!  Is this some sort of nest or something?!  Why were you impersonating Nevlamas?!"

	"The beast..."  The changeling whimpered.  "...the beast was all we knew.  It was M-Mother's weapon.  It... could spread fear..."

	"Spread fear?!  Why spread fear?!"

	The changeling's eyelids fell as it drifted off.

	"Come onnnnn... come on!"  Rainbow fumed and fumed.  She took a deep breath, lowering her eyes as she calmed herself.  Then, leaning forward, she hugged the changeling tenderly, her face face nuzzling the creature's fragile carapace.

	"What...?"  Booster raised his green goggles and squinted.  "What is she—?"

	Roarke slapped a hoof over his shoulder.  "Shhhh!"  Nevertheless, her lenses too pistoned out.

	Slowy, a green flame crept over the changeling's body.  Its colt turned to a fuzzy brown while red braids fountained out from its scalp.  With a deep breath, the creature convulsed.  Two seconds after opening its bright emerald eyes, a pair of lenses materialized over its sockets.

	Rainbow exhaled, reopening her eyes as she smiled gently at the doppelganger.  "There... any b-better...?"

	The little Roarke gulped and nodded.  "Much..."  She wheezed, "We sh-should have known it was you.  When we first saw you at the foot of the mountain."  She gulped.  "Your wings.  Your mane."

	"Can you tell me now why you were impersonating Nevlamas?"

	"You g-gave us so much clarity... so much flame."  The changeling gulped.  "We could see everything in the light.  Everything we were... everything we did."  A tear squeezed out from behind the lenses.  "Everything for Mother... and it was awful..."

	"Rainbow..."  Roarke trotted up, glancing nervously at the stirring changelings surrounding them.  "Something's wrong.  They all look incredibly antsy."

	"I'd say so..."  Rainbow squinted at the changeling.  "What have you been doing all this time?"

	Instead of answering, the changeling sputtered, "You've done s-so much for us.  You shouldn't be here.  You should leave."  She stood up and out of Rainbow's grip.  "Everypony in this valley should pack up and leave!"

	"Pack up and leave?!"  Booster stomped his hooves.  "Why?!  This is our home!  Why are you trying to drive us all away!"

	"That was the whole point of this Nevlamas schtick, wasn't it?!"  Rainbow Dash frowned.  "You don't wanna be like Mother, huh?!  Then why are you terrorizing a small village!"

	"They're all in danger.  We only wished to scare them off!"  The changeling shivered.  "We wanted to protect them!  But their love and their loyalty is too great!  We c-couldn't calculate for that!  We couldn't... couldn't..."

	"Protect us?!"  Booster stammered.

	Rainbow Dash squinted.  "Protect them from what?" Right as she said that, her eyes flickered red-on-yellow.  She yelped and stumbled forward, instantly dizzy.

	"Rainbow!"  Roarke reached out to support her.

	"Gnnngh!"  Rainbow panted, eyes wide.  "Luna poop!  I haven't felt a jolt like that since... since..."

	"Oh no..."  The changeling spun and faced the mountaintop, as did its fellow broodlings.  "It's too late!  They smell harmonic flesh!  Any moment now, and they'll strike!"

	"Who?!"  Rainbow sputtered, reeling in Roarke's grip.  "Nnnngh—who or what are you talking about?!"

	"Rainbow..." Roarke murmured.

	Rainbow struggled to tilt her head up.  She gasped upon seeing a thick curtain of mist pouring out of the mountaintop like volcanic ash.

	The changelings whimpered in fright.  The speaker turned towards Rainbow Dash, its eyes tearing.  "Mother abandoned more than us here..."

	As that was uttered, the air above filled with deathly shrieks.  It was a trickle at first, then a veritable monsoon of leather, as countless serpentine bodies began pouring out of the hole in the north side of the mountain, sailing down towards the forest on the wings of chaos, their banshee shrieks rattling every equine soul to the core.  An entire swarm of ethereal abominations glided over the treetops, spitting death and malice in every direction their glowing eyes took them.

	Rainbow rattled in Roarke's grip.  "Hoboy..."

	"Yeah..."  Booster Spice whimpered. "...that's m-more like it."
		//------------------------------//
		// Flight of Fancy, Windswept Field		//------------------------------//

	"Rainbow Dash..."  Roarke droned, backtrotting.

	"It's just like the ones in Sacred Hold," Rainbow murmured, her ruby eyes reflecting the chaotic flock of death.  "Spawned from Nevlamas herself!"

	"What in Searo's vulva are they doing here?!"

	"This... this must be one of Chrysalis' hives," Rainbow murmured.  Her eyes twitched even wider.  "Where she plans to stage the invasion of Val Roa!"

	"Where she did plan!" one of the changelings closest to Rainbow sputtered.  "But Mother is gone now!  We don't know where!"

	"Please, you have to believe us!" another exclaimed above the noise of rising shrieks.  "You of all ponies!  You freed us!"

	"Freed you to do what?!" Roarke grunted.  "Take on the form of a dragon and burn ponies' lives to the ground?!"

	"All we wanted was for everypony to flee this area!" another exclaimed.  "To flee from this!"  The creature pointed at the sky as it was buzzing with chaos.  "We never killed anyone!  We never hurt anyone!"

	Roarke sneered, "That's the most damnably stupid logic—"

	"This is just a piece of the whole!" a changeling cried.  "There are countless more in the heart of the mountain!  Waiting to spring on this land and abroad!"  The creature shuddered.  "We can't contain them for much longer!"

	"Correct me if I'm wrong, but you can't contain these things period."  Booster Spice gulped.  "Uhm... n-now may be a good time to Whizz away."

	"Can't," Roarke spat.

	Rainbow flashed her a look.  "Roarke?"

	Roarke frowned.  "The ship's too beat.  The lizard's tech got battered in that last scrape.  If I try to take off in the thing now, its manaengines could rupture."

	"Uhhhh..."  Rainbow gulped, sweated.  She glanced at the descending cloud of chaos.  "Uhhhhmm..."

	"You've got wings!" Booster stammered.  "Can you carry us?!"

	"Yeah..."  Rainbow trotted over to them.  "But not very quickly!  We gotta find a cave or a niche or some place to—" 

	Three changelings instantly darted over.  "Is it the village that you wish to go to?!"

	"Huh?!"  Booster flashed them a look.

	"The village of Amulek?!"

	Booster squinted beneath his goggles.  "How did you—"

	"Honestly, anyplace is preferable right about now!" Rainbow exclaimed.

	"Quickly!"  Two changelings grabbed Booster's shoulders.  The stallion gasped as he was lifted up off the ground.  "We have to outrun them while we still can!"

	"But they'll track us—"

	"They'll track you!" the changelings said.  "We're invisible to them in this form!  It's how Mother bred them!"

	"Aaack!"  Booster wheezed, his teeth chattering.  "I-I-I'm not s-so sure about th-this!"

	"Well super-sure yourself!  Pronto!"  Rainbow Dash took off as she heard the buzzing of changeling wings.  "Head west and don't stop for nothing!"

	"Grnnngh!"  Roarke, in the meantime, was struggling and shoving against the changelings diving down to grip her.  "Get your hooves off me!  I'll turn your shells inside out—"

	"Roarke!"

	"The next creature who touches my flesh—"

	"Dammit, Roarke!"  Rainbow shouted, throwing her angry muzzle in the surprised mare's face.  "Let them carry you!  You wanna die on me, ya friggin' idiot?!"

	Roarke's lips quivered.  "But... b-but..."  Her lenses reflected fangs and glowing scales.

	"Go!" Rainbow shouted as the entire flock lifted up with Booster and Roarke in tow.  She looked worriedly over her shoulder.  "Go go go go go go go!!!"

	With a joint shriek, the chaos wyrms sailed in from the mountainside.  Their razor-sharp maws lunged at the three ponies as they were hoisted away.  Rainbow Dash flew on her own volition, twirling out of the snapping jaws of one, two, three gliding serpents.

	By now, the fir trees were swaying from the artificial wind generated by the multiple surging bodies.  As the monsters pursued the three equines, the fog spread like the gray clouds at the head of a cyclone.  Despite the energy of their rabid pursuers, the changelings maintained a decent speed.  When one or two of them tired, others dove in and swap places—carrying the two ponies for another three or four dozen yards.

	Rainbow Dash flung a nervous glance over her shoulder.  Witless, she shouted ahead, "They're still chasing!"

	"They'll give up soon!"  one of the changelings shouted.  "They'll feast on the creatures in the forest and retreat to the mountain like they always do!"

	"You sure about that?!" Rainbow hollered.  "Cuz it almost seems like we're leading them to civlization!"

	The closest changeling fidgeted, its fangs chewing nervously at midair.  "We... we c-could split up or—"

	"Something tells me you guys aren't used to making command decisions!"

	"It has b-been terribly difficult.  We wish we could—"

	"Keep flying!" Rainbow hollered, suddenly bending around and flying back in the opposite direction.  "I'm going to distract them long enough for you to get away unnoticed!"

	"What?!" Booster shouted from up ahead.

	"Rainbow!" Roarke yelled.  "Don't you dare—"

	"Meet you back at Amulek!" Rainbow shouted.  "Wear something sassy!"  Fwoosh! She sliced against the wind, barreling towards the incoming abominable wall at suicidal speeds.  Roarke shouted something else, but there was no making out the words at this frictious velocity.  "Hnnnngh... okay, snakes and ladders... you wanna play?!"

	The cloud of serpentine monstrosities shifted, coagulating towards her in a silver stream like a ravenous fish of sharks.

	Rainbow Dash gritted her teeth.  "Let's see how a Celestia-damn sonic rainboom fills your gullet—"  Just as she was saying this, her eyes flickered a sickly yellow.  "Aaaaugh!"  She flinched in mid-air, descending slightly.  Her body jolted as an intense wave of dizziness flew through her.  She looked up through squinting eyes.  "No... not here... not n-now!"

	The incoming flood fogged in and out of existence.  Between the black shroud of Rainbow's eyelids and the blinding sunrise beyond, she could only make out the glint of their teeth and talons.

	"Hrmmmmm-raaaaaaaugh!"  Summoning every bit of strength inside her wing muscles, she pulled herself up, sailing skyward.

	The topmost row of serpents lunged at her, their teeth slicing within inches of her fuzzy belly.  Rainbow wildly flew over them, bending towards the north and curving in a sickly helix.  The only thing keeping her steady was a rigid pair of wings.  The air whistled violently past each ear as she found herself slicing downward at a shallow angle, approaching the trees once more.  All the while, she heard the creatures hissing and snarling at her six.  She was successfully distracting them, though there was no time to celebrate.  There wasn't even time to scream.

	"Come on, Rainbow," she hissed at herself, her eyes tearing.  "Find a soft spot... f-find a soft spot..."  Her teeth gnashed.  "You can do it—"

	WHAP!  Her body grazed a tree branch.

	"Augh!" She spun, toppled, and ricocheted off the forest floor.  Her body bounced once, twice, then slid to a stop upon the edge of a jutting rock along a thinning treeline.  "Mrmmmfffnnngh... idiot," she muttered to herself, struggling to sit up.  "You are the 'soft-spot.'"

	Barely five seconds later, she heard the roar of several creatures diving down from above.  Dizzily, she rolled over, squinting up at the sky with scarlet pupils against yellow saucers.

	Soon enough, the sun was blotted out by their scales, scales, and scales.

	"Good luck finding any m-meat."  She gulped, then curled up in a weak little ball.  "Crud muffins..."

	Just then, the air broke with a clap of thunder.  Rainbow's foggy vision caught a shadow against a shadow.  With her last ounce of strength, she focused her vision on a series of shapes darting in from her peripheral.  Ten changelings swooped low—unseen by the ravenous abominations.  With careful precision, they flew together and conjoined in a burst of green flame.  By the next blink, they had morphed into a miniature Nevlamas, antler-slashing their way through the chaos meat.

	Several serpents shrieked loudly as they were torn to ribbons.  Within seconds, the flock jerked about, swarming after the faux dragon that was suddenly in their midst.  By then, it was too late; "Nevlamas" was swinging about, diving low, and yanking Rainbow off the ground in a metamorphic talon.

	Rainbow Dash wheezed, feeling herself being carried away by her unexpected saviors.  As the last of her senses gave way, she rolled her head back, caught a flash of sunlight, and surrendered to the darkness.
		//------------------------------//
		// Loyalty is the Best Home		//------------------------------//

	"Ebon...?"

	The stallion panted and panted, his face wrenched in pain as he curled a pair of forelimbs to his chest.

	A lavender hoof reached in and dabbed a cold washcloth across his burgundy brow.  "Ebon, try opening your eyes..."

	Ebon eventually relented.  A tear or two streamed down his cheek as he squinted across the Noble Jury's infirmary.

	Eagle Eye squatted beside the cot.  He smiled thinly, reaching in to stroke the stallion's bangs.  "How are you feeling, Ebon?" he asked.  "Be blunt."

	The stallion shuddered.  He fought a whimpering voice in the back of his throat and instead stammered, "The Jurists... are... are th-they fed?"

	"Ebon..."

	"I was... in the m-middle of making breakfast."  Ebon gulped.  "I... r-remember dropping so much.  Please... t-tell me they still got to eat something—"

	"Ebon, please."  Eagle nuzzled the stallion, stroking his cheek before staring him in the eye.  "For just a moment, humor me.  Tell me how you are feeling.  You."

	Ebon bit his lip.  "I... I feel like something's burning inside of me."

	"Like you have a fever?"

	Ebon slowly shook his head, wincing from the effort.  "It's... it's more than that.  It's like... like..."

	Eagle watched, listening quietly.

	"...like something is wanting to come out of me," Ebon wheezed.  "Something huge... something loud."

	Eagle glanced nervously at the bulkheads.

	"EE?  What... what if this is something to do with what's always plagued me?"  Ebon gulped.  "What if this is something I can't outrun?"

	"You'll get better," Eagle murmured, steeling his nerves.  "You will.  Trust me."

	"Eagle Eye..."

	The stallion sniffled and glanced up at Ebon.

	Ebon squinted.  "Do I need to believe that or do you?"

	Eagle's lips pursed.  He fumbled for words.  Before his eyes could grow misty, he leaned in and hugged Ebon closely.

	Ebon shivered in Eagle's warm grip.  He slithered his hooves out from underneath and gently held onto Eagle's shoulders.

	"This is all my f-fault," Eagle murmured, voice shaky.  "I should have been watching you closer.  I should have stayed around you all hours of the day..."

	"Eagle...?"  Ebon breathed.  "H-How could this possibly be your fault?"

	"... ... ..."

	"It's... it's not b-because of you that I'm feeling worst off than Rainbow Dash right now," Ebon said with a nervous chuckle.  A blink or two later, he grimaced.  "How... how is Rainbow Dash doing?"  He gulped.  "Did... did she and Roarke ever come back, or...?"

	"Yes..."  Eagle Eye leaned back, rubbing his cheeks dry.  "They c-came back, Ebon."

	"That's..."  Ebon exhaled through a week smile.  He cuddled up against the blankets on the cot and stared at Eagle sideways.  "That's wonderful to hear, EE..."

	Eagle Eye bit his lip, fidgeting.

	Ebon blinked.  "Isn't it, though?"

	A plastic smile.  "Of c-course it is, Ebon."

	Ebon's eyes narrowed further.  "Then why do you look like you've seen a ghost?"

	Eagle gulped.  "It's... uhm..."  He ran a hoof shakily through his mane.  "...it's because of who or what Rainbow Dash came back with."

	Ebon's tired eyes fluttered. "Who?"

	"Changelings, Ebon," Eagle droned.  "They're... uh... they're in the Amulek town hall as we speak."



	Ponies shouted.  Ponies hollered.  Ponies pointed hooves and bellowed.

	A thin line of changelings squatted pensively behind Rainbow Dash and Roarke.  Their black exoskeletons rattled with each exclamation booming forth from the angry crowd.  Not far away, beneath the flickering torchlight, Pilate, Bellesmith, and Josho stood.  They stared worriedly at the shape-shifters, then back at Rainbow Dash.

	Rainbow needed to lean against Roarke, for her dizziness had barely cleared.  Rubbing a hoof over her sweating brow, she stared thinly—sickly—past the torchlight and into the crowd as more and more ponies clamored for attention, attempting in vain to shout their angry words above their likewise furious comrades.

	Hooves stomped and nostrils flared.  Finally—goggles glinting—Booster Spice galloped bravely into the center of the chamber and waved his hooves.  He shouted louder and louder, the volume of his voice gradually overtaking the bedlam echoing off the wooden support beams.  "Order... Order... Can we have some order and quiet for one second?!"

	Drakshaa stormed forward, his snarling voice devouring the brief silence at the end of Booster's exclamation.  "Just as soon as those sniveling, snake-in-a-grass monsters get carted out of this accursed town!"

	"YEAH!" shouted the whole group of villagers.

	Drakshaa pointed an angry hoof at the creatures behind Rainbow Dash.  "It was them!  Them all along!"  He gnashed his teeth.  "They drove us out of the mines!  They drove us into poverty!"

	"They saved all our lives, Drakshaa!" Booster hollered in the stallion's face.  "Didn't you hear a single word they said?!"

	"And you can get wheeled out of town along with them if you believe their stupid bullshit, Booster!"  More ponies cheered.

	Booster stomped his hooves.  "Dang it, Drakshaa!  The real monsters are out there!  Holed up inside Silver Point!  I saw them with my very own eyes!  The only reason the three of us came back to the village in one piece is because these changelings saved our sorry hides!"

	"Saved us from what exactly?!"  Drakshaa turned and hissed at the flinching metamorphs.  "They've ruined us, ya goggled dumbass!  If they really wanted to save our village, they would have done the right thing and fed their worthless, mutated flanks to these supposed monsters so that all the filth would have their fill!  Then maybe they'd fly away and bother another town that deserves this crap more than we do!"

	"YEAH!" the whole room roared again.

	"It's... nnngh..."  Rainbow rubbed her scalp.  "It's like I tried t-telling you," Rainbow murmured, seething through her dizzying pain.  "These monsters... these chaos abominations... I've s-seen the likes of them before.  They're way too numerous and too strong for just any small group of ponies to handle.  Changelings or not—"

	"How can you be so stupid, outsider?!" Drakshaa spat.  "They're in league with each other!  Can't your stupid ass see that?!"

	"Use the word 'stupid' to describe her one more time, breeder, and I'll replace every bone in your body with your own feces," Roarke snarled.

	"Roarke..."

	"These changelings aren't the only ones who gave their all to save this village," Roarke said loudly.  "Rainbow nearly killed herself back there trying to distract the monsters from inside the mountain!  If she can't tackle this threat on her own, nothing can!"

	"The Val Roans can!"  Drakshaa frowned.  "With a threat this big, we can finally convince them to come in with their royal machinery!"  He hollered, "Incincerate everything that moves inside the mines, I say!  If we have to peel off the charred flesh left on the ore, so be it!  We're sick and tired of all this stupid nonsense!"  He raised a hoof high in the air.  "Who's with me?!"

	Ponies cheered and thundered their hooves.

	Belle struggled to shout, "If we can all just be calm and talk this over—"

	"No more!" Drakshaa yelled.  "We've had enough of outsiders making problems into even bigger problems!  Send them on their way—"

	"Drakshaa, we'd be in the dark if it weren't for them!" Booster exclaimed.

	"You wanna join them, Booster?!  You've been about as useful as a rusty pickaxe as of late anyways!"

	"Oh, of all the lousy—"  Booster shook his hoof.

	"Go on and hit me if you like, punk!"  Drakshaa barked.  "The day you choose treacherous freaks over your own kind is the day that you've finally lost it—"

	"ENOUGH!" Merigold's voice resonated across the hall.

	The villagers instantly silenced.  Nervous families huddled together, trembling.

	Drakshaa stepped back from Booster, fuming quietly, allowing room for the elderly mare to step down from her seat and slowly approach Rainbow and the changelings.  Merigold's eyes narrowed as she spoke airily, "I have heard many words... and yet I haven't heard enough.  If you would be so kind, Miss Dash, to explain to me what exactly we are dealing with."

	"Well, ma'am... I..."  Rainbow fidgeted, glancing back at the changelings immediately behind her.  "I can't exactly... I mean, not on my own—"

	"With the assistance of your unique company, if need be," Merigold said.

	Drakshaa gasped.  "But, Merigold—!"

	Merigold raised a hoof into his face without looking.

	The stallion clenched his jaw, glaring Rainbow's direction.

	Rainbow exhaled.  She pressed Roarke's shoulder, and the metal mare reluctantly let her go.  Standing on wobbly legs, Rainbow cleared her voice and took a step or two forward.  "These creatures before you may look like monsters... they might even sound and smell like monsters.  But, trust me, they are not what they look like."

	Ponies immediately stirred and murmured in disbelief.  Booster whistled shrilly, silencing the crowd for Rainbow to continue speaking.

	"And that may be a tough pill to swallow, considering that they're capable of  looking and sounding and smelling like anything.  But... you've got to believe me... you've got to believe us."  Rainbow looked over her shoulder and nodded at the Jurists.  Josho and Belle nodded back, and they took a few steps forward with Pilate.  "We've seen them at their worse, and they've since changed," Rainbow continued.  "They've changed for the better.  They used to answer to one authority and one authority alone, but that's changed.  They no longer answer to a malicious calling."

	"That's a very intriguing notion, Miss Dash."  Merigold squinted.  "Could you, perchance, stand to be less vague?"

	Rainbow opened her mouth—but one of the changelings stepped up and spoke boldly.  "Our Mother is no longer in control of us."

	Ponies instantly murmured upon hearing the changeling speak.

	Drakshaa's face wrinkled in confusion.  Merigold took a few steps closer.  "Your... Mother?"

	"It's not all that disimilar to how the ponies of Amulek obey you, Governess," the changeling said, its green eyes flickering above its fangs.  "Only, they follow you through respect and admiration.  For us, our Mother was the source of everything.  We felt and fed and lived through her.  But all she fed us was misery, and like mindless drones, we accepted what she gave us—for we confused it with love, the most nourishing emotion of all."

	"But not anymore..."

	The changeling shook its head.  "No, ma'am.  That all changed weeks ago."  She turned and glanced bashfully at Rainbow Dash.  "It changed when she found a way to break Mother's control over us.  Now... we are free."  The changeling grimaced.  "Although... it has left us no less confused and frightened..."

	"Governess..."  Booster Spice turned towards the old mare.  "In all of the dragon's attacks, it never ever tried to harm us physically.  And now we know that it was them all along and—"

	Merigold daintily waved him off.  "I'm in no need of your genius intellect right now, Booster."

	Booster hung his head, shuddering.  "S-sorry, Governess..."

	"Quite alright..."  Merigold paced slowly around the group of Jurists and changelings.  "You, creature..."  She singled out the shape-shifter right next to Rainbow Dash.  "You're rather well-spoken for a 'form-swapping freak,' as my children are so apt to call you."

	The changeling shivered.  "We... are g-good at emulating ponies around us."

	"I see."  Merigold nodded.  "Then you have been emulating the ponies of Amulek?"

	"You were... th-the first souls we found outside of our nest when our connection with Mother was broken," the changeling hesitantly said.  "The love and the comraderie you all share is palpable... and palatable.  Just being within miles of your town is enough to sustain us for—"

	"Sustain you?"  Merigold blinked.  "Then you mean to feed on us?"

	Ponies murmured in fright.  The changeling struggled to speak above them.  "It was Mother's desire for us to do such a thing when she made her nest in the mountain to begin with!  But since we lost contact with her, we lost all nefarious desires!  Please... I-I wish I could prove this to you somehow!"

	"You could prove it by being forthright about every single detail that you know!" Merigold exclaimed.

	"Ma'am, if I may..."  Rainbow Dash stepped forward.  "It's impossible for them to know every single detail."

	"And you do, I'm guessing?"

	"I know a lot," Rainbow said, nodding.  She teetered a bit, gulped, and continued.  "For instance, I know that this 'Mother' that she refers to is in fact a Changeling Queen named 'Chrysalis.'  She feeds off the misery of entire kingdoms of ponies.  She takes their love and twists it into something evil that she can control and then feed to her hive."

	"To what end?"

	"To gain power," Rainbow Dash said.  "So she can reinforce her sibling who's at war on the dark side of the world."

	Merigold and Drakshaa both collectively blinked at that.

	"Nnnngh..."  Rainbow Dash waved her hooves.  "Look, I-I know there's a whole lot of crud to take in.  Basically, what you need to know is that my gang and I have run into Chrysalis before.  Somehow, I was able to reach through her control of her children and give the entire changeling brood a taste of harmony.  This—like—severed their intense connection with Chrysalis."  She pointed at the small group of metamorphs.  "These guys—and the others outside—are the first bunch of changelings we've discovered since our last run-in.  Somehow, I wouldn't doubt that there're bunches of shape-shifters stuck in random places all over the surface world, abandoned and lost, not knowing what to do with their newfound freedom."

	"You mean like terrorizing an entire town full of non-freaks?!"  Drakshaa snarled.  Despite Merigold's insistence, he further spat, "Just where do you get off?!"

	"Please... you have to understand..."  The changeling beside Rainbow Dash stammered.  "There was no other way!  We know!  Because we tried!"

	"Really?"  Drakshaa frowned.  "How?!"

	"Weeks ago, we first came to this village posing as wealthy ponies seeking to buy out the town and the mines!  We even salvaged some silver from the mountain itself to make it look like we were rich!"

	Booster Spice murmured aside, "The suited stallions from the north..."

	"Good heavens," Merigold murmured, holding a hoof over her muzzle  "No wonder they were so awkward..."

	"You can't buy silver with less silver," Drakshaa muttered.  "Friggin' idiots..."

	"And do you remember the week after?" the changeling exclaimed.  "The Val Roan officials with the royal decree for relocation?"

	"You mean those charlatans were you too?!"  Booster Spice stammered.  He grinned stupidly.  "Wow, you don't know what Val Roans even look like, huh?!"

	"It never occurred to you to simply appear to us as you truly are?" Merigold inquired.

	The changeling shook its head.  "Judging from today's reaction, would we have gotten any better a reception then?"

	Drakshaa rolled his eyes.

	Merigold glanced at him, then at the speechless villagers seated all around the hall.  She sighed and looked straight ahead.  "Allow me to guess, you ran out of options?"

	"We were hatched to be agents of misery and destruction," the changeling said.  "It occurred to us that the best way to handle this situation was to do so naturally.  If we couldn't convince your village to flee out of harm's reach, then perhaps we could frighten you into action."

	"And then you took on the dragon form?" Merigold remarked.

	"But wait..."  Booster Spice scratched his head.  "The dragon started attacking us months ago."

	"We know," the changeling hesitantly said.  "That... w-was Mother's doing.  Among her many experiments, she was attempting to find a way to have mass broodlings impersonate the Dark Divine that she had in her employ."

	"Nevlamas, Governess," Rainbow Dash explained.  "It was a creature sent to destroy the ponies who lived on a continent far to the west."

	"Ledomare and Xona, ma'am," Pilate spoke up.  "It's where my beloved and I hail from."

	"For decades, they had been locked in a bloody, ongoing conflict," Belle said.  "Entire generations had been invested in the war."

	"Chrysalis sought to use the war in her favor," Pilate explained.  "She seized an immortal dragon already corrupted by chaos and used her diseased flesh to construct something called 'chaos strips.'  These strips are capable of tapping into the discordant miasma through which our plane drifts and summoning horrible, otherworldly abominations."

	"Just like the ones inside your mountain," Rainbow said.  "Chrysalis had gone so far as to replace a Xonan monarch and control entire legions of otherwise innocent Xonans."  She gulped, fighting dizziness still.  "This same changeling queen threw prisoners into a giant flying city called Stratopolis, using the ancient sentinel to accomplish her own means.  It's... really n-not hard to believe that she was doing something similarly evil in this continent as well.  In fact, the reason why my friends and I have come this far is because we heard word of an invasion she was attempting to stage on Val Roa."

	"An invasion?!" Merigold breathed.

	"Or something like it!  I'm not sure exactly..."  Rainbow sighed.  "But shoving a nest full of changelings and chaos monsters inside your mountain makes total sense, because it's such a good staging area."  She winced.  "Erm... you know what I mean."

	"No, Miss Dash."  Merigold shook her head.  "I don't.  All of this that you're telling me, it goes beyond the heads of simple miners such as oureslves—"

	"But it's all true!" the changeling exclaimed, shivering.  "Mother had so much planned here!"

	"Then perhaps you can tell us what her plans were!"

	"I... I wish that we could."  The changeling winced.  "We... were s-severed before her message became clear."

	"Was she ever here?"  Merigold leaned her head to the side.  "This 'Chrysalis?'"

	"Once.  Long ago.  When we were first hatched," the changeling said.  "Of this, we are sure.  But she left at some point, and she gave her commands from afar.  That's what led us to guard over the silver that she had corrupted in your mountain.  That's also what taught us to take on the form of Nevlamas.  We all feel something tugging us east—which we're now told is in the direction of your Val Roa."

	"She probably wanted to send the whole arsenal in one fell swoop," Josho spoke up, his jaws tight.  "Dragons, changelings, chaos creeps—the whole works.  All that shock and awe would have made the Val Roans piss in their armor, without a damn doubt.  They'd probably have galloped straight into the Grand Choke."

	"But now that Chrysalis' connection is severed—"

	"She lost control of us.  But you have to understand, Governess..."  The changeling stepped forward.  "Nopony and nothing controls the chaos monsters now!"  Ponies throughout the hall murmured in fright.  She continued, "Only Mother knew the secret to overpowering them!  She must have personally overseen the transport of Nevlamas' spawn from Stratopolis to here!  But since we've been severed, we've lost our influence, and the creatures have been stirring in increasing levels of unrest!  Even now, as each hour of each day ticks by, we can feel them growing more wild and unpredictable!  Please understand, we haven't just been trying to get you ponies out of this valley... we've been trying to keep those monsters inside the mountain!  But we're failing!  We're failing on both fronts!"

	Ponies broke into a worrisome commotion, exchanging glances.

	"You must leave this town... you must leave this valley!"  The changeling's fangs glistened in the torchlight.  "I... I-I don't know what else to tell you to convince you!"

	Merigold paced closer.  "Even if all of this is true—"

	"And it totally is," Rainbow said.

	Merigold ignored her.  "I find it intriguing that you and your fellow 'hatchlings' ultimately decided that the best thing to do was continue terrorizing us in the dragonform that your 'Chrysalis' instructed you to do in the first place."

	"We... have never been skilled at diplomacy, ma'am," the changeling said, hanging its head.

	"You could have fooled me."

	"And we have," a voice said from the far end of the room.  "But only to understand more what we were dealing with, in hopes of learning a different, better solution."

	The entire room stirred.  Merigold turned aside, squinting into the shadows.  "Who speaks?  What is the meaning of this?"

	Three random villagers trotted into the center of the hall from the far corners of the room.  In the center, Rainbow spotted a familiar face.

	"Keebroo...?"

	"You have to forgive us, Governess," Keebroo said.  "While we knew that we had to drive you out of here, we... also h-had to feed.  It was the only way we could sustain ourselves throughout the whole effort."

	"Feed?"  Merigold blinked.  "What do you mean, child?"

	Rainbow gulped.  "Hoboy."

	"Huh?" Booster Spice glanced over.  "Why does this deserve a 'Hoboy?'"

	Keebroo took a deep breath.  In perfect coordination, he and the two ponies beside him vanished in a wave of green flame, replaced by three identical changelings.

	The entire room exploded in gasps and shrieks of shock.

	"Okay!"  Booster squeaked, shivering beside Rainbow Dash and Roarke.  "Definitely a 'hoboy!'"

	"You..."  Drakshaa slurred into a growing snarl.  "You were one of these deceitful manure bags the whole time?!"

	"You dare replace three of ours?!" Merigold said, the hairs on her wrinkly neck rising up.  "We had thought they had fled Amulek with their families!"

	"And they did, Governess!" the changeling who was Keebroo exclaimed.  "We simply found strategic ways to pretend that these three hadn't, and in that way we facilitated our place among the township!"

	"To do what?!"  Drakshaa growled.  "To spy on us?!"

	"Not... a very smart revelation," Roarke muttered out the side of her mouth.

	The changeling glanced at her.  "We were told to be completely forthright!"  It turned towards the gawking villagers.  "And so we are!  No more secrets!  No more shadows!  We have..."  It winced.  "...greatly underestimated the fierce love and loyalty that you ponies share with one another.  This is something we've learned overtime, even while sharing the emotions we've sampled in this town to keep ourselves alive.  Please, understand, we only ever wanted to relocate you!  We've never meant to dissolve you as a culture!"

	"That's not the way I'm seeing it!"  Drakshaa paced thunderously around.  He shouted at the onlooking ponies as much as at the changelings.  "Sounds to me like you decided to siphon us for all we had to give!"

	"What?!  No!  We just meant—"

	"To terrorize us from the outside and coddle us from within!  You call that helping us?!  Fuzzy skin or bug shells, I can smell a hypocrite when it's in the same room with me!"

	"Drakshaa," the changeling spoke.  "If a single one of you stepped into those mines you'd be eaten alive by what Mother planted in there—"

	"Do not call me by my name!"  Drakshaa pointed viciously at the creature.  "You are no friend of mine!  The real Keebroo may have been a total pushover, but at least he knew what it meant to be loyal!"

	"But—"

	"And not some deceitful bastard!"  Drakshaa spun towards the elder.  "Governess, are you gonna friggin' stand for this?!  These freaks have been eating us from the inside out!  What more evidence do you need?!"

	The whole hall erupted in angry shouts and furious rants.

	Josho glared left and right.  Belle and Pilate held each other nervously.

	"Hey... Hey!"  Rainbow Dash hovered on weak wings, wincing slightly.  "Cut them some slack!  Come on!"

	"Quiet, outsider."  Drakshaa grunted.  "You've said enough—"

	"No, you shut up, jerkface!"  Rainbow frowned at the crowd.  "Less than a month ago, these changelings knew nothing but misery!  They were fed nothing but the stuff!  All the time!  They devoured pain day and night, courtesy of a selfish mutated Alicorn who's willing to risk anything—even the lives and welfare of her own hatchlings—just to accomplish some stupid agenda in a far off place!  Suddenly, overnight, they're free creatures who desire harmony and love!  Can't you friggin' forgive them for taking a few bumps and making goofy mistakes along the way?!  I mean—for Pete's sake!"  Rainbow flung two hooves towards the hall's entrance.  "Your mountain's filled to the brim with life-eating chaos serpents!  Love these changelings or leave 'em, nothing's going to change the fact that all this time they were trying their darnedest to save you from a very real... very dangerous... very chaotic threat!"

	Belle spoke up, "They might seem monsterous on the surface, but they only mean well!  And as hard as it may to believe, Rainbow and the rest of the jurists witnessed them turn leaf first hoof!"

	"They ambushed us in the flying city of Stratopolis, governess," Pilate said.  "But then—within a day—they all turned and helped free us from the very same threat.  They are capable of good.  You just need to give them the benefit of a doubt!"

	"And if you don't, then you'll end up as bad as the Ledomaritans and Xonans back west!" Josho said firmly.  "Even worse!  The whole lot of us have yet to see what can really happen when these friggin' fart monsters are let loose on an innocent pony populace.  Hell, back in Xona, Rainbow stopped Nevlamas and Chrysalis before the absolute worst could happen!"

	Silence hung in the room.

	At last, Merigold took a deep breath.  She trotted towards Rainbow Dash.  "These friends... they speak for you..."

	"Yes, ma'am.  They do."

	"And do they speak the truth?"

	Rainbow blinked.  "Of... of c-course!"

	Merigold frowned.  "And just what would you have me do, Rainbow Dash?  Flee from our very own home?"  She waved at the creatures.  "Give in to these imposters demand and trust them more than my own flesh and blood... my own instincts?"

	"I know that it's a lot to take in, Governess—"

	"No."  Merigold shook her head.  "You don't know.  Your travels sound remarkable and they sound perilous.  But a life lived in the air, constantly on the move, is a far cry from the weight of having to dissolve the only home you've known for generations."

	"Governess, with all due respect."  Rainbow Dash touched back down beside Roarke.  "I've given up more than you think.  There are nights when I can't stop dwelling on what I've lost... and what I've sacrificed.  But..."  She bit her lip, glanced aside at Roarke, and sighed.  "...if I chose to regret all of those changes, I would choose to reject what I am now.  And that's impossible.  In spite of all of the highs and lows, I'm proud of who I am and where I am—even if there is no 'where' to be drawn on a map."

	"How do you expect us to even possibly relate to that, Miss Dash?"

	Rainbow's ruby eyes narrowed.  "Because, in the end, loyalty is the best home you can ever have." She gulped.  "This village may not survive, but your villagers can.  Leave this place..."

	The entire room erupted in shock and anger.

	Rainbow spoke louder.  "Leave!  And we'll help you get the Val Roans to come here and—"

	"And do what?!"  Drakshaa snarled.  "Build us all aircraft so we can fly around the world, disturbing the peace like you?!"

	"No!  I mean—"

	"Silence!"  Merigold exclaimed.  "All of you!"  As the room died down, she gave Rainbow an exhausted look, and then the changelings an even more exhausted look.  After a firm breath, she said, "Leave us."

	"But—!"  The changeling that was Keebroo stepped forward.  "Governess—!"

	"Leave now!" Merigold growled.  "Leave the premises!  We will talk again when I decide.  I must... deliberate on this..."

	"And just how long do you intend to do that?!" Roarke spoke up.  "Rainbow and the rest of us have told you everything you need to know about the looming threat and—"

	"I know, metal one!" Merigold retorted, eyes like daggers.  "That is why I am asking you to leave rather than forcing you by knife point!"  She pointed out the front entrance.  "Until you can claim to have selfless ancestors who've lived and died on this land, you cannot pretend to make decisions for it.  Now, depart, before my patient draws thin."

	Gradually, the ponies broke up, murmuring in shattered clusters.

	The changelings exchanged glances.  Their eyes flickered green in cadence, and they buzzed limply out the front entrance, causing local villagers to flinch and gawk at them.

	Rainbow Dash was panting as if having galloped up hill.  She tried taking a step, but stumbled.  Roarke caught the wincing pegasus.  Using her weight, the metal mare helped Rainbow out the door, where they were joined by the limping trot of Josho, Belle, and Pilate.

	Booster Spice looked all around, biting his lip.  Finally, with a nervous breath, he galloped out, joining the jurists.

	Drakshaa stood in the center of the hall, fuming with folded forelimbs.  As the crowd gradually broke up, he drew over his face, sighing as his features went slack... dull.
		//------------------------------//
		// A Very, Very Chaotic Problem		//------------------------------//

	The sun was setting red and rosy over the western reaches of Amulek.  On the opposite side of the sleepy village, between where the treeline began and where the fog rolled in, a cluster of ponies stood under swaying branches in a chilly wind.  Changelings hung in the shadows, several of them perched on the branches as their clear eyes lingered on the town hall at a distance.

	"Well, that went about as well as a Ledo passing a watermelon-sized kidney stone," Josho grunted.  "And by that, of course, I mean 'as well as could be expected.'"

	"I can't understand the Governess!  This shouldn't have to take some long, overwrought decision!" Booster Spice stammered, pacing in a loose circle.  "Why can't she see what's right in front of her?!"

	"More like what's looming above her," Pilate said.  His ears twitched to the sound of several sets of hooves swiveling his way.  "What?  Surely a blind zebra can still use metaphors of 'sight.'"

	"Ahem..."  Belle turned towards Booster.  "The meeting could certainly have gone better.  A lot of startling bits of information were thrown on your town all in one heap."

	"Granted, there truly is no way to soften that sort of a blow," Pilate said.

	"We had to convey the urgency of the situation to her!" a changeling said.  "Even before the one called Rainbow Dash arrived, we were starting to realize how impossible our venture had become—"

	"You should have known better than to have infiltrated their ranks like they were some enemy batallion!" Roarke shouted, marching into the feeble changeling's face, forcing the creature to fall on its shivering haunches.  She further snarled, "At least you could have remained hidden!  I don't know where in your cockroach minds you thought it was excusable to use the facade of Keebroo and the other two as some sort of diplomatic bargaining chip!"

	"I... but we... we just—"

	"Roarke..."  Rainbow wheezed, leaning tiredly against a tree.  Her eyes flickered red-on-yellow then back as she winced.  "Just... l-lay off for once..."

	"No!  I shall not!"  Roarke snarled, all-but-spitting in the nervous changeling's muzzle.  "They've made it perfectly clear that they're more than self-aware of their own inexperience!  They should have come up with a less risky plan than continuing the hijinks of their putrid matriarch!"

	"She does have a point, Rainbow," Josho grunted.  "It wasn't very smart."

	"We c-couldn't leave these ponies!" The changeling gulped.  "We just couldn't abandon them in the shadow of these chaotic abominations!  Like Mother abandoned us!"

	"I do not buy for a second that you are as helpless as you paint yourselves to be," Roarke hissed.

	"Roarke—" Rainbow wheezed.

	"I've seen you in action!" Roarke shouted.  "I've seen you consume lives and transform entire kingdoms!"  She flung a hoof in the air.  "You could have stolen those chaos strips away!  You could have destroyed them!  You could have done anything but just leave them as a death trap for everypony around you!  Just look at what the discordant energy is doing to Rainbow Dash—!"

	"Dammit, Roarke, would you—nngnh!"  Rainbow collapsed onto the grass beneath the trees.

	"Rainbow!" Belle shouted.

	Roarke spun, gasping.  She rushed over to the pegasus' side.

	Belle, Pilate, and Josho were already there.  Booster Spice and the changelings watched over their shoulders, nervously.  Roarke rushed down and scooped Rainbow up.

	The mare panted and panted, her thin eyes flickering in and out of ruby brilliance.  "Nnnngh... Roarke, don't..."  She gulped.  "D-don't blame them for that.  You and I b-both know it ain't the changelings fault for what's... h-happening to me."  She shuddered, ears folding back.  "Celestia, it's getting so light..."

	"Oh Spark... bl-blessed Spark!"  Belle held a hoof over her muzzle as tears welled up in her eyes.  "Roarke, we have t-to get her on board the Jury!  There's still room in the infirmary beside Ebon—"

	"Ding Dong, relax..."  Rainbow reached a hoof out and touched her shoulder.  She smild warily.  "I know it looks bad... but it'll pass—"

	"And they keep getting worse, though, Rainbow!" Belle shrieked.  She hiccuped on a sob and leaned on Pilate's frame as she said, "How 'bad' are they going to look until you can't even stand to breathe?!"

	"I... tr-try not to stress so bad about tomorrow."

	"Rainbow, for Spark's sake—"

	"For real..."  Rainbow hissed, shook, and struggled to sit up.  Roarke ultimately helped her, and Rainbow rested dizzily on her haunches.  "Let's not change the subject.  There's more at risk here than me."  She turned and stared up at the changelings in the trees with thin eyes.  "What if Merigold decides to move all the villagers out of town.  Then what?"

	"That's not going to matter!" one of them said.  "Don't you get it?"

	"Lay it on me."

	"The abominations are growing restless at an exponential rate!" another one of the shape-shifters spoke up.  "We can't guess when or at what time, but they're going to grow weary of feasting on wildlife in the forest surrounding the mountains!"

	"They've already done this...?" Pilate nervously asked.

	"Several times!" another said, nodding its dark head.  "Nopony understands just how many times we've saved the ponies of Amulek time and time again from a narrow brush with death!  There were days when the monsters were practically nipping at their hooves!"

	"And just now?" Roarke asked, still fuming.  "When we lost Whizzball due north of here?"

	Josho spun and blinked at her.  "Oh, did you, now?"

	"Silence, obese one," Roarke grunted.

	"Hrmmff..."

	A changeling was already replying to her.  "That was the largest outburst of the creatures yet," it explained.  "They only returned to mountain because either there was nothing left living in the vicinity to feast on, or their silver strips still had cohesion.  But, soon enough, the strips will no longer be able to contain their own structure.  They've been gradually dissolving since Mother abandoned this place."

	"Then that means...?" Pilate began.

	The changeling shuddered as it said, "They will have nothing anchoring them to the mountain anymore.  There will be nothing to draw them back from their holding place."

	"Where will they go?" Booster Spice asked in a quiet voice.

	"Simple.  Where there is life," the changeling said.  "They feast on more than just emotion.  They devour harmony, for they are chaos incarnates."

	Another changeling spoke up, "They will consume Amulek in an instant, turning all living flesh into ragged strips of distorted meat. And then they will take their feast as far as their boundless energy will carry them.  Even to Val Roa and abroad."

	"Durandana..."  Pilate murmured.  "...Alafreo."

	Belle gulped.  "Luxmare..."

	Rainbow Dash sighed, leaning against Roarke's limbs.  "Equestria."  She gulped.  "I get it."  She looked up.  "And what if we get a powerful bunch of ponies here to stop them?  Like the Val Roans."

	"Rainbow Dash, there simply isn't enough time!" a changeling stammered.  "That's why it's absurd to wait for Merigold!"  It gestured at the group.  "Even discussing this with our mouths like normal ponies is a terrible waste of time!"

	"Surely we must mutually discover a solution to this problem—" Pilate began.

	"And these 'Val Roans' will not properly eliminate the threat!" the changeling stated.  "It doesn't matter what sort of weaponry they have in their arsenal!"

	Roarke's lenses pistoned outward upon hearing that.  "Why would that be so?"

	"Isn't it obvious?"  One of the changelings in the trees spoke up.  "Of all emotion, anger is the closest ally of chaos.  That's why Mother was so keen to harvest these things from the dragon called 'Nevlamas.'  Her goal was to spread malice so that we—her children—might consume it and make her strong."

	"So... what you're trying to tell us..."  Josho scratched his chins.  "...is that if we send a bunch of soldiers into the mountains to blow these freaktards up—"

	"It will only strengthen them!" the changeling said.  "Of this, we are most certain!  The abominable feast will quadruple in strength and ferocity!"

	"Somehow, I totally believe that," Rainbow Dash said.

	"Then there is no proper solution at this point," Roarke droned.

	"Roarke," Belle sighed.  "We can't simply dismiss—"

	"It was folly to come here," Roarke said.  "I don't care what Rainbow Dash has seen in her visions."

	"Roarke—" Rainbow protested.

	"It's decided."  Roarke hoisted Rainbow Dash up and tried leaning her over her flank.  "We're leaving.  Us, Rainbow, the Jury."

	"Roarke, nnngh... stop—"

	"We must make as much distance between us and this damned mountain as conceivably possible—"

	"Dammit, Roarke, stop trying to protect me!" Rainbow shoved off of her.  She teetered a bit, but found her balance in time to glare at the metal mare.  "Stop it!"  She aimed her frown at the others.  "All of you!"  Her hooves stomped in the ground.  "I love you and I get that you all love me too but why can't we just wrap our heads around the fact that there are some things bigger than me and the rest of us combined?!"

	Roarke stared back, lips quivering.  Her lenses retracted, and in a very quiet voice she said, "I do not wish to lose you."

	Rainbow clenched her eyes shut.  She fought the urge to sniffle.  One wobbly step after another, she shuffled towards the mare and gently took two of her hooves in her own.  "Roarke... sexy girl..."  She opened a pair of eyes.  Tiny tears refracted the flicker of red and yellow as she said, "You lost me long before you ever had me." 

	Roarke's ears folded back.

	Rainbow took a shuddering breath.  She swallowed a lump down her throat and looked over at Belle and Pilate.  "Bellesmith... Pilate... I... I-I'm so sorry."  She tried hobbling over towards them.  The pair met her halfway, holding her up.  "You... you guys know me.  I was soaring my way east long before I made the best friends a homesick pegasus ever could.  After all the dragons I've kicked and zombies I've headbutted, I'll be damned if I'm going to breathe the last breaths of my life while running away from something."

	Belle nodded, a tear running down her cheek.  "We know, Rainbow Dash."

	"We do understand," Pilate said.  "But..."  He tilted his head up.  "What can we do?"

	"I..."  Rainbow winced.  She turned towards Roarke, who had her head bowed.  A cold breath.  "I don't know..."

	"It is not your place to know, Rainbow Dash," one of the changelings above said.  "It was never your place.  Not once did we expect the pony who freed us to cross our paths."

	"Yeah, well... she has."  Rainbow looked up.  "So, what now?  There's gotta be some sort of silver bullet."

	"Maybe at one point, there would have been," the changelings siad.  "But it is far too late for that now.  The abominations are restless, and we are the ones responsible for the terror they're about to unleash."

	"Hrmmmmf..."  Josho folded his forelimbs with a frown.  "Told you we shouldn't have dicked around in that Pegasus Sex Crater..."

	"Cram it, breeder," Roarke groaned.

	"Roarke—" Rainbow entreated her.

	"We must not tarry here any longer," the changelings overhead said.  One by one, they took flight, their wings buzzing.  "We must go."

	"Go?!"  Booster Spice gawked at them through his goggles.  "Go where?!"

	"We will head back to the mountain.  All of us."

	"Just how many of you are there?" Roarke asked.

	"Less than fifty," one explained.  "Even if we had two hundred, it doesn't make our task any easier."

	"And just what sort of a plan do you have in motion?" Pilate asked.

	"We will attempt to forge a wall using our own bodies," one changeling said.  "A wall that will block the exit from the cave."

	"What good will that do?!" Booster sputtered.  "We saw these creatures!  They were see-through ethereal monstrosities!  How could you possibly hold them back?!"

	"We must nevertheless try."

	"Yeah, and you will die in the process!"

	"If that is the case, so be it."

	Booster clammed up, blinking.  He hung his head with a sigh.  "There has to be another way..."

	"There is not," one changeling said.  "If we go now, we and our siblings can perhaps corner the monsters against the metal walls.  There, they might find solace among the metal strips and delay their inevitable—"

	"Wait... wait wait wait."  Rainbow Dash held her hooves up.  "...did you just say 'metal walls?'"

	"Mmmm.  Indeed."  One changeling nodded.  "Deep in the belly of the mountain."

	"But..."  Booster squinted.  "Drakshaa and his miners never found any such—"

	"It dwells deeper than any possible mineshaft.  Mother had the changelings who facilitated our hatching bore a hole to its location months ago.  What her plan was with the material, we cannot fathom, but it has acted as a secure base against which the strips were deposited."

	Roarke gulped.  She turned towards Rainbow.  "Rainbow..."

	Rainbow, in the meantime, was staring northeast.  The Yaerfaerda symbol flicked before her, brighter than ever.

	"Rainbow..."  Roarke trotted closer, nearly breathless.  "Wh-what are you thinking...?"

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  "...that we need to get on board Floydien's ship right friggin' now."  She turned and looked wearily at the metal mare.  "We'd better get the whole Jury in session over this..."

		//------------------------------//
		// On the Willows There, We...		//------------------------------//

	"Are you loco in the coco?!" Props' voice echoed against the nearby treetops.  "You'll turn to mush mush from those snake thingies before you can do anything!"

	Meanwhile Eagle Eye carried Ebon Mane up the stairwell.  The mercenary and cook leaned against one another.  Eagle Eye blinked while Ebon squinted into the starlight.

	The Jurists were gathered all across the top deck of the Jury.  Booster Spice stood with them while a cluster of changelings clung to the skystone crystal and its support struts above.

	"EE...?" Ebon murmured nervously.

	"Spark alive."  Eagle gulped.  "These guys again."

	"Props, there's a piece of the machine world deep inside that mountain," Rainbow wheezed, hovering weakly in the center of the group.  "I've seen this sort of thing multiple times.  Where there's a layer of metal, there's a door.  I can totally fly in there, draw the chaos creatures after me, and seal them away for good."

	"Dashie, not everything is like White Rap!"

	"Windthrow."

	Props waved her forelimbs around.  "You could be flying into a death trap!  Or a dead end!  That's the deathliest death trap of all!"

	Zaid trotted forward, resting a calm hoof on Props' shivering shoulder.  "Rainbow, for real."  He gulped.  "You didn't find a door in Durandana.  So what makes you so darn sure there's gonna be one here?"

	"Durandana was a fluke," Rainbow said.  "A crater caused the metal layer of the world to be exposed.  Nothing else."  Rainbow's ruby-eyed gaze swam across the group.  "This mountain is different.  I see something glowing in the heart of it—"

	"Rainbow?!"  Props frowned.  "Just because some Yogi Bearra symbol is calling for you doesn't make it the same as the flame you've huffed before!"

	"You're right."  Rainbow nodded.  "This makes it all the more important for me to investigate.  To find out for sure what it is and what it means."  She gulped hard, pointing northeast.  "Something's gotta be done about the abominations that are chomping at the bit to fly out of the mountain and ravage every living thing on this continent.  I... I feel as if Yaerfaerda is calling to me."  She shook her head.  "I'm too close to ignore it now."

	"The paint bucket boomer has always had her own glimmer shimmer," Floydien said.  "This does not surprise Floydien."

	"Don't joke, handsome!"  Props yelped, her eyes welling up with tears.  "Dashie could die!  Don't you g-get that?!"  She fell on her haunches, shivering.  Zaid leaned in and nuzzled her close.

	"Or, y'know, Lil' Miss Awesomeness could not die."  He looked up, ears folded.  "Right...?"

	Rainbow Dash bit her lip.  She turned and looked at where Pilate and Belle stood with Kera, then at Roarke.

	"Rainbow...?"

	Rainbow looked across the top deck.

	Eagle Eye gently placed Ebon down.  The cook leaned against a skystone support beam while Eagle trotted closer.  "Take us with you!  We've fought terrible creatures before!  We... w-we could hold these things off while you take your dive into the heart of the mountain!"

	"I'm afraid I can't do that, EE," Rainbow said.  "Whizzball is down for the count.  Even as light as you are, carrying you alone would slow me down."  A bittersweet chuckle.  "Don't even bring Josho into the equation..."

	"We really must be going," one of the changelings stammered.  "Even as we speak, the monsters are stirring, more and more restless."

	"What about th-this ship?!" Booster spoke aloud.  His goggles glinted in the starlight as he smiled.  "You can fly her there and provide cover!"

	"If you're near the mouth of the mountain when the monsters fly loose," another changeling said, "You will all be the first to be consumed."

	"They fly faster than you can imagine," explained another.  "The only reason they didn't catch up to Rainbow Dash and her two friends this morning is because we collectively distracted them."

	"Well, we c-can't just abandon her here!" Eagle Eye stammered, increasingly breathless.  "Not with the way sh-she's been feeling lately and... and... and..."

	"Kiddo," Josho spoke up, his tone neutral.  "We've got the fastest ship this side of the continent.  If things go south here in Amulek, Val Roa's going to need forewarning of this catastrophe."

	"The fat boomer is right," Floydien muttered.  "Nancy Jane may be the only thing to prepare this world for the new spread of glimmer shimmer."

	"After all we've been through, we can't let that bastard Chrysalis win," Josho said.

	"I don't get it!"  Kera trotted forward on tiny hooves.  "Why would we be leaving Rainbow behind?!  We're gonna need her in Val Roa, r-right?"

	Rainbow leaned down towards her.  "I'm needed here, Kera.  I'm the only pony who can open up the machine world's door.  I'm the one soul who can seal the monsters away."

	"But why can't you join us in Val Roa?!"

	Rainbow Dash sighed heavily.  "Because I-I'm probably not coming back from this, Kera."

	Every Jurist hung their heads.

	Kera stared, her lips quivering beneath glossy green eyes.  "No... no...!"

	"I need you to be strong, Kera," Rainbow said firmly, squeezing her shoulder.  "For Pilate and Bellesmith.  They're going to need you from now on—"

	"Not without you!"  Kera flew forward and buried her sobbing face in Rainbow's chest.  "Not w-without you!"

	Rainbow clenched her jaw as she gently held the crying filly.  It was a tense effort, for the waves of dizziness still plagued the edges of her vision.

	Belle sniffled and leaned against Pilate's shoulder.  Props rubbed a hoof over her wet eyes while Zaid watched quietly.

	"Y-you c-can't just give up like th-this!" Kera whimpered.  "You just can't!  You're bigger than this!  Stronger than this!"

	"Kera..."  Rainbow stroked her back.  "Pssst... Scamp."  She tilted the filly's chin up and smiled at her.  "The fact that I'm bigger than this is precisely why I have to do what I've gotta do."

	"But... b-but..."

	"If I was the kind of pony to give up, I'd never have gotten past the borders of Equestria."  She smiled.  "I'd never have come close to crossing paths paths with a pony as awesome and radical as you."  She leaned in and nuzzled the foal.  "You have so... so much strength, Kera.  I'm super thrilled that you believe in me, but now you have to believe just as much in yourself.  Belle and Pilate need it.  And so do you."

	"Rainbow..."  Kera hiccuped, her face awash with tears.  "Don't go.  Please..."

	"There's a spark waiting for me down there, Kera."  Rainbow Dash stood up, gently patting the filly's head.  "Someday, you'll too find that spark, and you'll realize what has to be done."  She gulped.  "I just hope it's not in as dark and freaky of a place.  You're the kind of pony who deserves an audience."  Rainbow heard hoofsteps; she looked up.

	Belle and Pilate stood on either side of Kera.  They gazed at Rainbow Dash, struggling to stand straight.

	"We believe in you," Belle said with a bittersweet smile.  A tear rolled down her cheek.  "We always have.  Please... please f-forgive us for doubting."

	"Stop apologizing, Ding-Dong," Rainbow said with a smirk.  "I don't want my last memory of you to be slapping your stubby horn left and right—"

	Belle lunged forward, engulfing Rainbow in a deep hug.  She nuzzled the mare's neck and murmured through her tears: "You will come back... I know it..."  A shuddering sob.  "I've witnessed it before..."

	Rainbow squeezed Belle's back.  "If you believe in me, then you'll know not to wait around if I buck things up."  She murmured into the mare's ear.  "Have Floydien get you guys to safety.  Head for Val Roa.  Find a place that's peaceful to live for the rest of your lives.  I don't care if you have to cuddle up to the Grand Choke."

	"We are at peace, Rainbow," Belle whispered.  "You've given us that.  You've given us everything."

	Pilate leaned in, cuddling Rainbow from behind.  "We love you, Rainbow."  Kera leaned in, rubbing her moist cheek against one of Rainbow's forelimbs as the zebra continued, "You've never let us down.  You won't now."

	Rainbow tilted her head back and nuzzled the stallion.  "Look towards the mountain, bright eyes."  A wry smirk.  "If you guys see the fog roll back, that means I've done it.  If you don't—"

	"You will succeed," Pilate hissed, his ears twitching.  "You always do."

	"Heh... who am I to second-guess my favorite referee?"  Rainbow winked while Pilate produced a dry chuckle.  "Promise me whatever life you guys live, it'll only have contained explosions."

	"We promise, Rainbow Dash," Pilate said.  "The world won't be as stimulating without you with us."

	"I don't think I've had a sexier compliment."  Rainbow Dash said.  She backtrotted, her hooves dragging... dragging... then finally slipping out of Eljunbyro's grasp.  Belle and Pilate knelt down, holding Kera close as they watched Rainbow draw further away.

	Rainbow brushed past Josho.  "I mean this as sincerely as I can say it with my own vocal chords," the obese stallion uttered.  "You've got bigger balls than I ever did."

	"Heh... why else do I have so many colors in my tail?"  Rainbow smiled.  "It's to distract everypony's eyes."

	Josho smiled tiredly.  "What are the odds you will make it?  For real?"

	Rainbow shuddered through a wave of dizziness.  "How about this, Josho?  You go on a diet until we talk again muzzle to muzzle again."

	The stallion's ears folded back.  "I might enter a beauty pageant faster than Eagle Eye."

	"Now I'm actually sad."  Rainbow pivoted.  "Floydien.  You've got good ears."  She gulped and glanced at Pilate, Belle, and Kera.  "You know what to do if the fog doesn't roll away..."

	"Nancy Jane has only ever tried to mimic the paint bucket's glimmer," Floydien said.  His red eyes narrowed.  "Floydien only hopes paint bucket boomer isn't attempting to mimic Nancy Jane."

	"Sorry to disappoint you, Rudolph.  This is all me."

	"For that, Floydien is proud."

	"The one day I can actually read your lips."  Rainbow Dash shook her head with a smirk.  "You go on and say something like that."

	"Yes yes yes."

	Rainbow's teeth showed through a tired grin.  She nearly ran into Props and Zaid.

	"I really d-don't think this is so swell, Dashie," Props stammered.  "I'm just an engineer like my Unky Prowsy before me.  But..."  She sniffled.  "An engineer of the world?"

	"I wish I knew how to throw wrenches at stuff and have it make music overnight."  Rainbow gulped.  "Heck, if you were Austraeoh, you'd probably have fixed Urohringr months ago."

	Props giggled inwardly, then sniffed.  "Thank you, Dashie, for giving us all new lives."

	Rainbow smiled.  She leaned in and nuzzled the mare.  "Thanks, Props, for giving me a little breath of home."

	Props tried to smile back, but she broke into further tears.  She hid her face in Zaid's shoulder.  Meanwhile, the stallion glanced quietly at Rainbow.

	"I don't think I've seen you so serious... ever, Zaid."

	"I'm trying it on for a little bit," the stallion said with a weak smile.  "I'm only charged twenty bits if I turn it in a day late past the rental period."

	"Is there anything in the old Herald's book about Austraeoh taking a crazy stupid plunge into a death mountain full of monsters?"

	"No, but I could recite the bit about scrubbing a toilet while a thousand feet up in a skystone ship."

	Rainbow smirked.  "Never change, Zaid."

	"I'd say the same about you, sexy, but..."  He gulped.  "You're a hard act to follow."

	"Yeah."  Rainbow nodded and turned around.  "I know."

	She fell into a tight pair of lavender forelimbs.

	Rainbow wheezed for breath.

	Eagle Eye snuggled her close, his eyes tearing.  "Thank you..."

	"For... f-for what?"

	"Everything," the stallion whimpered, holding her closer.  "I found life... I found love... all because of you..."

	"EE..."  Rainbow patted his shoulder and pressed them both apart.  They looked into each other's eyes.  "You found yourself.  I only pointed you in a dangerous, kaizo direction, ya feel me?"

	"Yeah..."  Eagle sniffled with a tearful smile.  "Yeah, I do..."

	"Rainbow Dash," Ebon wheezed as he trotted closer to the scene.  "Is there really no other way...?"

	"Look at the bright side."  Rainbow parted from Eagle's hug and trotted over to the cook.  "There'll be a crapton more apples for the rest of you guys to eat from now on."

	"Always so brave... so thoughtful..."  Ebon sighed, teetering slightly.  "Even when you're not saving us, you're saving us."

	"Wish I was saving you more often."  Rainbow squinted.  "You look almost as bad as I feel, Ebon."

	"I feel great, Rainbow..."  Ebon smiled with a single tear.  He leaned in just as Eagle trotted over to his side.  The stallions nuzzled each other dearly.  "Just... great."  He shuddered, his soft eyes falling on Rainbow once more.  "When you come back, I'll f-feel even greater."

	Rainbow Dash opened her muzzle... hesitated, then said, "Good bye, fellas.  Whatever you do..."  A backtrot and a salute.  "Don't have your honeymoon in the Grand Choke."

	Ebon bit his lip.  He and Eagle leaned against each other, watching Rainbow trot away with heavy sighs.

	As Rainbow came closer, Booster Spice raised his hoof and opened his mouth—

	"Hey Booster.  Nice goggles."

	Booster blinked.  He turned and blankly watched the mare as she trotted past.

	Rainbow stood beneath the perching changelings.  "I'm strong enough to fly, now," Rainbow said.  "I guess, in a way, I always was."

	"Good.  Because there isn't much time left," one changeling said.

	"If we hurry now, we just might be able to lead the escaping creatures back into the mountain," another said.

	"We'll do whatever we can to make sure you reach your destination."

	"But I still gotta lead the creeps, right?" Rainbow said.  "I mean, when all is said and done, they gotta be chasing me into the heart of the mountain."

	"Do you think you can fly for that long?"

	"Dudes, I've been flying for far longer than even your 'Mother' can boast of.  Less talk and more flapping."

	From afar, Ebon's head jerked towards the scene.  He blinked worriedly.

	Eagle Eye bit his lip.

	"We will lead the way," one of the changelings said as one by one they took off from the skystone.  "If your companions value their lives, they will do what the ponies of Amulek refuse.  They will put as much distance between themselves and this place."

	"The Jury knows what to do.  Don't you worry."

	"EE...?"  Ebon stammered.

	"Let's go, Ebon," Eagle murmured, leading the stallion back down the stairwell.

	"But... but Rainbow—"

	"There's n-nothing left to see here."  Eagle fought back a sob as the two descended below deck.  "Spark, sp-spare us..."

	Ebon nervously trotted along with him, though he gave one last feeble glance over his shoulder.

	As Rainbow Dash was just starting to take off, she caught a glance of a brown shape in the corner of her vision.  She looked over, eyes bright.

	Roarke stood on the starboard side of the ship, facing out towards the forests and mists, dead silent.

	"Just... j-just one second," Rainbow wheezed.

	"Rainbow Dash, there is no more seconds!" a changeling yelped.

	"We must make haste—"

	"Will you just friggin' wait?!" Rainbow snapped, galloping over to the starboard side.  "Without me, you're not doing this at all!  So just hold up!"
		//------------------------------//
		// Keep Moving, Find Your Place		//------------------------------//

	Roarke stood motionlessly, her lenses reflecting the starlight from where she stood.

	Rainbow Dash galloped to a stop, panting as if having run fifty miles in ten seconds.  She gulped and clenched her jaw tight.

	A bitter breath ran through Roarke's figure.  "Hey."

	Rainbow's ears instantly folded back.  "H-hey..."

	"You know, there was a time when the only greetings I would give a pony was a headbutt."

	"Heh... funny..."  Rainbow smirked crookedly.  "For a while there, that was how I alway said 'good bye.'"

	"Would you like to headbutt me now?"

	Rainbow winced.  She hung her head and glanced at her squirming hooves.  "Listen, Roake—"

	"I can deal with pain," Roarke droned.  "I've had organs ripped out of me and metal things shoved into me."

	Rainbow gulped.  "Bet you never thought you'd find a heart beneath all that blood and pulp, huh?"

	Roarke finally turned around.  Her lips were quivering  "You found it, Rainbow."

	Rainbow gazed at her in silence.

	"For a while there, Imre c-came close," Roarke said, her voice gradually collapsing, taking on a frighteningly foalish tone.  "But... she left this world before she could ever show it to me."  The metal mare's shoulders began to shake.  "She left me, Rainbow.  And... and n-now you?"

	"Roarke..."  Rainbow closed the distance, instantly nuzzling her.  "For Celestia's sake—"

	"Take me with you!" Roarke hissed, although her head was bowed.  "I-I don't care if I'll slow you down!  We'll think of something!  We always think of something—"

	"I can't.  This is something Austraeoh's gotta do.  It'll be tough enough for me to make it out on my own—"

	"I don't care if we don't make it out!" Roarke squeaked, trembling.  "I don't want to be alone again!"  She grimaced.  "Not after what y-you've given me.  Not after what I've t-tasted!"

	"You won't be alone, Roarke—"

	"Stop saying that!" Roarke was whispering at this point.  "With you gone, there is n-nothing, Rainbow!"  Something rattled from deep inside of her.  "I've got nothing left!"

	"Shhhhh... Roarke..."  Rainbow reached up with two hooves. She gently unclasped Roarke's lenses, freeing the mare's tears.  She buried her face in her chest, protecting her from the starlight as she held her close.  "Roarke..."  The mares rocked together as Rainbow spoke in a comforting tone.  "I did not kick your ass in Foxtaur, blow up your den full of scumbags, drag you across a warzone, and make sweet, sweet love just to introduce you to nothing.  Don't even pretend to smack talk what we've made together here."

	She tilted the mare's face up.  Twin blue slits struggled beneath a pool of tears to look up at her.

	Rainbow smiled.  "Life is awesome, Roarke.  If you don't believe that now, then you're not the 'Genius Most Rare' that all the cyborg gals touted back in Searo.  And understand this... I am not giving up.  I know it may look that way on the outside, but we all have our journeys to finish, and this is simply the next leg of mine.  It's a path that only I can take.  You've got one of your own, and it's just beginning."

	"You've... always h-had a beacon to guide you," Roarke stammered.  "And now, mine is going away.  How... h-how can I keep going?"

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  "You know, Roarke..."  She nuzzled the mare close, speaking into her ear.  "There was a time... long ago... when I didn't th-think I was capable of..."  She winced, but eventually murmured, "Of loving again..."  A tear ran down Rainbow's cheek.  She clenched her jaw.  "I am no longer that mare now.  I can't even understand her."  She leaned back, smiling tearfully at Roarke.  "I have you to thank for that.  I have you to thank for everything."  She squeezed the mare's shoulders.  "You are my brightest beacon.  It just... took a while for the fire to be kindled, that's all."  She smiled sweetly.

	Roarke bit her lip.  "Rainbow," she whispered.  "Please don't do this.  Don't throw yourself into the abyss..."

	"Roarke—"

	"I love you," Roarke said.  "I love you so much."

	Rainbow stared at her.  She leaned in, resting her fuzzy forehead against Roarke's.  "If you love me, Roarke... be loyal to me... be loyal to me by being loyal to them."

	"Rainbow...?"

	"Bellesmith, Pilate, Kera... EE... the whole gang..."  Rainbow stroked Roarke's braids.  "Promise me you'll get them to safety.  Promise me you'll find them all a happy, serene, peaceful place to spend the rest of their lives."  She gulped.  "And for you as well, Roarke."  She stared into the mare's silver-blue gaze.  "Pursue love and friendship in all you do.  I know it sounds fruity... but I bet even you can admit..."  A devilish smirk.  "It's pretty darn magical."

	Roarke gazed at her.  After a lasting sniffle, her brow furrowed, and a hint of the steely bounty hunter bobbed up to the surface.  "I will."

	Rainbow stroked her braids one last time.  "Look to the mountain, but don't wait for me."  Rainbow Dash stepped back.  Her lungs heaved as she struggled for the strength to say, "You don't win in life by waiting... but by moving."  Her muscles twitched once... twice.  Then in a spastic burst, she flew herself skyward, rocketing northeast as fast as her feathers could carry her.  The changelings actually had to struggle to keep up, swarming over the fir trees as they followed Rainbow towards the mountains beyond.

	Roarke shuddered.  She clasped her lenses back in place, damming her tears. Slowly, she tilted her face towards the night sky, finding it full of sparks.


		//------------------------------//
		// Charge of the Loyal Brigade		//------------------------------//

	Ebon lay sideways on the infirmary's cot, twitching feverishly.  Perspiration fell down his muzzle as his glazed eyes swam across the walls of the tiny compartment.

	Eagle Eye squatted by his side, reaching in with a hoof to stroke and caress the stallion's mane.  The look on the ex-mercenary's face was dull and melancholic.  He was just inches from his partner, and still their eyes couldn't meet, as if they were thousands of miles away from one another.

	Nevertheless, Eagle Eye leaned in and kissed the stallion's cheek, then nuzzled his neck.  Ebon shuddered slightly, his legs curling inward.

	Eagle Eye sniffled.  He glanced worriedly out the starlit porthole as he rested his chin atop Ebon's shoulder.  Tears collected at the edges of his eyes, so he closed them, murmuring indecipherable words into the stuffy air of the place.



	Rainbow Dash had to squint against the cold, pelting winds.  The air above the mountains punished her without remorse, and her only choice was to glide faster through the unpredictable drafts.

	Before her, the northeast horizon was a series of black jagged shapes against a celestial canvas.  Gradually, with each minute of high-speed flight, the stars disappeared while a foggy ceiling overtook the heavens.

	Rainbow had to blink—a dangerous thing at her speed with nothing but misty mountains dead ahead.  Constantly, she ascended, angling herself skyward with feathery lift.  There was a flicker of light in her peripheral vision.  She glanced left.

	A veritable squadron of black shapes hurled through the air alongside her.  The changelings' green eyes flickered like zeppelin beacons in the cold, cold clouds.

	Rainbow Dash looked to her right.  Several more black shapes knifed through the air alongside her, their glowing eyes like headlights in the thickening mists.

	With a deep breath, Rainbow reached down and rubbed a hoof across the ruby lightning bolt dangling from her neck.  After a few sparks, the pendant pulsed with a persistent crimson glow.  A swath of red light swam across the haze directly in front of her.  Rainbow's trained eyes made quick judgments of the directions in which the mists were moving, and she plotted her flight accordingly, ascending rapidly to reach the peak of the mountain lingering beyond the densest part of the looming miasma.

	The onyx squadron's flight was chillingly silent.  They soared like black missiles into obscured starlight—a rainbow streak acting as their center.



	At least a good hundred instruments beeped, flashed, and clicked across the Noble Jury's cockpit.  For the first time in weeks, Floydien did not preoccupy himself with them.  Instead, he sat back—slumped—in his seat as his red eyes stared dully through the windshield.  The elk took a deep breath, reaching a cloven hoof up to scratch just beneath a twitching ear.  His muzzle clenched and unclenched, a strangely wordless occasion.

	Brow furrowed, Floydien rotated in his seat and glanced out of the cockpit.

	Starlight bathed the top deck of the Noble Jury.  Its dim glow glinted off the metal braces of a mare standing port side, her lensed-eyes locked towards a fixed point along the northeast horizon.  For minutes... even hours, Roarke did not move from that one spot.  She remained leg-locked on her hooves, motionless, faithful.




	Rainbow gritted her teeth.  At the altitude that they were reaching, a tempestuous wind had picked up, assaulting her from every direction.  The roots of her feathers twitched and tugged as her wings dealt with the brunt of the turbulence.

	It didn't help that it was next to impossible to see more than fifty meters straight ahead, especially at her speed.  The fog was so dense now that Rainbow Dash could almost smell something in it.  There was a haunting rust to the scent, like dead ash blowing in a circle and then mixing with her tears.  Rainbow wheezed, and she instantly felt a shudder to her lungs—like that of a sobbing pegasus in a land far, far away.

	Still, her muscles were fully complying with her.  Every limb was working perfectly, and the mare didn't feel the slightest hint of dizziness.  She took deep breaths, reveling in the strength she was being afforded thus far.  There was no telling how bad things would get if she were to spontaneously—

	The fog suddenly cleared.

	Rainbow Dash blinked, for she suddenly saw the jutting spire of a familiar mountain straight ahead of her.  In the twinkle of starlight, she could see gray clouds rolling down from the snowy heights as if melting from a volcano's invisible eruption.

	"What... wh-what's happening—?"

	"It's clearing!" one of the many changelings shouted into the wind.  Rainbow turned to see the flying creatures' eyes pulsing with an emerald cadence on either side of her.  "They're fleeing their hold!"

	Rainbow gritted her teeth.  "Ah jeez... here we go..."

	"Prepare yourselves, brothers and sisters!" another changeling shouted.  Green tufts of flame erupted and billowed between them.  "No matter what happens, Rainbow Dash must get to the mountain!"

	Rainbow Dash shouted, "I know it's a teensy bit late to ask, but do we have a plan or something?!"

	"You get yourself to the mountain!" a closer metamorph hollered.  "We will take care of the rest!"

	"'Take care of the rest?!'  But—"

	"There's no time!"  A changeling pointed.  "Here they come!"

	The world exploded with a high-pitched siren.

	"Aaaugh!"  Rainbow slowed slightly, clamping hooves over her ears.  Her eyes teared as she struggled to glance ahead.  As she did so, a gasp escaped her lips.

	Like swarming insects, a solid worm of deathly creatures spilled out of the north side of the peak.  The ethereal serpents branched out, spreading in every directiong through the air.

	Rainbow stared and stared.  She winced as—suddenly—a pulse of dark energy ripped through her.  Her eyes flickered red-on-yellow.

	Almost instantly, the branching monsters coalesced together as one.  With a combined howl, they bent around and sailed due south, heading straight for Rainbow Dash.

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  "Alright..."  She cracked the joints in her neck as her pendant flickered brighter.  "...let's dance."

	"Together!" Changelings hollered; changelings shouted.  They pressed themselves together—wingtip to wingtip—and formed a solid, buzzing wall right in front of Rainbow Dash.  Between their dangling limbs, Rainbow could see the glinting fangs of the chaos creatures as they drew closer, closer, shrieking.  "Together as one!"

	A hellish thunder wracked the heavens at this point.  The air heated up, pulsating with every roar and growl of the otherworldly serpents.  By the time the two flocks converged, the equines could see their own sweat in the abominable glow from the chaos spawn.

	The changelings let loose a collective shout.  Rainbow knew that her yells were joining the chorus, though she couldn't hear it.  She didn't care.  She flew straight  into the maelstrom of limbs and fangs as both flocks converged over the mountains.




	Loud static.

	Props stared dully into the communications array atop the table in the corner of the Noble Jury's engine room.  Her peach hoof lazily turned and tugged at the foremost dial across the instrument panel.  There was no hint of Prowse's voice, no hint of anything.  All was dead and noisy.

	She sighed, her whole body deflating.  A chill ran through the mare, and she trembled slightly.

	A blanket draped over her suddenly.

	Props' head jerked up.  She blinked, and she smiled gently.

	Zaid smiled back, tucking the blanket tightly around her body.  He leaned down and nuzzled her forehead.

	She tilted her head up and kissed his chin, then his muzzle.  A lasting breath, and she clenched her eyes shut, sniffling.

	Zaid squatted beside her, holding the mare close.  Quietly, with a dull expression, Zaid turned and glanced across the compartment.

	Inside its iron cage, the runed tome flickered with bright lavender light, ever persistent.



	All around Rainbow, changelings were yelping and monsters were howling.  The staccato bedlam thumped like dull thuds against the heartbeat in her ears.  Rainbow darted left and right, breathless, as she sought to punch her violent way northeast and towards the mountain peak.  This was more than just a little bit challenging, with nightmarish serpents plunging at her with every turn.  She could even see their clear eyes flash, brimming with lightning as they hungrily intercepted her.

	Just milliseconds before each abomination could impale her, however, a changeling or another darted up, plowing into the bodies and knocking them out of the air—out of range of ripping Rainbow asunder.

	Rainbow gasped, glancing left and right.  In brief flashes of chaotic luminescence, she saw changelings tangling with serpents, morphing their hooves into hooks and pinchers as they ripped the creatures to ethereal strands.  The air had become so thick with clashing bodies that Rainbow briefly lost her bearings.  There was no up and down, only the spark-bright collisions of unearthly monstrosities in every direction.

	The mare held her breath, squinting through the meaty battle.  Beyond the mayhem, Rainbow spotted the ever-present glow of 'Yaerfaerda.'  She locked her vision on the beacon, uprighted herself, and propelled her body forward, threading through the massacre as scales and sinew ribboned around her.

	Soon, the dark body of the mountain drew closer, and Rainbow's nose tickled from the chilly proximity of its snowy peaks.  She glanced down—and she gasped.  In the flickering glow of the chaos beasts, she spotted several shadows converging on her.

	Rainbow looked straight up.  All she saw was fangs and teeth.

	"Hnnnkkt!"  Rainbow spun, swinging a foreleg up in a mighty kick.

	One serpent's skull instantly collapsed.  Two of its kin darted down, shrieking.  One looped around Rainbow's flank while the other entangled with her forelimbs.

	"Gnnngh—Mmmfng!"  Rainbow snarled, struggling with the creatures.  She hooked her wings at an angle and spun savagely.  With a shriek, the monster clinging to her lower body was flung off.  This gave Rainbow the strength she needed to wrench the other from her hooves.  "Yaaugh!"  She gave the thing a heavy punch to the face.

	As it dissolved in wispy gray bands, a bigger, angrier flock came streaking her way, lunging for her neck.

	"Aaaugh!" Rainbow clamped her hooves around the foremost creature's jaws, fighting it, holding its fangs just inches from her muzzle.  Two more latched onto her body, slowing her down.  Rainbow felt herself descending—breathlessly plunging towards the treeline below.  She wheezed, panted, and twirled as she wrestled with the lashing monster in her hooves.  Suddenly, she was sailing straight into a thick line of fir trees.  "Hrnnnnnngh—!"  She used every ounce of strength to push the monster's skull at forelimb's length, meanwhile she strafed sideways into the trees, smashing through branch after branch.

	Thwp-Thwp-Thwppp!

	One limb after another, the creature was torn in several places.  In a pitiable shriek, it slinked out of Rainbow's grip.  She was now imbalanced from the weight of the monsters clinging to her lower body.  Rainbow toppled through the trees, ricocheting off a trunk or two.  Grunting through the pain, she flapped her wings hard, pulling herself off and disorienting the creatures before they could bite into her flesh.  She punched and kicked at them, struggling—panting—to get them off.  As she fought, three more dove down and latched onto her with drooling fangs and rock hard scales.  Rainbow wheezed as she felt herself plunging earthward, bound by the reptilian cocoon—

	"Raaaaaaaaugh!"  A quartet of changelings plunged down from the main fight.  Their shells hardened like granite with a flash of green flame, and they knocked the serpents off of Rainbow's body.

	"Guh!"  Rainbow spun, twirled, and uprighted herself.  She drifted in a breathless glide, glancing down as the changelings tangled with the monsters in separate scuffles across the forest floor.  She heard shouting, pained voices, but they were all too soon out of her line of sight.

	Steeling herself, Rainbow flapped her wings and ascended once more, scaling the southern face of the mountain.  Above her, the skylight was blotted out in thicker and thicker shadows.  Within seconds, she made out the pinprick specks of abominable eyes leering down at her.

	Rainbow was ready with a rising growl.  She soared upwards, forelimb thrusting like a pike.  WHACK!  She broke a serpent's neck with one punch, bounced off its limp body, kicked off another, and plowed her way through three more creatres.  WH-WHAP!  The line of monsters grew thicker and thicker, their fanged mouths like converging hydra heads.  Holding her breath, Rainbow twirled through their biting jaws and ascended faster.  WHUMP!  Two bodies pounced on her shoulders.  Grunting, Rainbow twirled and twirled until she swung them to the front of her body.  She uppercutted one and gripped the neck of another.  Its jaws thrashed and chomped at her muzzle, forcing her to jerk her head to the left and right.  Several more crowded around, threatening to squeeze Rainbow in from all angles.

	Her eyes flickered red.  "Rrrrrrghhh—"  She bravely slipped a hoof free and clasped her pendant tightly.  The air around sang with static, followed by a bright ruby glow.  Then, in a solid beam, Rainbow unleashed a wave of harmonic resonance straight from her lightning bolt.  "—haaaaaaaugh!"

	The crimson light sliced through the chaotic lot like butter.  Ethereal entrails melted in a bursting circle around her.  Rainbow sailed triumphantly through the translucent gray efflugence, but not for long.  A cold sweat ran across her body, and her eyes constantly pulsed with a sickly yellow hue.

	"Nnngh... mmfff..."  Rainbow panted, hyperventilated.  Her muzzle hung open in a weak expression as her coat paled.  "Oh no..."  She wheezed... she whimpered.  "Please, Celestia, no..."  It was too late.  The world spun.  The mountain twirled towards her as she lost all grip on up or down.  "Mmmmfnngh... please no... n-not now... not—hnngrkkt!"

	She tried flapping her wings, only to zig-zag in random, hopeless directions.  Branches and needles pricked her neck, but that was just the start of it.  Wham!  Her body pinballed off a tree trunk, broke through a mess of twigs, and plunged towards a rocky mountainside.

	"Grkkk!"  Rainbow gritted her teeth, forcing her wings out at the last second.  She pulled up, twirled, and struck the ground at a shallow angle, grinding to a stop across her aching shoulders.  "Grnnngk—Augh!  Mmmf!"  At last, her body rolled to a stop, pulsing all over with numb pain.

	She shuddered, struggling to get up.  Every breath was tainted with bile, and she whimpered into her clenched teeth.

	Howls lit her ears, like a pack of jackals rushing in through the trees.  She squinted her eyes open, instantly regretting it.  She could barely see the skies from the serpentine bodies plunging down at her.  Clinging to the earth, Rainbow rolled up into a tight blue ball, waiting for the inevitable.



	Josho sat at the end of the mess hall's table, digging his spoon through a bowl of fruit salad.  He blinked unenthusiastically at it, not taking a single bite.

	At last, with a bitter sigh, he leaned back and stared blankly at the empty seats before him.  Scratching his stubbled face, he finally turned and looked over his shoulder.  He gazed quietly across the room.

	In the lounge, Pilate and Bellesmith sat on the sofa, their legs curled beneath them.  Sandwiched between the two ponies, lying down with fitful, sniffling breaths was Kera.  She laid her chin on Belle's forelimbs, clenching her eyes tight to dam the tears.

	Belle slowly and gently caressed the mare's emerald bangs.  She swallowed a lump down her throat and gazed forlornly out the nearest porthole.

	Pilate tilted his head her way.  Without hesitation, he leaned in and gently nuzzled her cheek.

	Belle closed her eyes, accepting his embrace.  She dropped her head low enough for the stallion to rest his chin over her soft mane.  Holding in quiet sobs, the couple's necks locked together, keeping close to Kera the entire time as the minutes lurched by.



	Bellowing howls.

	Like banshees, the beasts pounced on Rainbow's body.  They grabbed legs, limbs.  Their fangs brushed and raked her skin.  She could already smell blood.  Her blood.  A knifing pain from beyond the numbness—

	Thwooosh!  A solid mass of dark carapaces sailed out of the immediate treeline.  Within seconds, the changelings had plowed the monsters off of Rainbow's body.

	The pegasus rolled over, sputtering, wincing.  She fought dizziness to turn and glance.

	Across the lopsided world, she saw the abominations reeling from the unexpected blow.  With instinctual resilience, they uprighted themselves and began flying and slithering straight towards Rainbow Dash's body once again.

	In a blink, the changelings had formed a tight circle around her.

	"Rainbow—!"

	"I... I-I can't..."  Rainbow wheezed.  "The ch-chaos..."  Her tearing eyes flickered yellow.  "Too much..."

	"You will make it to the mountain!" another shouted.  Its body flashed green, and suddenly Keebroo was standing in front of her.  "They will not harm you!"

	"What..."  Rainbow gulped, sputtered. "What are...?"

	More flashes.  Suddenly, a solid ring of Amulek villagers stood tightly around the pegasus.  Gone was the glossy black nakedness of every changeling, replaced by living and breathing doppelgangers.

	"Fly as soon as you get your strength!" they hollered in separate voices.  "Exorcize this land of Mother's curse!"

	"Wait... w-wait!"  Rainbow fought to sit up, waving a weak forelimb.  "No!  D-don't do this!"

	"Hey!" one changeling shouted and whistled, followed by another.  "Over here!"

	Swiftly, the abominations twitched, their attention falling on the flesh-and-blood "ponies" situated in front of them.

	"It's us you want!" Several Keebroos and Drakshaas galloped away from Rainbow Dash, heading back into the forest.  "Come and feast!"

	With slowly rising hisses, the serpentine monsters coiled up their bodies.

	"Dang it—Don't do this!" Rainbow hollered.

	It was too late.  The monsters all abandoned Rainbow Dash, converging like sharks on the mass of unprotected changelings.  Not just the creatures in the clearing—but the abominations in the sky and the far corners of the mountaintops.  In the center of the hellish feast, Rainbow spotted flashes of green light.  Muffled screams rang across the fangs and limbs, and soon the rocky mountainside was oozing with emerald juices.

	As strength finally returned to Rainbow's body, she threw it all into an anguished scream.  The dizziness returned the very instant that a gigantic flash of green light emanated from the massacred changelings...



	...the very same flash of light pulsating across Ebon Mane's eyes at that exact moment.

	"Aaaugh!"  He fell off the cot and collapsed on the floor of the infirmary, gripping his skull.  "Aaaaaaaaaaaugh!"  He threw his head back, howling in agony.  Slowly, like a dark curtain unveiling, his burgundy coat morphed into a black carapace with hollow hooves and webbed ears.

	Trotting down the hall, Eagle Eye gasped.  He dropped the tray of food he was carrying with a loud clatter and galloped into the hallway, taking a sharp right.  There, he froze, staring wide-eyed into the infirmary.

	"... ... ..."  Eagle Eye gulped hard.  "Ebon..."  He winced.  "Ebon, sw-sweetie...?"

	The stallion—or what was once the stallion—was sitting on his haunches, staring into a mirror that had fallen to the floor from his violent shaking.  He stared long and hard into the tiny sheet of glass, and a frail insectoid thing stared back, its clear eyes blinking beneath a sheen of perspiration.

	Eagle Eye grimaced.

	Slowly, the creature tilted its head up.  Thin, green tears collected around its pulsating eyes.  "EE..."  As soon as it heard its own distorted voice, it shuddered.  A dull pulse flickered off its horn, startling it even further.  It stared at its porous hooves as a deep hyperventilation rattled across its shell.  "EE... what... wh-what am I?"

	"Ebon... I..."

	"What am I?!"  The thing hugged itself, collapsing into the corner of the infirmary.  "Oh Mother... Mother..."  Its fangs clattered as it sobbed hysterically.  "Mother, no... pl-please no!  No no no no no..."

	"Please, Ebon..." Eagle could already hear himself crying.  With violent shivers, he crawled over, reaching a loving hoof towards the changeling.  "Ebon, y-you must stay calm.  Ebon!"

	It was too late, for the creature collapsed into wailing hysterics.

		//------------------------------//
		// Love It or Leave It		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow stood up as she felt blood rushing through her tingling limbs.  Seething through her teeth, she stared at the carnage happening downhill to where she teetered.

	More and more serpents were sailing down into the gorging feast from above.  Splashes of emerald life juice and segmented shells flew through the haunting starlight.  At one point—with a pained grunt—a bloodied changeling tumbled out of the main group, rolling painfully to its side.  The poor thing's body flickered back and forth from Keebroo to Merigold.  Seconds later, three serpents slithered free from the group and stalked its bleeding corpse.

	Rainbow's muscles tightened.  With a burst of strength, she rocketed towards the scene.

	The three monsters were about to pounce. Rainbow streaked low, knocking two of them off balance.  She swooped up the bloodied changeling survivor in one breath.  The third monster pounced at her rear, but she bucked it in mid-air and flew uphill before any of the feasting creatures could sense her.

	Breathless, Rainbow carried the shape-shifter up the mountainside for several meters.  The battered thing twitched and sputtered in her grasp. She looked down and almost wretched to see that its lower legs were completely missing.  At last, still fighting a cloud of dizziness, Rainbow touched down with the creature.

	There, she squatted low and cradled its, brushing its blood-stained bangs aside to gaze into its face.

	"Why...?!"  She seethed.  "Why did you give yourselves up like this?!"

	"Not... all of us..." the changeling whimpered, sputtered.  It stopped pulsing with green flame, hyperventilating with a rattle of its dark carapace.  "S-some... brothers and sisters... st-still alive..."  It coughed up slimy juices and wheezed, "I... I-I can feel them..."  Its eyes darted left and right in sudden confusion.  "And another... another..."

	Rainbow gnashed her teeth.  "Dang it, you could have fought them off!"

	"Too... m-many of them..."  The changeling's glossy eyes reflected Rainbow's grimace.  "Had... to distract them fr-from you..."

	"I'm dying anyways!"  Rainbow grunted.  "I'm dead as soon as I enter that mountain!  It wasn't worth doing that!"

	"Worth it...?"  The changeling exhaled quietly.  It raised a twitching hoof up.  Rainbow clutched it, and it instantly turned brown and fuzzy.  Pale blue eyes twinkled beneath scarlet braids.  "Of c-course it was worth it..."  A tear trickled down Roarke's bloody face.  "You g-gave us freedom, Rainbow D-Dash..."  A hiss, gargling.  "You g-gave us love..."

	Rainbow bit her lip.

	The changeling smiled.  It stared at her.  Then it stared at something else.  The smile trailed off, forming fangs as the glossy shell returned, dull and lifeless—just like the changeling's limb as it slipped limply out of Rainbow's hoof.

	Rainbow's ears folded back.  She clenched her eyes shut, leaning in and pressing her forehead to the shape-shifter's.  Her next breaths came through flaring nostrils.  At last, she gently laid the body down.  When she stood up, the pegasus felt blood rushing through every limb, hot and strong and righteous.  With a single flap of her wings, she bulleted skyward in a blue streak.

	Flying backwards up the mountainside, Rainbow turned and yelled down at the horrendous feast happening below.  "Hey!"

	The abominations kept devouring what was left of the chitinous pile.

	"Hey!  Flankfaces!"

	At last, several serpentine eyes flickered in Rainbow's direction.  The mass of chaos paused in its ravenous bloodthirsting.

	"Bet you're wanting dessert, aren't ya, ya motherless melon fudges?!"  Rainbow motioned after her as she rocketed up hill.  "Come and get me if ya friggin' can!"

	With mindless shrieks, the legions of chaos lurched uphill, sailing after her with whipping scales.  They weren't alone; the entire sky's worth of otherworldly summons surged as one.  Soon, a pulsating ribbon of translucent bodies were tailing Rainbow closely.

	Flapping her wings with iron-tight precision, Rainbow made a beeline for the north end of the mountain.  The crisp air ahead of her was clear and the atmosphere behind her dribbled with blood and death.  Unfazed, she led the murderous beasts to her final destination, her eyes locked on the eternal Yaerfaerda the entire time.

	"Follow me to oblivion, ya dumbasses!"  Rainbow smirked privately to herself.  "Hurry up!  I ain't got all night..."



	"Ebon..."  Eagle Eye sat just inches across from where the changeling violently shivered.  "Ebon Mane, look at me!"

	"How c-can you call me th-that?!" the creature stammered, face awash with tears.  "How c-can anypony call me that?!"  It looked around, wincing as the cabinets and counters of the tiny infirmary reflected the sheen of its natural green glow.  "All th-this time!  All this time!"  It hugged itself tighter, curling up into a little ball.  "Mrmmmfff... I've been leeching ponies!  It makes so m-much sense!  Oh Mother..."  Its body jolted with a heavy gasp.  The creature's eyes turned glossier as its fanged muzzle hung open.  "Good heavens... Mother!  She's..."  A sob.  "Sh-she's...!"  A harder sob.

	"Ebon!  Please!"  Eagle thrusted his forelimbs forward, grasping the shape-shifter's.  "Look at me!"

	"I c-can't!  Eagle, I-I can't!  Mmmmnnghh-Mother!"  The thing tried to shake and wriggle its way out of Eagle Eye's grasp.  "Mother, please... n-no!  Oh Goddess, no!"

	"I said look at me!" Eagle shouted.

	The creature locked eyes with him.  There was a brief flash of burgundy, but it was all-too-swiftly devoured by the black gloss.  Nevertheless, the changeling froze in place with tiny, tiny twitches.

	"You are Ebon Mane," Eagle Eye said quietly, firmly.  "You're a kind and gentle earth pony.  A handsome stallion."

	"Ebon Mane... is a n-name..."  The creature hissed, snarling now.  "The name of a gentle earth pony who's dead!"  It spat.  "An earth pony who I killed!"

	"Ebon—"

	"I'm a monster, Eagle!  A monster and a murderer—"

	"You are a Jurist and a dang good cook—"

	"I'm an imposter and a freak—"

	"You are the stallion that I love!"  Eagle shouted, yanking the metamorph onto his haunches so that the two stared eye-to-eye.  "Ebon, I love you!"  He panted, his tears mixing with sweat as he leaned forward.  "I love you, Ebon."  He gulped.  "More than anything or anyone or anypony."

	The changeling stared back, fangs trembling.  A tear ran down its shell.  "H-how do you know that, EE?"

	Eagle bit his lip.

	"You... you feel things... and I-I taste those feelings."  A gulp.  "And I feast..."  A sneer.  "And I starve!"

	"Ebon..."

	"I wish to Goddess that I knew sooner..."  The thing sobbed, head bowing.  "I w-would have fled!  I would have rid every one of you of th-this danger!"

	"I couldn't let that happen, Ebon!" Eagle said.  He shook the creature's shoulders.  "I promised myself I would not let you go harm's way!"

	Just then, the creature's head jerked up.  Its glossy eyes narrowed.  "You knew?"

	Eagle Eye held his tongue.

	"You... knew, didn't you?"  The changeling gulped.  "For h-how long..."

	"Ebon..."

	"For how long, EE?!" its alien voice warbled.

	Eagle took a deep breath.  "...since Stratopolis, Ebon."

	The creature slumped against the cabinet, shivering.

	"Listen to me..."  Eagle crawled closer, reaching a tender hoof towards the thing's shoulder.  "I can't pretend to know what you're thinking, but trust me.  You are the Ebon Mane of Gray Smoke.  You are the Ebon Mane who made friends with Props.  And you are the Ebon Mane who joined the jury and brought peace and contentment to my life.  It is not a curse and it is not a magic spell, Ebon.  I love you.  I... I..."  He winced.  "I'm so sorry, Ebon.  I'm s-so sorry that you had to find out this way.  I should have told you, but I was scared.  I was scared and I was selfish b-because I didn't want you punishing youself in a panic like this..."  He gulped.  "...and I didn't want you leaving me."

	The creature hugged itself, rocking back and forth.

	"Ebon..."  Eagle sniffed, wiped his cheek dry and leaned forward.  "Ebon, please, tell me what you are feeling..."

	The changeling panted and panted.  More tears trickled down its shell.  "I'm sc-scared, EE..."  Its eyes darted towards the ex-mercenary.  "I'm so scared..."  It whimpered and shook.  "But how can I?  What right do I have to be scared?"  It gulped.  "I'm not real..."

	"Yes you are."

	"Don't say that.  You can't possibly know that!"  It clenched its eyes shut.  "If I open my eyes again... what will I be?  Who will I be?  Will I even be alive?!  Mmmmff..."  It curled its hollow forelimbs before its petite face.  "Grhhhh... I don't know what to do.  I don't know what to do.  I don't know—"

	"Ebon, listen to me, you are real."

	"I'm not.  I'm not I'm not I'm not I'm—"

	"And was Elma any less real when she found out?!" Eagle blurted.  "And was she poisoning us to love and care for her?!"

	"Not the s-same.  Not... it's n-not—"

	"Ebon..."  Eagle grabbed the creature's hooves and hoisted it up in a jerk.  "Open your eyes!"

	"Mmmm—!"

	"Open them!"

	The changeling squinted at Eagle, weak and feeble, trembling.

	Eagle smiled.  "I'm still here.  And so are you."  He sniffled, but fought to maintain his grin.  "And I am never... ever leaving you.  I promise with my whole heart.  I will keep you safe.  I will help you through this."

	It blinked at the stallion.  Its body trembled, and when it finally collapsed, it was with its face buried in Eagle's chest.  Anguished, muffled sobs racked its carapace.  Eagle folded his forelimbs around it, holding the creature close.

	Nevertheless, the changeling whimpered and wailed, "Oh Eagle, it's n-no use!  It won't work.  It c-can't work!"

	"Shhhh... We can make it work!"

	"No we c-can't!"  The thing hiccuped and whimpered, "I'm just a freak... a m-monster!"

	"Ebon—"

	"If you won't hurt me, they will!"  It shivered.  "Floydien... Josho... the Jury..."

	"They'll understand..."  Eagle fidgeted.  "I... I-I'm almost certain of—"

	"Roarke!  If she finds out, then wh-what?!"

	Eagle froze in place, his violet pupils shrinking.

	"Nopony will have me!  Not here!  Not anywhere!"

	"Ebon, just calm d-down.  I..."  Eagle grimaced, looking all over the infirmary.  "I n-need to think.  I..."

	"EE, I'm so scared!  Please..."  It sobbed and shivered in the stallion's embrace, a tiny flutter of what the earth pony once was.  "Help me.  I beg of you.  I d-don't know what to do... Mother... I-I don't... don't..."  Its words melted into indecipherable cries.

	Eagle teared up even more.  He hugged the thing tight, nuzzling his head over the creature's head.  He clenched his eyes shut, taking several deep breaths.  Finally, with steely determination, he opened his eyes and frowned.  "Come with me, Ebon."

	"Mrmmmfff..."  The shape-shifter shook, spasmed.  "Wh... what?"

	"I'm getting you out of here."  Eagle was already levitating several supplies and shoving them into a floating bag.

	The changeling looked up at the stallion, fangs trembling.  "Getting... m-me out...?"

	"Far away... as far as we have to..."

	"But... but the Jury—"

	"I made a promise..."  Eagle hoisted the bag over his flank and tied it tight.  "...a promise to you and you alone.  I don't know how dangerous it will be with the secret out, and I don't want to risk it.  All I want is to make sure you're safe.  Do you understand?"  At last, he levitated his shield over to himself.  "I'm taking you away from here before anypony finds out."

	"Where... wh-where will we go?"

	"I don't know, and it doesn't matter."  Eagle knelt down and cradled the creature's chin so that they stared face to face.  "We'll be together.  We'll start a new life—the life you always needed and the one I always wanted."

	"But... b-but..."

	"Please, Ebon..."  Eagle stared firm, his eyes dry and determined.  "Trust me.  I will not let you down."

	The changeling stared.  Slowly, its trembles built back up.  Without a word, it sniffled and leaned in to nuzzle the stallion back.

	Eagle took the opportunity.  He hoisted the weak creature over his flank and shuffled his weight until the changeling was comfortable.  "Okay... okay okay okay..."  He took a long, desperate breath.  "... ... ..."  He closed his eyes, paused, then reopened them.  "Let's go."

	The stallion dashed out, all the while the changeling clung tightly to his back, burrying his face into Eagle's mane.



	As Eagle rushed into the mess hall, he slowed his gallop into a trot.  Clenching his teeth, he eyed the couch where a tiny family huddled.

	Pilate and Bellesmith were fast asleep.  Kera dozed quietly between the two of them, her tattooed muzzle salty from dried tears.

	Under bands of starlight twinkling through the portholes, Eagle Eye carefully crept past them.  He paused once, staring at the two slumbering beloveds with their foals.  His lips pursed, as if he was about to say something.  His face teetered on the brink of an intense sob, but he swallowed it down with a frown.

	Swiftly, he spun towards the kitchen and resumed his speedy canter.

	The lounge fell in silence.

	A few seconds later, one of Kera's green eyes squinted open.  She blinked brightly.  A breath later, she jumped up to her hooves and began shaking Belle's limbs.

	"Belle... Belle!"  Kera hissed.  "Come on, wake up!"

	"Mmmfnngh..."  Belle stirred, wincing.  "Pilate, beloved... Rainbow's... mmrff..."

	"Wake up wake up wake up!" Kera's horn flashed as she tugged at the two ponies' manes.

	This time, even Pilate began stirring.  "Guhh... what in Spark's name...?"

	"Kera?" Belle squinted at the foal.

	"You never g-guessed what I just saw!" Kera squealed breathily.



	Eagle bounded down the Noble Jury's stairwell until he was at the bottom floor.  He paused to make sure the changeling was still clinging tight.  With a deep breath, he made for the door to the rear hangar.

	He bumped straight into Josho.

	"Ooomf!"  Eagle stumbled back, almost dropping the creature on his back.

	"Can't sleep either, huh?"  Josho grumbled from where he paced.  "Yeesh, Princess, I'm telling ya.  If I had a bit for every time we waited for the paint bucket to sacrifice her life in our absence..."  He suddenly froze in place, squinting.  "Uhhhhh... kiddo?  What's with—"

	Eagle Eye trotted briskly past him.  "Josho, thanks for everything.  I gotta go."

	"Go?!  Go where?!"  Josho pointed.  "And what in Ledo's name is that—"

	"Hrrnngh!"  Eagle spun with a glint of metal.

	CLANG!  The shield uppercutted Josho.

	"Augh!"  He fell back on his fat flank, sliding to a stop against the engine room's doorframe.

	"Don't follow me, old stallion!"  Eagle Eye snarled.  He opened the door—but lingered slightly.  A tiny whimper escaped his lips.  Fidgeting, he spat out, "I-I'm sorry..." Then darted into the hangar, locking the door behind him.

	"What... in the bl-blue bucking blazes?!"  Josho struggled and struggled to get up.

	The door to the engine room hissed open.  Props and Zaid spilled out.

	"JJ!" Props gasped.

	"Whoah there, roly poly!"  Zaid reached down with two hooves.  "If you're gonna try pulling off that crap, try it in the shower!"

	"This ain't no laughing matter, bozo!" Josho lurched up onto his hooves, wincing.  "Eagle Eye's leaving!"

	"He's leaving?!" Props gasped.  "What for?!"

	"I dunno, but he just went through me to do it!"

	Hoofsteps echoed across the stairwell.  Within a blink, Kera galloped to the bottom level, followed by a breathless Bellesmith and Pilate.

	"Hey!  Hey!  Everypony!"  Kera skidded to a stop.  "Did you see Eagle Eye just now?!"

	"No, but my chins did," Josho grumbled.

	"Kera saw him rushing across the mess hall!" Belle said.  "It looked like he had Ebon Mane on his back."

	"He had something on his back alright," Josho grumbled.  "But it sure as Hell wasn't Ebon."

	"What on earth could you mean by that?" Pilate asked.

	"Nnngh!"  Props was shoving against the door to the infirmary.  "Hey guys!  Mr. Adoracutes locked us out!"

	"He did not!"  Zaid brushed Props aside and threw his shoulder into the door.  "Nnnngh!"  He leaned back, panting.  "Holy hoofjobs, he did!"

	Just then, the entire ship shook.  Everypony could hear the metal rattle of hydraulic door parts moving through the bulkheads.

	"What in heaven's name is going on here?!" Belle exclaimed.

	"If I didn't know better, I'd say the hangar door was opening," Pilate stammered.

	Everypony looked at one another.

	"Blessed Spark," Belle gasped.  "Top deck!"

	Kera was the first to scamper up the stairs.  Everypony swiftly followed suit.



	"What in the spit is happening to Nancy Jane now?!" Floydien shouted from the cockpit.

	"Feels like a release of pressure!" Booster Spice exclaimed.  "Does this ship have opening compartments?"

	"Yes yes yes!  In the rear!"

	"Then I think somepony's just opened it!" Booster exclaimed.  His ears twitched to the sound of galloping hooves.  He spun towards the stairwell.

	The Jurists charged out, catching their breaths in the dim starlight.

	"Anypony seen Eagle Eye?!" Kera asked.

	"Who?!"

	"The cute girl," Josho grumbled.

	"You mean the blonde with the awesome goggles?"

	"No, the cuter one!" Props chirped

	Booster squinted.  "The lavender unicorn?"

	"That one!"

	"I haven't seen anypony come up here until you guys just—"

	"Don't be silly!" Belle shouted, rushing towards the starboard railing.  "Look towards the ground!  They'll have touched down by now!"

	"They?!"

	"Eagle Eye and Ebon!" Josho shouted, peering past the opened hangar doors at the stern.  "They just jumped ship, and I'm willing to bet Princess used his magic!"

	"Why in the spit would lover boomers jump ship?!"

	"Just look for them, okay?!  They can't have gone far!"

	"Searching... searching..."  Zaid squinted across the forest.  "Reticulating splines..."

	"Zaidy Waidy, less mouthing and more squinting."

	"There!" Kera's voice cracked from the port side.

	"Kera?" Pilate stammered as ponies galloped past him.

	"Where?!  Where?!"  Props bounced.

	"Down there!  Look!" Kera pointed.

	Every Jurist spotted two shapes galloping through the forest with a green glow.

	"Wait..."  Zaid blinked.  "Doesn't EE's horn glow violet?"

	"That's... n-not his horn," Josho murmured.

	"Then if it's not his horn that's glowing, what's—?" Pilate began but didn't finish.  His ears folded and he tilted his face across the Jury.

	Bellesmith blinked at him.  Ultimately, she realized he wasn't aiming his ears in her direction.  She turned completely around.

	Roarke was leaning over the starboard side.  Her lenses extended all the way, locked on the fleeing figure.  After a deep breath, she scowled heavily.

	Belle blinked.  "Roarke..."

	Thw-Thwppp!  The metal mare shot out a length of metal cables.  They latched onto a tree's upper branches.  Within the same breath, she leapt clear off the side of the Jury, swinging until she was at earth level.  There, she landed with the grace of her metal-reinforced limbs, then broke into a swift gallop after the two.

	Belle fell back on her haunches.  "Oh Spark, no..."

	"Dammit!" Josho grunted, making to leap over the railing.  "Not my kid—!"

	"Whoa whoah whoah!"  Zaid and Booster Spice reached in, tugging the unicorn's heavy weight back.  "Blondie!  We gotta catch up with them before Roarke does!"

	"Handsome!" Props was already hollering towards the cockpit.  "You gotta land Nancy!  This is a super hyper turbo ultra emergency!"

	"Ungh!  If you boomers wouldn't bleed yourselves out so quickly—"

	"Mr. Floydien, please, you must lower the ship at once!" Pilate shouted.

	"Yes yes yes!  Glimmering in the doing!"

	Everypony braced themselves as the ship rapidly descended.

	Kera bit her lip, trembling.  She didn't realize it, but she was side-stepping towards Belle, clinging to one of the adult mare's legs.  Belle wrapped a hoof around the child, all the while her worried eyes stuck to the forest below as the trees came closer.  Fresh tears glistened in the starlight.
	


	Rainbow Dash didn't dare look behind her.  Hearing the ear-shattering death roar of the pursuing creatures was real enough.

	At last, the mountain peak came within reach.  Rainbow spun a hard angle around it, piercing a layer of thick mist as she approached the opening.  The dark chasm yawned before her like a purgatorial gate.

	"Whelp..."  She sucked her breath in, a taste of bitter cold winds.  "...time for open house."  She took her last glance of starlight, then dropped.

	Just as the closest waves of serpents nipped at her hooves, Rainbow jerked hard to the right, twirled, and plunged deep into the mountainous abyss.  A solid rope of ravenous serpents sailed after her, returning speedily to their vile lair, abandoning the country outside.

		//------------------------------//
		// A Loyal Anchor Never Breaks		//------------------------------//

	Eagle Eye panted and panted as he galloped wildly through the trees.

	The changeling on his back winced with each jolt, clinging as tightly as it could.  It fought the urge to sob with every bounding trot the stallion beneath it took.

	"D-don't let go, Ebon," Eagle murmured, his face pale with sweat.  "Please... st-stay with me."  He gulped.  "I'll get us someplace s-safe!  Someplace where n-nopony will know a thing about changelings..."

	"What..."  The shape-shifter stirred, shuddering.  "What about th-the Jury?"

	Eagle grimaced in mid-sprint.  "I don't want to risk anything..."  He gulped.  "I don't want to risk you anymore!"  He slumped against a tree, pausing to shiver.  "It's all m-my fault, Ebon... I've ruined everything."  He whimpered.  "I should have t-told you.  I should have told everypony.  But n-now... how can I be trusted?"

	"EE, I..."  The changeling stirred, squeezing one of the stallion's shoulders.  "I... I tr-trust..."

	Eagle bit his lip, reaching up and touching its forelimb. "We'll start over, 'kay?  Someplace... somewhere..."  He broke into a gallop once again.  "It'll be different, y'hear?!  No more battles.  No more blood."

	"Eagle..."

	Eagle sprinted out into a tiny starlit clearing.  "No more pain!  None of mine, none of yours, none of th-theirs!"  He was hyperventilating at this point.  "You'll have love and peace!  Just like I pr-promised!"

	"Eagle, please, don't—"

	Thw-Thwppp!  A length of metal cable lashed out from the treeline behind them and wrapped around Eagle Eye's left rear leg.  Twnnng!

	"Aaaugh!"  Eagle Eye sprawled to the forest floor.

	"Ooof!"  The changeling flew off him and rolled raggedly across the clearing.

	Eagle struggled for about three seconds.  Suddenly, he was hoisted up into the air.  He yelped, dangling by his one leg.  He looked up to see the metal cable pulled tight over a hanging tree branch.  Something blurred in the corner of his vision.  Breathless, he twirled to look.

	Th-Thud!  Roarke's four hooves landed heavily inside the clearing.  She marched icily towards the collapsed shape-shifter.

	The creature looked up, spasming fitfully.  Upon first sight of the Searonese mare, it shrieked and scooted away from her.  "EE!  Eagle!"

	"Nnngh—Roarke!" Eagle spat, his eyes twitching.  He spun and fought with his binding.  "Mmrfnnngh—Stop it!  Leave him alone!"

	Roarke kept marching.  She was so close now to the shivering changeling that her starlit shadow spread over its porous limbs.

	At last, Eagle took a deep breath.  He aimed his horn at the cable ensnaring his leg.  A violet light shimmered brightly at the tip of his skull.  He gritted his teeth, hissing beneath his breath.  Slowly, the cable started to bend and unravel.  The stallion concentrated until a tiny river of blood trickled out his nostrils.  At last—Snap!  The cable unraveled with a loud pop.

	Eagle Eye fell like a dead weight to the forested floor.  Ignoring the pain of impact, he rolled up onto his hooves, unsheathed his shield, and charged at full speed.  "Dammit, Roarke—Go away!"

	Roarke calmly turned around—instantly ducking.

	"Rrrrghh!"  Eagle flung the shield at full force, then slammed it down over her neck.  "Haaaaugh!"

	Perfectly quiet, she backtrotted from the blow, side-stepped Eagle's next to swings, and raised her hoof as he jabbed forward with the disc.  Her metal brace caught the shield's edge, then pulled down.

	Whang!  Eagle was uppercutted by the other end of his own weapon.  Wheezing, he nevertheless shoved the object at her at full force.  Roarke simply planted her hooves in the ground, taking the brunt of the attack.  When her hooves could drag through the earth no longer, she lifted the shield up with both forelimbs, tossing Eagle Eye's petite body over her.

	Eagle Eye fell hard to the ground and rolled into a tree trunk.  Growling, he stood up and began galloping towards her immediately—

	P-Pow!  Roarke fired two large metal staples from her forelimb.

	Cl-Clack!  Both braces caught around Eagle's right legs, pinning him sideways to a thick tree trunk.  Wide-eyed, he shook and struggled to get out of the trap.  "Nnnnrghhh—Gkkkt! Sp-Spark!  He aimed his horn at the tree, unraveling the bark like a peeled potato.  The staples had embedded too deep, and the chances of getting unpinned was slim at best.

	Without saying a word, Roarke swiveled around and trotted firmly towards where the changeling limply scurried.

	"No... No, Roarke, p-please!"  Eagle was sobbing at this point.  "Don't d-do this to him, Roarke!  I beg you!"  He tilted his head up and hollered into the night air.  "Ebon, Run!  Don't let Roarke get near you!  You hear me?!  Don't let her touch you!"

	The changeling was a whimpering mess.  It kicked and scraped at the earth, sliding weakly away from the looming mare.  "Please..."  Its fangs quivered.  "I... I-I didn't know!  I swear!"  Its clear eyes teared.  "I-I wasn't spying for Mother—I mean Chrysalis!"  It winced, covering its glazed muzzle with a pair of webbed hooves.  "Don't, Roarke, please!  Don't hurt Eagle!  I-I beg you!"

	Roarke's brow furrowed.  She lowered in front of him.

	"Ebon!  Get out of here—"

	"You c-can do what you want to m-me!"  The thing howled,  "But don't h-hurt Eagle!  He d-didn't mean anything!  He j-just wanted to protect me—"

	At last, Roarke hissed, "Look at me."

	"Nnnngh—no—!"

	Fiercely, Roarke yanked both of the changeling's forelimbs.  She pulled it up so that she could snarl into its face.  "Look.  At.  Me."

	The creature winced... shuddered... and eventually squinted at her with constant trembles.

	Roarke's nostrils flared.  She tugged on its left hoof until it rested against her beating chest.  "Feel."

	The changeling merely blinked at her, its gossamer fins twitching.

	Roarke inhaled deeply.  "Who... do you love...?"

	The creature's breaths fell short.  Its eyes glazed over, reflecting Roarke's lenses, then pulsed with a green flame.  In five melting seconds, its black carapace gave way to a blue coat.  A rainbow mane dangled off the mare's folded ears.

	Eagle Eye gawked silently from afar.

	Roarke sighed.  "Who do you love?"

	Rainbow's eyes quivered, then slowly turned violet.  Her ragged hair waxed into a luscious purple mane.  The starlight reflected a glossy shine over the petite stallion's lavender coat.

	At this point, the air rattled with hoofsteps.  The whole Jury galloped to the edge of the clearing, stopping with a collective gasp.

	"There!" Props yelped, pointing.  "There they are!"

	"What in Ledo's name is she doin' to them?!"  Josho growled, pumping his shotgun.  He took two thunderous steps further.  "Hey!  Leave 'em be, ya bionic bitch—!"

	"No..."  Belle stuck her forelimb out, blocking the stallion.  Everypony glanced wildly at her.  She gulped and said, "Just wait..."

	Pilate's ears twitched curiously.  Kera sat on his backside, craning her neck to see.  Zaid and Props watched with worried expressions while Booster Spice and Floydien squinted quizzically.

	Roarke was leaning forward at this point.  Still gripping the unicorn doppgelganger's hoof, she then pressed it to his own chest.  "This... Feel this?"

	The stallion bit his lip and nervously nodded.

	"This is your home," Roarke droned, staring intently into his violet eyes.  "It is your anchor.  You can fly for millions of miles in any direction, but you'll be nowhere if you lose track of this.  It's who you are.  It's what you are.  Your outside might change, whether you wish it or not, but that isn't what makes you you."

	The unicorn shuddered, eventually mewling forth, "But... b-but I'm not real..."  He sniffled, tearing.  "I've never been.  What if I'm not meant to have a h-home?"

	"You had one as soon as you found him," Roarke said firmly.  "And you sure as Hell won't be staying there if you run away... if you let fear and doubt get the best of you... the both of you..."

	The stallion blinked, his breaths slowing, calming down...

	Roarke took a deep breath and said, "I've not been truly living for most of my existence."  She gulped.  "That's all changed now, and even with my anchor gone, I know where I belong, and... I now know how to keep what I have real."  She leaned back.  "Can you say the same?"

	The stallion clenched his jaw.  He looked over her shoulder at Eagle Eye across the way.  In a flicker of warm green light, his burgundy coat returned.  "Yes," Ebon Mane said.

	Eagle stared back, his features going limp in a soft breath.

	Roarke stood up, staring down at Ebon in pure silence.  A few seconds later, she jerked towards Eagle Eye.  Th-Thwppp!  She launched a pair of metal cables that instantly wrapped around the staples binding him to the tree.  Cr-Crack!  She loosened them in a hearbeat.

	"Ooomf!"  Eagle Eye fell to the ground, wincing.  He didn't try galloping, moving, or charging.  He didn't say anything.  The stallion simply sat there, stunned.

	"Go to him," Roarke said quietly.  "He's been seeking a home for a very long time as well."

	Ebon took a deep breath.  He stood on strong legs, then shuffled softly across the clearing.  When he reached Eagle, he squatted low, placing a hoof on the stallion's shoulders.

	Instantly, Eagle quivered.  He clenched his eyes shut and sobbed, "I'm sorry, Ebon... I'm so... s-so sorry..."

	"Shhhh..."  Ebon leaned in, nuzzling the stallion softly.  "Don't be sorry..."  He bore a tiny smile as a tear trickled down his cheek.  "You're my protector, after all..."

	A bittersweet giggle escaped Eagle's throat.  His smile was a crooked thing, buckling under the first of many heavy sobs.  His forelimbs snaked blindly forward, and Ebon caught them—caught him, enfolding the ex-mercenary in a heartfelt embrace.

	"I l-love you, Ebon," Eagle whimpered, sniffling.  "Spark help me, I love you s-so much.  I'd do anything for you..."

	"I know." Ebon rested his chin atop the shivering stallion's head, holding him close.  "Just... n-no more running away, 'kay?"

	"Hrmmmm..."  Eagle squeaked, nodding tearfully.  "'Kay..."

	By this point, several shadows had gathered around the couple.  The rest of the Jurists stood around them, some resting hooves on the stallions' shoulders while Props and Kera squatted know, nuzzling them with happy grins.  Belle bore a teary smile as she leaned against Pilate.

	"It's never too late," Roarke said.  She inhaled warmly, her lensed eyes swimming across the tranquil forest.  "It's never too late to begin again."  At last, her gaze fell upon Josho.

	The stallion stared back.  He leaned on his shotgun and gave her a smug smirk.

	Roarke's lips almost curved.  Then, with a meditative breath, she turned from the warm scene and gazed into the cold mist of the northern mountains...
		//------------------------------//
		// Kicking, Fighting, Until the End		//------------------------------//

	With a shout, Rainbow Dash plunged into utter darkness.  She felt stuffy patches of air nipping at her ears and bangs.  Squinting, she ran a hoof over the lightning pendant hanging from her neck.  Immediately, a solid ring of blurred stone walls illuminated around her in a ruby glow.  There was barely any room to breathe, much less spread her wings out straight.

	So, she did neither.  Squeezing her body into the shape of a blue torpedo, she hurled herself down the near-vertical shaft in the heart of the mountain.  It was around this time that she heard a deaffening salvo of echoes and roars.

	She narrowed her eyes and looked behind her.

	Just beyond her ruby aura, a solid wall of gray ethereal light came charging down after her.  The monsters were gaining inches by the second, their fangs, talons, and scales streaking after her whipping tail.

	Rainbow Dash stopped looking behind.  She set her eyes on the darkness ahead, twirling her body like a corkscrew as she fought the increasing friction of her claustrophobic dive.  The walls were smooth and polished from changeling acid, and soon they started spreading apart, opening up into a grand cavern of sorts.

	When Rainbow pierced her way into the lower depths, she could feel the ghostly echo of her wind-splitting wings.  It morphed into a whining sound that echoed off every extremity of the cavern.  Rainbow pivoted until she faced the direction from which the last echo reverberated.  Sure enough, the Yaerfaerda symbol glistened from beyond.  Rainbow hurled herself towards it, wheezing for breath in the deep, deep tomb.

	Soon, the darkness from beyond swallowed up her ruby pendant altogether, as well as the ribbons of spectral beasts sailing after her.



	The Jurists congregated inside and outside of the ship.  Eagle Eye and Ebon sat on the hangar's entrance, their hooves intertwined as they gently, quietly nuzzled each other.  Josho watched from a distance, occasionally staring out into the misty treeline beyond where the Noble Jury was parked.

	Bellesmith and Pilate sat together in the grass while Kera paced anxiously around them.  Several times, Belle tried coaxing the little filly to stop and rest, but the foal insisted on trotting in worried little circles.

	Pilate tilted his head up.  Standing along the port side of the Noble Jury's upper deck were Zaid and Props.  Zaid was murmuring something into Props ear, all the while rubbing her shoulder.  Props shook, quivered, then clenched her teary eyes shut.  In a sad fit, she galloped off and ran down the stairwell.

	Zaid stood in place, sighing.  He glanced towards the cockpit where Josho, Floydien and Booster Spice could be seen, sitting limply against the wooden rails of the starboard side.  With a limp breath, Zaid stared back at the forest clearing beneath the ship.  He squinted.

	One shape stood on the treeline's edge, staring ever vigilantly into the mountain mists, not moving a single muscle.



	Rainbow's wings were growing numb, as were her ear drums.

	The shrieks of the monsters were all around her, closing in on her, consuming her.

	She hissed and panted for breath, but she couldn't feel her lungs at this point.  The whole world was a soupy puddle at the bottom of a heartless abyss.  All that accompanied her was the sickly pale glow of every conceivable abomination from nightmares.  As the legions of chaos closed in, she felt the walls doing the same.  Something was glowing along the uneven floor of the cavern.

	Rainbow Dash looked down, and her eyes reflected row after row of tombstones.  Only they weren't tombstones, but instead giant silver strips of chaos metal laid side by side for hundreds of meters.  Queen Chrysalis' devilish hoofwork was evident everywhere Rainbow looked, and as her living self sailed over the unearthly "nests," she heard louder and fresher shrieks.  Like infant banshees, entire flocks of nubile monsters flew up from the metal strips where they were demonically spawned.  They joined the hungry crowd flocking after Rainbow's tail, adding to the speed of their malevolent pursuit.

	Sweat dripped off Rainbow's aching limbs.  She took one fateful look back—and that's when it happened.  Her eyes flickered, and it tore her lungs inside out.

	"Aaaugh!"  Rainbow yelped, dropping rapidly.  She flapped her wings twice as hard, straining against the cold air as dizziness set in.  Seething, she lifted up, barely skimming the tops of the silver strips.  Tiny serpents leapt out, nipping and snapping at her flesh.  She kicked off of them and propelled herself towards the cavern ceiling, bobbing and weaving in a vain attempt to even out.

	She was panting at this point, hyperventilating.  She flung her head forward, trying to look straight ahead.

	The Yaerfaerda symbol was a twirling streak of alien light.  She couldn't center herself—couldn't glide evenly.

	And this was when the first of several monsters pounced on her body.

	"Nnnngh—Gagh!"  She twisted, twirled, and bucked the thing off.

	Two more pounced on her, dragging her legs and wingtips down to the jagged cavern floor.

	"Mmmmgnnngh—Raaaagh!" She bucked and bucked and kicked the things off.  Wheezing for breath, she tried ascending once more.

	The abominable flock closed in all around her.  With fangs barred and claws raking, they folded around the pegasus, dragging her into the glowing depths of the swarm, slowing her flight to a bloody grind.

	Soon, the rest of the legion caught up, bunching up in the center of the cavern, dogpiling on the putrid strip of pony flesh.  The stuffy air was ripe with victory roars and clattering jaws.

	As the suffocating group grew thicker and thicker, their chaotic glow glistened off a solid wall ahead of them... a golden door looming just a few fateful meters away.



	Ebon was exhausted.  He lay his chin on Eagle Eye's forelimbs as he succumbed to dull slumber.  Eagle caressed his mane, pausing every now and then to stare at the changeling's finely crafted fibers.  He sniffled, his muzzle neutrally caught between and smile and a sob.  He leaned down multiple times, kissing the top of Ebon's fuzzy head while staring into the forest.

	Past where Pilate, Belle, and Kera sat, Eagle could still see the figure of Roarke.

	The metal mare hadn't sat for one second.  Even if her legs trembled, she still remained standing, staring like a stalwart statue into the murky depths of the forest.  Her ears twitched every now and then, but her rigid stance was absolute.

	Eagle Eye bit his lip.  He tilted his muzzle down down and nuzzled Ebon in his sleep, closing his eyes before the tears could squeeze out.



	Deep inside the mountain, the feasting cluster of monstrosities began to relax... to settle.  Their scales loosened while their tails and talons went slack.

	Then, all of the sudden, there was an undulating quiver of flesh, emanating outward from the center of the ravenous pile in a violent wave.

	A second later—

	POW!  The bodies went flying in every direction, their flesh smoking with trailing embers.

	In a beam of bright ruby light, Rainbow's body shot out from the center of the horde.  

	She collapsed five seconds later, stumbling across the cold stone floor.  Her pendant's ruby glow flickered, highlighting dozens of scrapes and deep cuts along her body.  Her breath was a pained shriek.  She lurched forward, vomiting blood and mucus onto the craggy granite.  Wincing, wheezing, she squinted up with one good eye.

	The door to the machine world loomed straight ahead.  She saw the Urohringr symbol in all its golden brilliance, and through the encroaching fogginess she made out Austraeoh and Eljunbyro and a few others as well.

	Hissing in pain, she dragged herself forward, leaving bloody little streaks across the cavern floor.  The pegasus inched her way towards the door.  Shrieks sounded off behind her; she sensed shadows soaring in.

	"Rgghhh!"  She spun around, clamped her pendant with two bloodied hooves, and aimed high.  Fl-Flash!  With two well-aimed harmonic blasts, she crippled a pair of serpents before they got a chance to touch her.  They collapsed in burnt heaps on either side.  More monsters rushed in.  Rainbow pulled herself up with quivering wings, stumbling towards the door.  When her hoof made contact, she could spot the blood splatter before the metal began glowing.

	Just as the air filled with the tell-tale whine of harmonic enchantment, three beasts leapt on Rainbow's backside.  One took a ragged bite of her shoulder.

	"Aaaaaugh!"  Rainbow howled in pain.  She shook two of them off and struggled with the third one whose fangs were lodged in her flesh.  Hissing, she instead flattened her body against the metal door.  A pony-shaped light emanated from the gold surface in response, intensifying in brilliance.  Not long after, the serpent biting into Rainbow shrieked as it dissolved from the outside in, finally releasing its grip.

	As the doors parted, a combination of pressurized air and golden light knocked several of the leaping monsters back.  They bellowed in pain, struggling to get closer to Rainbow Dash and finish her butchered corpse off.

	Rainbow clenched her teeth in pain.  She tried standing up, but the blood from her wounds made her slip on the metal floor.  Wheezing, she stumbled forward, then moved the only remaining strong parts of her—her wings.  Like a limp balloon, she drifted into the halls of the machine world.  Her torn body was followed by a golden glow, illuminating rows upon rows of long-dormant pendulums and gears and pulley systems.  The immaculate platinum surfaces reflected her ragged body as she fluttered unevenly like a ghost, lost in the abandoned basement of a forsaken world.

	Her eyes twitched left and right, searching for her center.  It was then that she realized that the glow of Yaerfaerda was all around her, blinding her.  So, instead, she squinted bravely into the luminous bowels, seeking the focal point of her goal.  At last she found it, below her and to the right.  Careful not to let her wings go fully limp, she descended slowly through the metallic maze.

	She heard a crackling echo behind her.  The beasts finally recovered from the door's opening, and the whole entire legion soared in, raking their claws against the untouched surfaces of the holy place.  They rattled gears and pistons and chains as they searched every crevice for the living pegasus that had opened the domain.

	When they at last found her, it was at the far end of a bridge, in the center of which loomed a bright golden pedestal with an even brighter flame.

	Rainbow saw it, and she ignored the resounding shrieks of the monsters as they closed in around her.  She angled her wings and glided straight for Yaerfaerda, its six circles rotating faster and faster as she got closer.  She held her breath, stretching a hoof straight forward.

	Wh-Wham!  A serpent slammed into her side.

	"Hrkkk!"  She collapsed, rolling off the bridge.  She gripped the metal surface at the last second—even thinking to raise a rear hoof up and buck the serpent on its second approach.  She pulled herself forward, tugging weakly at the floor.  Two more serpents landed.  She blasted one with the light from her pendant and uppercutted the other with her hoof.

	Then, on the next breath, her body went deathly cold.

	"Guh!"  Rainbow fell chin-first against the bridge.  Blood pooled around her, but she couldn't feel it.  She couldn't even smell it.  Every time she opened her red-on-yellow eyes, the world swam blazing pirouettes.  She tried whimpering somepony's name, but all that came out was bile.  Between the feverish blinks, she realized that something in her legs was mustering the strength to pull her forward, but it was a pitiable crawl at best, and the entire legion of monsters had closed in around her, circling at just a spit's distance.

	Up ahead, the pedestal was just a trot or two away, though the ruby flame billowed thinner and thinner, dying out—just like another light.

	Rainbow's eyes darted through the dizziness to see that her pendant was dimming.  Half a second later, she was howling in pain, gripping her forehead as two fixed points bled out along her brow.  She felt the brush of suddenly hairy fetlocks while a singular fang ripped through the gums in her teeth.

	Rolling over onto her back, Rainbow hugged herself, spasming in pain.  She didn't expect it to be this agonizing... to feel so excruciating.  A queer thought entered her mind: that her biggest mistake all these months was fighting it.  Upon contemplating that, the numbness returned.  Her yellow eyes opened, and she saw the monsters swarming in on her, for they knew—as she knew—that there was no harmony left to keep them at bay.

	Her eyes rolled back, and she shaded herself from the mess of fangs with a pair of twitching limbs.  It would do no good.

	The creatures descended on Rainbow in a violent, churning mass of teeth and claws.  At the same exact time, the ruby flame atop the pedestal went out completely.
		//------------------------------//
		// When the Light Goes Out		//------------------------------//

	Th-Thunk!

	Props gasped.  It was intensely dark inside the Noble Jury's engine room.  She spun around.

	There was no lavender light coming from the black iron cage.

	Muzzle quivering, the blonde engineer shuffled nervously towards the container.  Gripping the bars, she pensively peered in.

	The ancient tome lay on its side, completely dormant.  Nothing was glowing—not a single rune.

	The mare's eyes turned instantly glossy.



	Up on the top deck of the Jury, Zaid lay limply against the railing, his eyes thin as he gazed at Roarke and the forest beyond.

	Suddenly, there was a loud galloping of hooves.

	He turned around just as Props skidded to a stop.  He stood up straight, ears twitching at attention.

	Props stared back, panting, her eyes wide as saucers.

	Josho, Booster, and Floydien craned their necks to see.  Once they witnessed her expression, they slowly exchanged confused glances.

	Zaid shuffled towards her.  His mouth hung open on the edge of an unspoken question.

	That was when Props bit her lip.  She shook her head, harder and harder.  Tears welled up in her eyes as she collapsed right there, sobbing pitifully.

	Zaid's ears folded back.  Gulping a lump down his throat, he squatted alongside her and held the mare close.  He peered nervously over the ship's edge, where he made eye contact with Bellesmith.  He wished that he hadn't, so he instead buried his face into Props' neck.

	Belle gasped, clasping a hoof over her mouth.  Pilate tilted his head curiously towards her.

	In the meantime, Kera gawked, her mouth agape.  She shook, she fumed.  With a growl, she galloped straight into the misty tree-line.  Pilate and Belle were too late to stop her.

	Roarke, however, only needed to fling one hoof aside.  She caught Kera and lifted the foal up into her forelimbs.  The filly shrieked and struggled and fought.  Her horn glowed and the branches of the trees shook overhead.  As the leaves fell and Roarke's grip tightened, Kera's body untensed, melting into a series of pent-up sobs.  She clenched her eyes shut and let loose one long howl, surrendering to Roarke's embrace.

	Ebon awoke with a start, glancing worriedly towards the treeline.  Eagle held him close along the hangar's entrance, his body shaking with crying heaves as he clung to the changeling.

	Belle and Pilate nuzzled each other, helplessly looking on... listening on while Kera's wails echoed against the trees ahead of them.

	Roarke was silent.  She weathered every sob that wracked through Kera's body.  Only when it was time to nuzzle the child did she finally break eye contact with the foot of the mountain, her lenses devoid of glint or starlight.  She caressed the filly's mane, murmuring a single word over and over again that even she couldn't be bothered to remember.
		//------------------------------//
		// Eyes on the Big Picture		//------------------------------//

	The cosmos glittered endlessly, segmented into brilliant portraits with spectral nebulae as their majestic frames.

	Galaxies swirled with liquid grace across the ebony expanse, their epic, glowing arms like golden bands that streaked through inky darkness.

	Between the comet streaks, the solar flares, and the electromagnetic pulses, a solid ring hovered at a fixed point in space.  In the very center of its rotation was a shimmering beacon of light, warming every square kilometer of its curved inner surfaces.  The light flickered for a space of time, dimmed, then flickered once more, repeating its cycle evenly for decades, centuries, millennia, eons.

	In the far distance, occupying the far ends of the same galaxy, more rings twirled.  Dozens of them.  Hundreds.  Thousands.

	They swam a fantastic dance through the universe, like glowing eyes forever exploring the infinite expanse.

	"Ah, I see now.  We are forever learning, aren't we?"

	One ring in particular sailed through a patch of chaotic space, its outer surfaces suddenly covered in malevolent shadow.

	"Life, after all, is about progress.  Surely, one can expect a few bumps along the way, epic or not."

	With multiple pulses of light, the ring broke up into twelve separate parts.  They turned dark, dim, and swam away from each other across the miasmic emptiness.

	"There is chaos, and there is evil—for sure.  But then there are also those who do the wrong things for all the right reasons.  History will forever demonize them, but history doesn't have to be just a straight line, don't you think?"

	As the planes dwindled into darkness, their reflections vanished in the tears clinging to Rainbow Dash's eyelashes.  She drifted through the dismal clouds of chaos, her scarred limbs hanging limply by her side, her muzzle frozen in a perpetual grimace.

	"What...?!"  She gulped dryly.  "Where...?"

	"I'm beginning to understand, as maybe you're starting to, that history needs someone awesome like you... someone bold enough, crazy enough, and daring enough to complete the circle with just that—a straight line.  Are you up for the challenge?"

	"I..."  Rainbow gnashed her teeth.  She opened her lids just as she drifted past an artificial sun.  "I-I don't get it..."  Her eyes danced between bright and dark ends of a lone plane in chaos.  "...why am I not dead?"

	"Because you are up for the challenge.  It's silly of me to even ask.  And it's silly of you to feel so alone."

	Rainbow wheezed, watching as the curved plane tilted about to face her, its vast mountains, valleys, deserts, and oceans glittering beneath a brilliant sunrise.

	"I..."  Rainbow Dash seethed, her wings spreading apart as her muscles tightened.  "Fly."  She stretched a hoof forward, into the blinding light.  "I n-need to fly."

	"... ... ...let me help you."

	A soft hoof gripped Rainbow's and tugged—



	—her up into a sitting position.

	Rainbow gasped, sputtering.  With wide eyes, she looked around from where she sat, panting heavily.

	She was on the bridge deep inside the machine world.  Monsters loomed all around her, thrashing and gnashing at a rippling sphere of harmonic energy emanating outward in all direction.  Despite all of their ravenous efforts, they could no longer pierce through the field and touch her.

	Rainbow shuddered.  She blinked, then glanced down at her pendant with a gasp.

	The Element of Loyalty was pulsating brighter than the pegasus had ever before witnessed.  She was surprised that the ruby glow wasn't melting her already torn flesh.

	With a jolt, Rainbow faced the pedestal ahead of her.

	The flame was gone, but the Yaerfaerda symbol remained.

	Rainbow clenched her breath, took a deep breath, and lunged forward.

	Yelling, trailing blood, Rainbow soared towards the pedestal.  She slapped both forelimbs onto the very top.  There was no flame because she was the flame.  As soon as she made contact, the ruby light left the pendant and filled the brazer instead.  Her body erupted with harmonic energy, glowing all over with an immaculate crimson shine.  Every wound, gash, and bruise lit up.  Rainbow Dash ignited the pedestal, incinerating the cavernous interior of the machine in every possible direction.

	The abominations had nowhere to go.  They were doomed from the very moment that they followed Austraeoh inside.  In hellish shrieks, they dissolved one after another, consumed by the ruby torch as it billowed outward, filling every golden nook and cranny of the world's basement, spinning every gear and swinging every pendulum to life.  Soon, there was nothing left to see, for the burning dust of serpentine flesh had cast a fine blanket over every conceivable surface.  In mere seconds, the flame erupted outward, surging into the mountain's hollow core and melting the chaos strips outside to a coarse powder.  The frothing energy illuminated every cursed patch of stone with a cleansing, warming light.

		//------------------------------//
		// A Hard Act to Follow		//------------------------------//

	Beside the stationary Noble Jury, Bellesmith and Pilate cuddled closely with one another on the grass.  They weren't asleep, but they weren't exactly awake either.  Their calm breaths were interrupted every now and then by a sad shudder or a sniffle.  Otherwise, they were still.

	Ebon and Eagle Eye sat not too far away along the Jury's hangar doors, their slumbering expressions frozen in a melancholic glaze.  Further inside the hangar entrance, Props slumped in Zaid's faithful forelimbs.  The two of them were as cold and still as the metal bulkheads of the Jury that loomed around the two.

	All in all, a bitter quiet hush hung over the Jury as they greeted the dawn.

	And then the dawn greeted them.

	Kera was the first to notice it.  Her tattooed face twitched, wrinkled, then scrunched.  Her soft eyelids fluttered open, crusty with the salt of nightly tears.  She squinted her emerald eyes, peering into the mists.  She stood up, climbed over Bellesmith's tail, and padded quietly through the grass.

	She passed by Roarke, who stood at the forest's edge with her head bowed.  Upon hearing the crunch of leaves from the filly's small hooves, the metal mare looked up.  Her brow furrowed as she followed the foal's gaze.  Roarke's head tilted up, and she gazed into the treeline with whirring lenses.

	Belle looked up as well.  A slow gasp escaped her muzzle with increasing velocity.  She vigorously shook Pilate, who snapped awake.

	Ebon and Eagle woke from the sudden commotion, peering upwards to see.  Not long after, the rest of the Jurists trotted quietly out of the ship's hangar.  Josho, Floydien, Zaid, Props, and even Booster Spice stepped out into the clearing, all of their eyes locked on the mountainside.

	The fog was receding, dissipating.  It ran up the mountain's southern face like a reverse blanket, evaporating with translucent tendrils along the way.  Within the span of a minute, the entire cloud of mist had vanished, exposing every beautiful green treetop in the crispness of dawn.

	Kera gawked at the sight.  She spun and looked at Belle and Pilate, her muzzle dropped.  The couple stood up, trotting softly towards her in numb awe.  Suddenly, Belle flinched, shading her eyes.  Pilate lurched to a stop, tilting his head towards his beloved worriedly.

	Curious, Kera spun around—and she too had to squint.  The sunrise had just broken the eastern edge of the mountain, and it pierced the fir trees around Amulek with multiple golden harpstrings.

	Kera had to rub her eyes.  Roarke, on the other hand, stared persistently through her guarded lenses.  Her lips pursed, and it wasn't long after that an uncharacteristically dainty gasp escaped her lips.

	Wincing, Kera looked up, once again braving the brightness.

	As the sun slowly swam its way above the mountain's edge, a petite figure came into focus, trotting quietly towards the Noble Jury, emerging from the dense forest with all her healthy limbs intact.  An unblemished coat shone like the blue sky itself.  At last, when she had fully entered the treeline, Rainbow Dash came to a stop with a rattle of her pendant, bearing a devilish smirk.

	Kera gaped.  Slowly, she sported a tattooed grin that almost mirrored the mare's, if only it weren't for the happy tearstreaks.  She waddled forward, ran, galloped—then threw herself into Rainbow Dash's chest, nuzzling her fuzzy coat.

	Rainbow wrapped a hoof around the filly, messing up her mane.  With a slight chuckle, she looked over the child's shoulder.  When she locked gazes with Belle, her cheeks turned suddenly rosy.

	Belle was lurching forward with Pilate not too far behind.  She reached a trembling hoof forward, giving Rainbow's face and ear the lightest of feathery touches.  Rainbow giggled and nuzzled Belle's hoof back.  At the warm touch, Belle finally caved.  She flung herself forward, swallowing Rainbow in a deep hug with Kera smooshed in between.

	Breathless, Pilate wandered in a zig zag, reaching forward with a stumbling hoof.

	Rainbow pulled her neck out from Belle's nuzzles and gave a sharp whistle.

	Pilate jerked towards the sound, collapsed, and practically plowed the group over with his hug.  The four of them laughed and sobbed at once, all of them clustering together to hold Rainbow Dash tight.

	Eagle shivered, holding a hoof over his muzzle.  He glanced aside at Ebon with a bittersweet smile.  Ebon smiled back, nuzzled him, then grasped the unicorn's hoof with his own—graciously leading him forward.  Soon, both stallions were squatting down, reaching in to nuzzle Rainbow Dash as dearly as they could.

	By this time, Props was bouncing in an ecstatic circle around the group, whooping and hollering her head off with several tosses of her blonde mane.  She barreled into the pile, causing several ponies to chuckle breathlessly.  Zaid smirked, squatting down and hugging Props from behind while the engineer gave Rainbow a cheek-rub or two or twelve.

	Josho leaned on his shotgun with a smirk.  Floydien trotted up beside him.  Josho glanced at the elk and did a double-take upon seeing a smile plastered across the pilot's muzzle.  Scratching his chins, Josho gave the air a booming laugh while once again returning his gaze to the warm scene.

	The laughter was not unheard.  Booster Spice glanced over his shoulder and spotted many familiar faces pouring out of the buildings of Amulek.  From afar, the goggled stallion could see Merigold, Drakshaa, and several others emerging into the sunlight.  The villagers gazed in shock at the clear blue skies and the golden dawn bathing their valley once again in wholesome warmth for the first time in months.  Biting his lip, the stallion turned around and gazed happily at the returning hero.  He clasped his hooves together and shuddered inwardly as his eyes moistened.

	Meanwhile, Rainbow Dash was trying her best to catch a breath from all of the legs and hooves of friends enfolded around her.  Chuckling, she blew her bangs out from her eyes and stared across the clearing.  Her breath left her as her ears twitched.

	Roarke stood across the clearing, staring into the hug.  Her braids danced in the warm morning wind... and she smiled.

	Rainbow Dash blinked.  She clasped her lips together and grinned, a warm, lingering, amorous smile of contentment.

	Roarke exhaled calmly, her cheeks starting to match the color of her mane.

	Rainbow's teeth showed beneath her smile.  She heard something—a shift in the wind.  She tilted her head up from the center of the Jury, staring into the clear blue sky.  For a second there she thought she saw something streaking overhead, the hint of dark red scales, and then those wings were gone once more.  Her head fell to the mountain as the shadow slipped by, and then she glanced east.

	Yaerfaerda was in another place, a distant, far-off destination.  And now it glistened with a distinctly lavender shine.

	Rainbow blinked, and she put on her best smirk.  "Heh..."  Closing her eyes, she calmly drifted back down to earth, caught in the loving hooves of Pilate, Belle, and Kera.  "Awesome."







